(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Just an amazing job by her of setting the boundary."”
“I always tell her, like, she saved my life because she was the first person to really tell me that, like, the party's over.”
“"I didn't know what my plan was," he said.”
“After some thinking, Zac decided to try to convince a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get prescription pills.”
“ABC via Getty ImagesHis partying, though, got more intense, and he desperately wanted more pills.”
“So, I had a lot of the outsides going on."”
“And, you know, I started dating a girl my sophomore year that I would eventually marry.”
“I mean, I was playing baseball, and I was trying to get out of there in four years, which I was able to do.”
“"I would not tell you that my drug use was so rampant during college.”
“And the Adderall eventually turned into some cocaine use here and there," he said.”


"She's great at setting boundaries."
"I always told her that she saved my life because she was the first to really tell me that the party was over."
"I don't know what my plan is," he said
After careful consideration, Zach decided to persuade a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get the prescription medicine
"ABC via Getty Images although his party is getting more and more intense, he is eager for more pills."
"So, I have a lot to do."
"And, you know, I started dating a girl in my sophomore year, and I'll eventually marry her."
"I mean, I was playing baseball and I wanted to get out of it in four years, but I did it."
"I'm not going to tell you how rampant I was when I was in college."
"Snakes eventually turned into cocaine abuse," he said



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's just how I operate.”
“I will give my heart and my soul to the person that I love.”
“She likes the post:InstagramMeanwhile, The Weeknd releases a song with Nav that seems to have a pointed message to Gomez's ex Justin Bieber, who had been publicly petty about Gomez and Tesfaye's relationship.”
“The Weeknd posts a video of Gomez on his Insta story, then officially adds her to his grid.”
“March 2017Gomez and The Weeknd go on an aquarium date at Ripley's Aquarium in Toronto on a trip there together.”
“She goes to over 10 different countries with him (Italy, the Netherlands, Germany, Switzerland, France, the U.S., Canada, Colombia, Brazil, and Argentina), and three continents.”
“In March and April, Gomez continues to follow The Weeknd to his shows.”
“The Weeknd resumes his tour, and Gomez is spotted out at his concert in Amsterdam on the 24th.”
“Here, his jean jacket:Around Valentine's Day, the paparazzi photographs the two making out on a yacht in California.”
“Gomez likes The Weeknd's birthday Instagram:On her own Instagram, Gomez is caught wearing The Weeknd's clothes, a subtle nod they're together.”


"That's how I operate."
"I will give my heart and soul to those I love."
"She likes this post: instagram meanwhile, which released a song with NAV this week, seems to convey a sharp message to former Justin Bieber of Gomez, who publicly scorned the relationship between Gomez and tesfayer."
"A video of Gomez was released on insta this week, and then she was officially added to his social network."
"In March 2017, Gomez and the weekend went to Ripley aquarium in Toronto for an aquarium date."
She went with him to more than 10 different countries (Italy, the Netherlands, Germany, Switzerland, France, the United States, Canada, Colombia, Brazil and Argentina) and three continents
"In March and April, Gomez continued to follow the weekend show."
"He continued his tour this week, and Gomez was found at his concert in Amsterdam on the 24th."
"Here, his jeans and jacket: on the day before and after Valentine's day, the paparazzi took pictures of the two making out on a California yacht
"Gomez likes instagram on weekends: on her own instagram, Gomez was found wearing weekend clothes and nodding subtly to show that they were together."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Aronofsky was previously engaged to Rachel Weisz, with whom he shares 11-year-old son Henry.”
“I was doing double duty trying to be a supportive partner, while also being like, ‘Can I please, for the love of God, not think about mother!”
“...caused a strain in her romantic relationship with the film’s director, Darren Aronofsky.”
“During an interview with Adam Sandler for Variety’s Actors on Actors series, the Oscar winner revealed that Aronofsky’s reactions to the film’s negative reception became “unhealthy” for them as a couple, and they eventually called it quits in October after one year of dating.”
““Normally, I promote a movie, ask people to go see it, and then it’s just out of your hands,” Lawrence, 27, said in the clip.”
““I normally just kind of let it go.”
“Dating the director was different.”
“We d be on the press tour together I d come back to the hotel and the last thing I want to talk about or think about is a movie He comes back from the tour and that s all he wants to talk about and I get it she...”
“...continued...”
““It’s his baby.”


Aronofsky was previously engaged to Rachel Weitz, who has an 11 year old son, Henry
"I have a double responsibility, trying to be a supportive partner, and at the same time saying," for God's sake, can I not think about mom? "
“…… This has led to a tense romantic relationship between her and Darren Aronofsky, the film's director. "
"In the" actor to actor "series of interviews on variety, the Oscar winning actress revealed that Aronofsky's negative reaction to the film was" unhealthy "for the couple, who finally announced their breakup in October after dating for a year."
Lawrence, 27, said in the clip: "usually, I promote a movie, invite others to see it, and then nobody cares."
"I usually just let it be."
"Dating a director is different."
"We took part in the press tour together. When I went back to the hotel, the last thing I wanted to talk about was a movie he came back from his tour. That's what he wanted to talk about. I understood her..."
“… Continue... "
"It's his child."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Alana Abramson at Alana.Abramson@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Before Kelly spoke about her personal experience with Lauer, she read the official statement from the network and showed the comments from Lauer’s former co-host Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb, who was hosting in place of Lauer on Wednesday.”
““This one does hit close to home,” Kelly said, referring to Lauer’s firing.”
“I too have known Matt for a long time and he has been a friend and kind and supportive to me in my transition to NBC News and I see the anguish on my colleague s faces But when this happens Kelly continued What we don t see is the...”
“...pain on the faces of the women who found the courage to come forward...”
“And it is a terrifying thing to do.”
“We don’t see the career opportunities women lose because of sexual harassment or the intense stress it causes a woman dealing with it when she comes to work each day.”
“I am thinking of those women this morning and hoping they are okay.”
“The days to come will not be easy.”NBC News announced Wednesday morning that Lauer, who had anchored the Today Show for more than two decades, had been fired following accusations of sexual misconduct.”


"To Allana Abramson Allana. Abramson @ time.com. "
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Before Kelly talked about her personal experience with Raul, she read the official statement on the Internet and showed the comments of former co hosts Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb, who replaced Raul on Wednesday."
"This time it did hit near home," Kelly said of Raul's shot
"I've known Matt for a long time. He has always been my friend. He was very friendly to me and supported me when I switched to NBC news. I saw the pain on my colleagues' faces, but when this happened, Kelly continued, what we didn't see was..."
“… The pain on the face of those women who pluck up the courage to stand up
"It's a terrible thing."
"We don't see the career opportunities that women lose because of sexual harassment, and we don't see the tremendous pressure that women bear because of sexual harassment at work every day."
"I was thinking about the women this morning. I hope they're OK."
"The days ahead will be hard." NBC announced on Wednesday morning that Raul, who has hosted "today" for more than 20 years, has been fired on charges of sexual misconduct



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Jennifer Aniston ‘doing OK’ after break-up from Justin Theroux...”
“Brad and Jen are kind of buried history anyway.”
“Despite rumours circulating, Jennifer’s reps have shot down any hope of a reunion, and have denied that Brad has been in touch.”
“And sources close to Brad have said the actor hasn’t been in touch with his former wife whatsoever, even to wish his commiserations, although he is ‘sad’ about Jen’s marriage breakdown.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt in 2004 (Picture: WireImage)‘Brad is of course sad to hear the news about Jen’s divorce.”
“He only wishes the best for her… However, Brad hasn’t reached out to Jen, and has no plans to do so at this point,’ the source reasoned to Us Weekly.”
“And Jen’s team denied rumours that Brad is being ‘a shoulder to cry on,’ calling them ‘another fabrication,’ so for now, rumours have been put to bed.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementRight?”
“They were an item between 2000 and 2005 but Brad has spoken out harshly about their relationship in the past; he once controversially called that time of his life ‘pathetic’ in an interview with Parade magazine.”
“MORE : Did a hug from Naomi Watts rock Justin Theroux and Jennifer Aniston’s marriage?”


"More: Jennifer Aniston is" OK "after breaking up with Justin Cyrus..."
"Either way, Brad and Jan are buried history."
"Despite the rumors, Jennifer's representatives gave up any hope of a reunion and denied Brad had been in touch."
"According to sources close to Brad, although he is sad about the breakdown of her marriage, he has not made any contact with his ex-wife or even expressed sympathy."
"In 2004, Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt (image source: WireImage)" Brad was certainly sad to hear about the divorce. "
"He just wanted her to go well However, Brad has not contacted Jane and has no plans to do so, "the source explained to us weekly
"Jennifer's team denied the rumor that Brad was a" crying shoulder "and said they were" another fabrication ", so at present, the rumor has been shelved."
"Advertising, right?"
"They were a project between 2000 and 2005, but Brad spoke harshly about their past relationship; in an interview with March magazine, he controversially called that period of his life" pathetic. "
More: has Naomi Watts' embrace shaken the marriage of Justin seru and Jennifer Aniston? "



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Ben Dumps Assets To Pay Off Jen Affleck desperate for cash to finally settle his divorce with Garner.”
“Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner are desperately trying to settle their divorce — and he’s selling assets to pay her off!”
“RadarOnline.com has learned the cash-starved star, 45, has put an 87-acre plantation near Savannah, Ga., on the block for $8.9 million.”
“The Gone Girl hunk reportedly paid $7.1 million for the spread on a private island after falling in love with the area while filming 1999’s Forces of Nature.”
““Ben is selling because of the divorce,” said a source close to the estranged A-listers.”
““He needs the cash, which will go to Jen as part of the settlement.”
“He’s compensating her for his infidelities and the damage caused in the marriage.”As Radar reported, Affleck just shelled out $19 million for a mansion located less than a mile from the home Garner shares with their three children, Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6.”
“While a source close to Affleck dismissed talk of a baby, insiders snitched there is added urgency to the move as Affleck is setting up a nest with Lindsay Shookus!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Ben went bankrupt in order to repay Jean Affleck's desperate cash and finally solve his divorce with Ghana."
"Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner are desperately trying to solve their divorce - and he's selling assets to pay off her debts!"
“ RadarOnline.com The 45 year old star bought an 87 acre plantation near Savannah, Georgia, for $8.9 million
"It's reported that the hero of the lost girl fell in love with a private island and paid $7.1 million for the 1999 film power of nature."
"It was because of the divorce that the house was sold," said a source close to the divorce's first-line star
"He needs cash, which will be given to Jane as part of the settlement."
According to radar, Affleck has just bought a $19 million mansion less than a mile away from the house that Ghana shared with their three children, 12-year-old violet, 9-year-old Serafina and 6-year-old Samuel
"Although a source close to Affleck denied the baby, insiders said that Affleck is building a nest with Lindsay shookus, which is more urgent!"



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We continue to look down every possible avenue on how we can improve our city."”
“We're moving forward on our mission to establish a method to hold out-of-state apartment owners accountable for safe, secure and peaceful places to live.”
“Brothers, James Stanford Poore, 32, and Cedric Dwayne Poore, 39, were arrested and booked on four complaints each of first degree murder, Chief Chuck Jordan said.”
“On Monday, January 7, 2013, twin sisters Rebeika Powell and Kayetie Powell-Melchor, 23; Misty Nunley, 33, and Julie Jackson, 55 were found shot in the head, with their hands tied behind their backs inside a south Tulsa apartment, police say.”
“A 3-year-old boy was also found inside the apartment, unharmed.”
“1/7/2013: Related Story: Four Women Found Shot To Death In Tulsa Apartment, 3-Year-Old Unharmed InsideChief Jordan said the murders were not gang-related.”
“According to arrest reports, witnesses told investigators that the brothers left an apartment in the same building at Fairmont Terrace Apartments, near 61st and Peoria, saying they were going to pull a "lick" at the victims' apartment.”
“Witnesses told police the brothers returned about 20 minutes later with a bag full of drugs, cash, and jewelry.”
“According to the report, James Poore told the witnesses that he shot one of the victims because she could identify him and that Cedric shot the other three.”
“The witnesses told investigators the brothers split the money and that Cedric Poore took the jewelry to pawn.”


"We continue to look for possible ways to improve our city."
"We are advancing our mission to create a way for apartment owners outside the state to be responsible for safe, secure, and peaceful places to live."
Chief executive chuck Jordan said James Stanford Poole, 32, and Cedric Dwayne Poole, 39, were arrested and registered for first-degree murder
On Monday, January 7, 2013, the twin sisters rebeika Powell and kayetie Powell melcho, 23, and misty Nunley and Julie Jackson, 55, were found shot in the head with their hands tied inside their South Tulsa apartment, police said
"A 3-year-old boy was also found in the apartment, safe and sound."
"January 7, 2013: four women were found shot dead in Tulsa's apartment, and inside chief Jordan, 3, who was unhurt, said the murder had nothing to do with gangs."
"According to the arrest report, witnesses told investigators that the brothers left their apartment on 61st street and the same building as Fairmont terrace apartment near Peoria, saying they wanted to" lick "the victim's apartment."
Witnesses told police that about 20 minutes later, the brothers returned with bags full of drugs, cash and jewelry
"According to reports, James Poole told witnesses that he shot and killed one victim because she could recognize him, and Cedric shot and killed three others."
"Witnesses told investigators that Cedric Poole pawned the jewelry when the two brothers paid for it."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But truly it’s all love only, I have no time to hate or judge anybody!” It looks like he’s taking his relationship with Jhene very seriously, and we couldn’t be happier!”
““So, Ariana believes that Sean would be at least flirting with Nicole, if not more, while still in a relationship with Jhene because that is what he did with her too.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on her reaction!”
“Big Sean, 29, made headlines on March 12 after rumors surfaced alleging he cheated on Jhene Aiko, 29, with Nicole Scherzinger, 39.”
“And although the couple has denied the affair, Sean’s ex-girlfriend Ariana Grande is not too convinced.”
““Ariana is not surprised at all that Sean may have been cheating on Jhene with Nicole.”
“Ariana found Sean selfish, narcissistic and self-absorbed while they were dating.”
“Ariana felt like Sean needed a lot of attention from not just her, but from other women too,” a source close to Ariana tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Ouch!”
“Ariana believes the rumors about Sean and Nicole, which makes Ariana feel bad for both Sean and Jhene because Sean has not changed.”


"But in fact, it's all love. I don't have time to hate or judge anyone! "It seems that he takes his relationship with Jayne very seriously. We can't be happier!"
"So Ariana thinks Sean will at least flirt with Nicole, if not more, and keep a relationship with Jayne, because he does the same thing to her."
"We have an exclusive report on her reaction!"
"Sean, 29, made headlines on March 12 after rumors that he and Nicole Scherzinger, 39, had cheated 29 year old Jayne Aiko."
"Although the couple denied the relationship, Shawn's ex girlfriend Ariana grand didn't believe it very much."
"Ariana is not surprised that Sean and Nicole may be unfaithful to Jayne."
"Ariana discovered that Sean was selfish, narcissistic, and focused on dating."
"Ariana thinks Sean needs not only her attention, but also other women's attention," a source close to Ariana told reporters
"Ouch!"
"Ariana believes in the rumors about Sean and Nicole, which makes Ariana feel sorry for Sean and Jayne because Sean has not changed."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Find NJ.com on Facebook.”
“Follow him on Twitter @JoeGiglioSports.”
“With an impending marriage on the horizon, Lopez reportedly has started to have cold feet about marrying the former Yankees star, per TerezOwens.com.”
“Jennifer Lopez has put her plans to wed Alex Rodriguez on hold, an insider exclusively tells Life & Style.”
“According to the source, the pop superstar, 47, is getting cold feet.”
“"Jennifer keeps telling Alex that she's 'just not there yet,'" says the insider.”
“According to the report, Rodriguez has been pushing for a date.”
“"A-Rod has been begging J.Lo to set a wedding date.”
“She loves him, but she's told him that until she says otherwise, the wedding is on hold."”
“The two celebrities have been talked about as one of the biggest power couples over the past year.”


"Found NJ.com On Facebook. "
"In Twitter@joegliosports He's on the radar. "
"With the upcoming marriage, it is reported that Lopez has begun to be indifferent to marrying former Yankee star Pearl TerezOwens.com Website. "
"Jennifer Lopez has shelved her plans to marry Alex Rodriguez," an insider told life and fashion exclusively
"According to the source, the 47 year old pop star is getting cold."
"Jennifer keeps telling Alex that she's just not there yet," the person said
"According to the report, Rodriguez has been fighting for a date."
"A-Rod has been asking J.Lo to set a date for his marriage."
"She loved him, but she told him that unless she said something else, the wedding would be suspended."
"In the past year, the two celebrities have been regarded as one of the most powerful couples."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“@carolinephinney...”
“...pic.twitter.com/AzTRS0BGrL — Rebeca Castillo (@iBeLoNg2JeSuSN1) November 11, 2017For now the rest of us will just have to stick to the 10 commandments of being a Belieber, because thou shalt NEVER say NEVER.”
“Wondering why Selena Gomez is carrying a bible with her to hot yoga.. Maybe Justin Bieber can clear this up?”
“...pic twitter com l444ba21w8 M A R I E marieElizabethh November 1 2017 Bieber s fans are currently convinced the 23 year old pop star has been abiding by a Love Bible he wrote while rekindling his romance with ex Selena Gomez and reports even claim the Sorry singer has...”
“10 Commandments for their revived relationship why don t we ever talk about justin Bieber s most iconic lyric im surprised you didn t hear this in the bible referring to his own song caroline carolineghebert November 6 2017 The relationship just might last this time around because he made...”
“...himself a list of 10 commandments for wooing his on and off girlfriend an insider is quoted as saying adding that Bieber has been following the commandments religiously...”
“He's also reportedly sworn off partying and is meditating daily to stay focused.”
“Nah.”
“Justin Bieber good now!!”
“He in church and going to bible study on the reg, quoting scriptures and everything.”


"@ Caroline fini..."
“... pic.twitter.com/AzTRS0BGrL -Rebecca Castillo (@ ibelong2jesus N1) November 11, 2017, because now the rest of us just need to stick to the ten commandments of being a believer, because you should never say "never"
"I wonder why Selena Gomez took the Bible to hot yoga.".. Maybe Justin Bieber can clarify this? "
“… Bieber's fans are now convinced that the 23-year-old pop star abides by his love Bible when rekindling his romance with former Serena Gomez, and it is even reported that the regretful singer has been... "
"The 10 commandments of their relationship restoration why don't we talk about Justin Bieber's most representative lyrics? I'm surprised you didn't hear this song in the Bible, referring to his own song, Caroline Caroline gablet November 6, 2017. This relationship may last for this period of time, because he did..."
“…… He himself made a list of the Ten Commandments for courting his intermittent girlfriend. A person familiar with the matter said that Bieber has been devoutly abiding by these commandments.... "
"He also vowed, according to reports, not to go to parties and meditate every day to stay focused."
"No
"Justin Bieber is fine now!"
He studied the Bible in church, quoted the Bible and other things



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Weigh in with your thoughts in the comments below.”
“Friends say hypocritical Stiller also “tried to control everything she did, even micromanaging her diet.”Do you think Christine is better without Ben and his jealousy?”
“Taylor, 45, “grew tired of Ben’s drama and accusations, especially when he’d have two stunning blond ‘chefs’ on his own movie sets,” claimed a source.”
““Whenever Christine was out of town on a job, which wasn’t very often, Ben would inevitably recruit someone on set to spy on her!” said a source close to the actors.”
“As Radar reported, the pair looked extremely unhappy months before their marriage finally ended.”
“The couple, who starred in multiple films together, including Zoolander, was known for their tumultuous relationship.”
““His worst nightmare was that she’d leave him one day for a taller, hotter man.”After 17 years of marriage and two kids – Ella, 15, and son Quinlin, 12 – Stiller and Taylor finally called it quits.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Add your thoughts to the comments below."
Friends said the hypocritical Stiller also "tried to control what he did, even his diet." Do you think Christina would be better off without Ben and his jealousy? "
"Taylor, 45," tired of Ben's drama and accusations, especially when he had two Amazing Blonde 'chefs' in his own film collection, "a source claimed
"When Christine goes out to work, Ben inevitably recruits people to watch her on the set, which doesn't happen very often! "A source close to the actor said
According to radar, the couple looked very unhappy in the months before their marriage ended
"The couple have starred in many films together, including Zoolander, and their relationship is known for being rowdy."
"His worst nightmare is that one day she will leave him to find a taller, sexier man." After 17 years of marriage and having two children, Ella, 15, and Kunlin, 12, Stiller and Taylor finally broke up



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, would you donate a kidney to your BFF if they needed it?”
“If these two can make it through something as serious as an organ transplant ordeal, there’s nothing that can break their union.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how he was totally in the dark about her operation.”
“If Jelena fans were still holding out hope that there was still a connection between Selena Gomez, 25, and Justin Bieber, 23, the fact that he didn’t know she underwent a top-secret kidney transplant should be proof enough that these two don’t stay in contact.”
“The “Hands To Myself” singer shocked the world when she revealed on Sept. 14 that her best friend Francia Raisa, 29, donated one of her kidneys to Selena after her Lupus condition required the operation earlier this summer.”
“Justin found out just like the rest of her fans via her Instagram post about it because they just don’t talk anymore.”
““He is hearing about this just as everyone is hearing about it.”
“He’s he is happy that she is okay, but he has no interest in contacting her to see how she is doing.”
“This will not be a catalyst for them to talk again.”
“He is generally happy she is okay, but that is all he wants to deal with right now when it comes to her,” a source close to the Biebs tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Holly bug, if your boyfriend needs a kidney, will you donate it to him?"
"If these two people can survive the severe test of organ transplantation, nothing can break their union."
"We have exclusive details of what he doesn't know about her operation."
"If Jenna's fans are still hopeful that there is still a connection between 25-year-old Serena Gomez and 23-year-old Justin Bieber, then he doesn't know that the fact that she received a top secret kidney transplant should be enough to prove that they haven't kept in touch."
The singer said on September 14 that her best friend, Francia Raisa, 29, shocked the world by donating one of her kidneys to Selena after surgery for lupus earlier this summer
"Justin, like other fans, discovered this through instagram posts because they don't talk anymore."
"He heard it like everyone heard it."
"He's glad she's OK, but he's not interested in contacting her to see how she's doing."
"It won't be a catalyst for them to talk again."
"He's usually happy that she's OK, but that's all he wants to deal with right now," a source close to Biebs told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a cover for ICON Magazine and a fashion shoot in Bangkok to promote his HBO show The Leftovers...”
“He is still friendly with Justin and happy to work with him again he just wants to keep things professional having been a part of a number of his campaigns The hairdresser has worked with the star on several high profile projects including a Terry Richardson s shoot New York...”
“Vuitton while Justin was at the Ritz with a friend but they did come in contact during the stay it was inevitable the insider said...”
“Sources say he later met with Justin in Paris this month while working with actress after which the stars sat front row together at the Louis Vuitton show for Fashion Week along with actress Chris was with Michelle at the Hotel Le Bristol she is also a face of Louis...”
“Michelle Williams, after which the stars sat front row together at the Louis Vuitton show for Fashion Week, along with actress Emma Stone.”
“He captioned one: "#series8 #louisvuitton @nicolasghesquiere @justintheroux," along with a love heart emoji.”
“McMillan shared a series of photographs of the actor, who is the face of Louis Vuitton, posing in an open black leather shirt on Instagram - a few months after their split at the end of January, before their official announcement.”
“It’s a real kick in the teeth for Jen, who’s always been pretty territorial with Chris and sees him as a trusted member of her social circle,” spilled the snitch to Radar exclusively.”
““Jennifer doesn’t want to tell him who he can and can’t work with, but he’s seeing plenty of Justin now he’s spending most of his time in New York.”
““He’s kind of stuck in the middle and tries not to talk to Justin about Jennifer, he doesn’t want to make things more awkward than they already are.”


“… He made cover for icon magazine, took fashion photos in Bangkok, and promoted his HBO program "leftover women".... "
"He's still very friendly with Justin and happy to work with him again. He just wants to keep things professional. He's been involved in a lot of activities. The hairdresser and the star have worked on several eye-catching projects, including a shoot by Terry Richardson in New York..."
"When Justin and a friend were at the Ritz Hotel, Vuitton came, but they did contact each other during their stay, which is inevitable," the person familiar with the matter said
"It is reported that he met Justin in Paris this month, when he was working with an actress, and then the two stars were sitting in the front row of the show at Louis vuitton fashion week, and the actresses Chris and Michelle were in the Bristol Hotel, and she was also a face of Louis...."
Michelle Williams, then stars and actress Emma stone sit in the front row of louis vuitton fashion week
He added a title to one: "series 8, Louis Vuitton, Nicholas gasquell, Justin seru," and a love emoticon
"McMillan shared a series of photos of the actor on instagram, who is the spokesman of Louis Vuitton, posing in an open black leather suit - months after they broke up at the end of January, before they officially announced their break-up."
"It's really a big blow for Jane. She's always had a sense of territory for Chris and thinks he's a trustworthy member of her social circle," the informant told radar
"Jennifer doesn't want to tell him who he can work with or who he can't, but he has a lot to do with Justin now and he's in New York most of the time."
"He's a bit in the middle, trying not to talk about Jennifer with Justin, he doesn't want things to be more embarrassing than they are now."



**Something goes wrong**
““It almost seemed different this time because he was way more affectionate and public with her than he normally is, but his friends knew it wouldn’t last.””
““Leo thought Nina was a super cool girl,” said the source.”
“Following their split, a source close to the actor told PEOPLE that he just wasn’t ready to take the next step.”
“Agdal and DiCaprio, who made his first public outing since the breakup at the Cannes Film Festival in May, had dated for a year after first being spotted at a New York City club in May 2016.”
“Reps for Agdal and Brinkley Cook did not comment.”
““It’s nothing serious.”Image zoom Credit: TheImageDirectAccording to Page Six, which first reported the news, the duo were seen “smooching all over Montauk,” including Surf Lodge.”
““It’s nothing but a little fling,” sources tell PEOPLE.”
“And on Sunday, Agdal was in Montauk with Jack and his sister, Sailor Brinkley Cook, to celebrate Sailor’s 19th birthday with their friends at The Surf Lodge ahead of the Fourth of July holiday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Thursday, the pair were photographed spending a casual day together.”


"This time it looks almost different because he is more intimate and open to her than usual, but his friends know it won't last."
"Leo thinks Nina is a super cool girl," the source said
"After they broke up, a source close to the actor told people that he was just not ready to take the next step."
"Agdal and DiCaprio went on their first public outing since their breakup at Cannes Film Festival in May, and they dated for a year after they were first discovered at a New York City Club in May 2016."
"Representatives of Agdal and Brinkley cook did not comment."
"It's no big deal." Photo zooming credit: according to the photo director's first report on page 6 of the news, the two were seen "kissing all over Montauk", including "surfing cabin"
"It's just a little indulgence," the source told people
On Sunday, Agdal and Jack, along with his sister sailor Brinkley cook, celebrate sailor's 19th birthday with their friends in the surf cabin before the July 4 holiday in Montauk
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Thursday, they were photographed together for a day of leisure."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now, they are in a better place and amicably co-parenting their six children, Maddox, 15, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 10, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 8.”
“However, the pair later decided to seal their court docs to settle their issues out of the public eye.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt have allegedly been set up by Clooney.”
“Inside their reported late-night hangouts!”
“Question, is it the early 2000s, because a new report claims the gang is back together again — Jennifer Aniston, 49, Brad Pitt, 54, and George Clooney, 56.”
“Jen and Brad “have been secretly getting together for late-night hookups, and it’s all because of George [Clooney],” Star magazine reports.”
““George was the first person to call him when his marriage to Angie imploded,” a source tells the mag.”
““After Jen and Justin [Theroux, 46] announced their split, he encouraged Brad to reach out and give their relationship another chance.” Jen and Brad were married from 2000-2005.”
“The insider goes on to claim that George has been pressing Brad to reunite with his ex ever since the news broke that she and Theroux had split.”
“George allegedly first facilitated a meeting between the exes on March 3, when he attended a pre-Oscar party with Brad in Beverly Hills.”


"Now, they are in a better place, raising their six children together in a friendly way: 15-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 10-year-old Shiloh and 8-year-old twins Knox and Vivian."
"However, they later decided to seal the court documents and solve the problem out of public view."
"Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt are said to have been framed by Clooney."
"In the late night party they reported!"
"The question is, at the beginning of the 21st century, because a new report says this group is back together - Jennifer Aniston, 49, Brad Pitt, 54, and George Clooney, 56."
According to star magazine, "Jan and Brad" have been gathering secretly to chat up late at night, all because of George (Clooney)
"When George and Angie's marriage broke up, he was the first to call him," a source told the magazine
"After Jan and Justin (seru, 46) announced their breakup, he encouraged Brad to help and give them another chance to fall in love." Jan and Brad got married from 2000 to 2005
"The insider also claimed that since the news of Brad's breakup with Cyrus came out, George has been urging Brad to get back together with his predecessor."
George is said to have facilitated the first meeting of his two ex girlfriends on March 3 when they attended a pre Oscar Party at Beverly Hills



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“After all, it would be another instance of him obsessing over his ex and it might just be what finally sends Sofia out the door and out of his life – for good.”
“Unfortunately for Scott, all is good between Kourt and her boy.”
“We’ve EXCLUSIVELY heard that Scott’s endless fixation on his ex, Kourtney Kardashian, is pushing Sofia to the brink!”
“Time might be running out on Sofia Richie, 19, and Scott Disick’s relationship, because the daughter of Lionel Richie is running out of patience for her 34-year-old boyfriend.”
“Specifically, as a source EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com, Sofia is fed up with how Scott can’t seem to let go of Kourtney Kardashian, 38.”
““Sofia is annoyed with Scott’s obsession with his ex Kourtney,” the source says.”
“She s tired of listening to Scott complain about Kourtney and Sofia really doesn t like to hear Scott whine about Younes Bendjima taking his place For Sofia the insider tells HollywoodLife com it s a real turn off when Scott stalks Kourtney online and obsesses about her there is...”
“...only so much more Sofia can take With Scott and Sofia bickering a lot as of late maybe it s time for him to put the phone down and focus on his girl...”
“Scott certainly had a lot to obsess over as of late.”
“For a hot minute, it looked as if Kourt and Younes, 24, had broken up.”


"After all, this will be another example of his obsession with his ex girlfriend, which may be the reason why Sophia finally got out of the house and out of life - forever."
"Unfortunately for Scott, everything is fine between Kurt and her son."
"We've only heard that Scott's endless obsession with his ex girlfriend, Kourtney Kardashian, is pushing Sophia to the brink!"
"Time may be running out for the relationship between 19-year-old Sophia Ritchie and Scott Disick, because Lionel Ritchie's daughter is impatient with her 34 year old boyfriend."
"To be specific, as one source put it, Sofia is tired of Scott and seems unable to let go of Courtney Kardashian, 38."
"Sophia was annoyed by Scott's obsession with the former Courtney," the source said
"She's tired of hearing Scott complain about Courtney. Sophia really doesn't like to hear Scott complain about yones benjima's position in place of Sophia. Insiders tell Hollywood life that when Scott follows Courtney online and is infatuated with her, it's really a nuisance..."
“…… Sophia can only endure the quarrel between Scott and Sophia. Maybe it's time for him to put down the phone and focus on his girl... "
"Scott really has a lot to worry about these days."
"For a moment, 24-year-old Kurt and younes seem to have broken up."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...transition and forced him into religious conversion therapy and attempted to get him to attend church in an effort to save their marriage...”
“What did I just do to myself Also Read Caitlyn Jenner Transparent Casting Sparks Fan Riot on Twitter In his book the 1 New York Times best selling author and award winning journalist reveals that Jenner s ex wife Kris Jenner was very aware of her husband s desire to...”
“A lengthy Vanity Fair story recalls a panic attack that she experienced after undergoing facial-feminization surgery, during which she wondered, “What did I just do?”
“Jenner has hinted at trepidation over the transition in the past.”
“Based on his research, Halperin believes that Jenner will de-transition in the next couple of years, telling the public how difficult the transition was, but noting that she was happy to help raise awareness about transgender right.”
“Also Read: Stop Asking Caitlyn Jenner to Be 'Transgender Bernie Sanders,' LGBT Activist Says“She’s still into women and wants to meet the right one,” Halperin recalled one friend saying.”
“My heart goes out to her and I know her true friends will be there to support her on whatever path she chooses.”According to Halperin, multiple sources close to the Kardashian family told him that Jenner might revert back because she retains her interest in females.”
“It has been much harder than she anticipated.”
“I don’t think it would surprise anybody in her inner circle.”
““She’s thrilled she has raised awareness about how transgender people have long been discriminated against but I think there’s a chance she’ll de-transition in the next couple years.”


“… Transition and forced him to receive religious conversion treatment, and tried to let him go to church to save their marriage... "
"I just did something to myself and read that Caitlin Jenner's book" New York Times best seller, first author and award winning reporter "caused a fan riot on twitter. He revealed that Jenner's ex-wife Chris Jenner was very clear about her husband's wishes..."
A long story in Vanity Fair recalls a panic she experienced after undergoing facial feminization surgery, during which she wanted to know, "what did I just do?"
"Jenner has hinted at uneasiness about the transition in the past."
"According to his research, Halperin thinks Jenner will cancel the transition in the next few years and tell the public how difficult it is, but she points out that she is happy to help raise awareness of transgender rights."
"Read at the same time: don't ask Caitlin Jenner to be" Bernie Sanders the transgender, "says LGBT activist." she still likes women and wants to meet the right people, "Halperin recalls a friend
"I sympathize with her and know that her true friends will support her on any path she chooses." According to Halperin, a number of sources close to the Kardashian family told him that Jenna might return because of her interest in women
"It's more difficult than she expected."
"I don't think that would surprise anyone in her circle."
"She's happy that she's raised awareness that transgender people have been discriminated against for a long time, but I think it's possible that she won't transform in the next few years."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:”
“He does, however, maintain a picture of Stefani as his profile photo.”
“Music’s odd couple, Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton — aka the rocker and the country boy — have never been free of gossip speculating about their relationship.”
“Apparently, the latest news is that the two are through.”
“In Touch Weekly reports that Shelton actually unceremoniously dumped Stefani in February before embarking on a tour.”
“But wait — if that’s the case, then why is Stefani appearing with him on stage?”
“And not just appearing … they’re appearing pretty cuddly.”
“The singer posted an Instagram shot on Mar.”
“14 of the two embracing on what appears to be the most recent date of his “Country Music Freaks” trek.”
“@blakeshelton #countrymusicfreakstour gx A post shared by Gwen Stefani (@gwenstefani) on Mar 14, 2018 at 3:28pm PDTThis isn’t the first such picture she has shared since February.”


"Read more about Yahoo Entertainment:
"However, he did keep a photo of Stefani as his profile photo."
"Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon - also known as rock and roll and country boys - have never been free of gossip and speculation about their relationship."
"Obviously, the latest news is that they have broken up."
"In touch weekly reports that Sheldon actually dumped Stefani before starting his tour in February."
"But wait - if so, why is Stephanie on stage with him?"
"And it's not just that They look lovely. "
"The singer posted an instagram photo on March 1."
14 of the two hugged on his latest date, the country music freak's trek
"@ blakeshelton#countrymusicfreaktour GX Gwen Stefani (@ gwenstefani) shared a post at 3:28 pm on March 14, 2018. This is not the first time she has shared such a photo since February."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“List Golden Globes 2017 By The Numbers The Highest Paid Golden Globes Nominees...”
“...on the Golden Globes La La Land Breaks Record For Most Golden Globe Wins Ever Donald Glover Wins Big For Atlanta At The Golden Globes Ryan Gosling Wins Golden Globe For La La Land Performance Emma Stone Of La La Land Wins Golden Globe Golden Globes Nominees 2017 The Full...”
“At Sunday night's 74th annual Golden Globe Awards, Hollywood's finest gathered to toast the best in TV and film.”
“Hosted by The Tonight Show's Jimmy Fallon at the Beverly Hilton in Los Angeles, the star-studded event proved to be full of surprises.”
“Sweeping the movie awards was the critically-acclaimed musical La La Land, which broke the record for most wins by any one film.”
“It won all seven of the categories it was nominated in, including a Best Actor statuette for Ryan Gosling, Best Actress for Emma Stone and Best Director for its auteur Damian Chazelle.”
“"There was something about these characters and what they're going through that feels very human and natural even in their fantastic circumstances," said Stone backstage, speaking of the Lionsgate movie-musical.”
“"Struggling and falling in love is something I think everybody can relate to in some way."”
“Heavier fare also won out: the coming-of-age story Moonlight took home Best Picture, one of its six categories, while the August Wilson play adaptation Fences earned a nod for its female lead.”
“"It's not every day Hollywood thinks of translating a play to screen," said Best Supporting Actress winner Viola Davis of the movie, which grossed $40.7 million at the box office.”


"List 2017 Golden Globes by number of nominees with the highest income..."
“… At the Golden Globes, Los Angeles broke the record for the largest number of Golden Globes ever won. Donald Glover won the Golden Globe for Atlanta. Ryan Gosling won the Golden Globe for his performance in Los Angeles at the golden globe. Emma stone of Los Angeles won all the nominations for the 2017 Golden Globe Awards... "
At the 74th Annual Golden Globe Awards ceremony on Sunday night, Hollywood's elites gathered to drink to the elites of television and film
"Hosted by tonight's show Jimmy Fallon at the Beverly Hilton Hotel in Los Angeles, this starry event is full of surprises."
"Sweeping the film awards is the widely acclaimed musical" Laran ", breaking the record of winning the most awards for any film."
The film received all seven nominations, including Ryan Gosling's best statuette, Emma stone's best actress and director Damian chazel's best director
Speaking of the Lion Gate musical, Stone said backstage: "these characters and what they are going through, even in their wonderful environment, make people feel very human and natural."
"Struggling and falling in love are things that I think everyone can relate to in a way."
"The heavier ticket price also won: the growth story" Moonlight "won the best picture in one of the six categories, while the adaptation of" fences "by August Wilson won the nomination for the heroine."
"Hollywood doesn't want to put a play on the screen every day," said Viola Davis, winner of the film's best supporting actress, which grossed $40.7 million



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"She won't fall in love anytime soon," the source revealed.”
“A source tells ET that the 49-year-old actress has started "casually dating," five months after announcing her split from husband Justin Theroux.”
“After Aniston and Theroux ended things, the Friends star "really relied on her friends to get her through the tough times," according to the source.”
“"During that time, she was able to heal and be comfortable with dating again."”
“"Jennifer has never felt she needed a man, but she loves love," the source continued.”
“"Jennifer is casually dating, but right now nothing serious.”
“She is just having fun, seeing where things go."”
“Jennifer Aniston Spotted in NYC for First Time Since Justin Theroux Split This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"She won't fall in love soon," the source said
A source told et that the 49 year old actress started "casual dating" five months after she announced her break-up with her husband, Justin Cyrus
After Aniston and Cyrus split up, friends star "really relied on her friends to pull her through," according to sources
"During that time, she was able to recover and it was comfortable to date again."
"Jennifer never felt that she needed a man, but she loved him," the source continued
"Jennifer's on a casual date, but it's nothing serious right now."
"She's just playing to see what's going on."
"For the first time since Justin Cyrus broke up, Jennifer Aniston found this video unavailable in New York because we couldn't load the sponsor's information."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She makes all of her own decisions...No matter how hard you try, it falls on deaf ears."”
“No one controls her.”
“There is no fall person here.”
“Teefey continued, "Her team are amazing people.”
“"I had a long talk with her about not talking with him and it didn't click."”
“"Sorry no one can make Selena do anything she doesn't want to," she wrote.”
“Teefey also wrote a long post on Facebook earlier this week, revealing she told her daughter not to work with Woody Allen on the upcoming film A Rainy Day in New York.”
“Selena is an adult and can make her own choices."”
“I do not control her the way it has been portrayed.”
“"She is 25 years old and knows what is at stake with her health.”


"She makes her own decisions No matter how hard you try, you will be ignored. "
"No one controls her."
"There's no one down here."
Tiffany went on, "her team is amazing."
"I talked to her for a long time, saying that I didn't speak to him, and I didn't get along with him."
"Sorry, no one can make Selena do anything she doesn't want to do," she wrote
"Tiffany also wrote a long article on Facebook earlier this week, revealing that she told her daughter not to work with Woody Allen on the upcoming film" rainy days in New York. "
"Selena is an adult and can make her own choice."
"I can't control her as people portray her."
"She's 25 years old and knows what matters to her health."



**Something goes wrong**
“Fans were quick to comment on the social media drama'I'm going to be really sad': Everyone had an opinion on their fave reality star...”
“'Don't crush my dreams!'”
“So when the mother-of-three briefly shut down her Instagram account on Monday, the sudden drama was completely out of character.”
“The 38-year-old reality star only took the move after first unfollowing her toy boy boyfriend Younes Bendjima, 24, on Saturday.”
“For his part model Younes turned his account private.”
“Kourtney's sisters and motherKris Jenner do not follow Younes.”
“Trouble in paradise?”
“Kourtney Kardashian 38 briefly deleted her Instagram after unfollowing toy boy Younes Bendjima 24 on social media the two are seen in Paris in September Support As fans picked up on the changes Kim posted this picture with her sister The changes suggested there might be trouble in paradise for...”
“...the May to December couple who were first linked in 2016”
“Twitter certainly thought so, with fans clamoring to suggest the pair had broken up.”


"Fans were quick to comment on the social media drama" I'll be sad ": everyone has a view on their favorite reality TV star..."
"Don't shatter my dream!"
"So when the mother of three briefly shut down her instagram account on Monday, the sudden farce was totally unreasonable."
The 38 year old reality star made the move after breaking up with his 24-year-old toy boyfriend, yons benjima, for the first time on Saturday
"For him, younes turned his account into a private account."
"Courtney's sister and mother, Chris Jenner, didn't like yones."
"Trouble in heaven?"
"Kourtney Kardashian 38 briefly deleted her instagram after she released" toy boy younes bendjima 24 "on social media. In September, they were seen in Paris, and fans noticed the changes in Kim's and her sister's photo, which suggested that there might be trouble in heaven... "
“…… May to December couple first contacted in 2016
"Of course twitter thinks so, and fans clamour that they broke up."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Harry's close friend Tom Inskip and Prince William are believed to be in charge of planning the stag party.”
“The £6,000-a-night members' club holds fond memories for Meghan as she has previously stayed there with Millie Mackintosh, as well as visiting twice with fiance Harry during their whirlwind romance.”
“The couple are said to be planning a 'private dinner followed by games' in May, as well as having a rehearsal dinner prior to the big day at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle.”
“A source said that Meghan, 36, 'wants to wait until her friends are in the UK before having her hen party.'”
“This would mean that close friends including Jessica Mulroney, who is based in Toronto, will be able to attend.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan are believe to be planning a joint stag and hen do just days before their wedding in MaySpeaking to OK!”
“...magazine, the source said: 'Meghan wants to wait until her friends are in the UK for the wedding before having her hen party.”
“She wants a joint party with Harry and his friends.”
“'It won't be anything too wild, they're planning a private dinner followed by games'.”
“It was previously reported that Meghan had enjoyed a low-key hen-do at Soho Farmhouse with close pals.”


"Harry's close friends Tom Inskip and Prince William are believed to be responsible for the Bucks Party."
"The 6000 a night club has left a good memory for Megan, who had previously lived there with Millie McIntosh and visited her fiance Harry twice in their whirlwind relationship."
"It is said that the couple plan to have a 'private dinner, then a game' in May, and a pre day rehearsal dinner at St George's chapel in Windsor Castle."
"Megan, 36, wants to wait for her friends to arrive in the UK before her hen party," a source said
"It means that close friends, including Toronto based Jessica murroney, will be able to participate."
Prince Harry and Megan are believed to be planning to marry a hen a few days before their wedding in May
“… Magazine, the source said: 'Megan wants to wait until her friends get married in the UK before her hen party.'
"She wants to have a party with Harry and his friends."
"It won't be too crazy. They're planning a private dinner and then a game."
"It has been reported that Megan and his close friends had been enjoying a low-key hen meal in the SOHO farmhouse."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'s other children, Jason, 47, from his marriage to Marguerite, and Sydney, 31, from his marriage to Nicole, have managed to stay out of the spotlight so far.”
“Splash O.J.”
“According to Splash, the realtor took off in his pickup truck when he was questioned about his father's release.”
“The 29-year-old was photographed working in St. Petersburg, Florida.”
“Meanwhile, his son Justin, from his marriage to Nicole Brown Simpson, seems to be keeping his distance.”
“Backgrid Arnelle was spotted shopping at a local TJ Maxx, Stein Mart and Burlington Coat Factory before picking up groceries at Trader Joe's.”
“The 48-year-old also spoke out on his behalf at his parole hearing in July.”
“It seems his eldest daughter Arnelle, from his first marriage to Marguerite Whitley, is there to support him.”
“...might try to return to Florida, the AP says Simpson plans to stay in the Las Vegas area for the foreseeable future.”
“Despite reports O.J.”


Jason, 47, who married Margaret, and Sidney, 31, who married Nicole, have not been the focus of attention so far
"O.J."
"According to splash, when he was asked about his father's release, the real estate agent left in his pickup truck."
"The 29 year old man was photographed working in St. Petersburg, Florida."
"Meanwhile, his son Justin, from his marriage to Nicole Brown Simpson, seems to be keeping a distance."
"Arnel was found shopping at a local TJ Maxx, Stein Martin and Burlington overcoat factory, and then buying groceries at Trader Joe's."
"The 48 year old also spoke on his behalf at the parole hearing in July this year."
"From his first marriage to Margaret Whitley, his eldest daughter, Arnel, seemed to be there to support him."
“…… May try to return to Florida, the associated press said Simpson plans to stay in the Las Vegas area for the foreseeable future
"Despite reports that O.J



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(To see more of their cute moments from throughout the years, click here).”
“That August, the couple tied the knot with an intimate ceremony in their L.A. home.”
“The happy couple later showed off their engagement bling on the Daytime Emmys red carpet that same year.”
“...her talk show DeGeneres announced her plans to wed de Rossi the reveal followed the news that the California Supreme Court had struck down a law banning same sex marriage...”
“I felt weak at the knees and I was overwhelmed with how I felt but then it took me about 10 months to get the courage up to actually do anything about it FROM PEN Jada Pinkett Smith Talks Celebrating 20 Years with Will Smith In a 2008 episode of...”
“...t believe it but she turned around and it was like an arrow was shot through my heart...”
“We did talk a little bit and then over those three years we saw each other at parties or at various things but the one time that was the most significant was during a photoshoot actually She continued I just walked over to say hello to her and I couldn...”
““We actually met socially and I just felt that immediate draw,” she said.”
““Happy anniversary @theellenshow and @portiaderossi.”During an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled about falling for DeGeneres.”
“It’s still one of the most fun things I’ve ever done,” Radin wrote.”


"To learn more about their lovely moments over the years, click here."
"That August, the couple had a close wedding at their home in Los Angeles."
"The happy couple later displayed their engagement ring on the red carpet of the Emmy Awards in the daytime of the same year."
“…… Her talk show "DeGeneres" announced her plans to marry De Rossi. After the news that the Supreme Court of California has repealed the law against same-sex marriage was announced.... "
"My knees felt weak, and I was overwhelmed by my own feelings, but it took me about 10 months to get up the nerve and find a real solution from the 2008 episode of" penjada pinkert Smith celebrating 20 years with Will Smith. "
"I can't believe it, but she turned around like an arrow through my heart..."
"We did talk a little bit, and then in those three years, we saw each other at parties or all kinds of things, but the most important one was when taking pictures. In fact, she continued, I just went over to say hello to her, I can't..."
"We actually met on social occasions, and I just felt the direct attraction," she said
"Happy Anniversary @ theEllenShow and @ portiaderossi." In an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled falling in love with DeGeneres
"It's still one of the most interesting things I've ever done," Latin wrote



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Timberlake is set to perform at the Super Bowl in Minneapolis, MN on February 4, 2018 as the Philadelphia Eagles take on the New England Patriots.”
“Then, appearing to realize that Timberlake has had his share of controversial moments, Fatone added, "He is in a sense, but not in a sense to do it deliberately."”
“He's not controversial like that."”
“While Fatone couldn't confirm or deny a Jackson appearance, he did say, "He's not that kind of person.”
“TMZ's cameraperson also asked if Fatone thought Timberlake would bring Janet Jackson out during his performance as a nod to their controversial wardrobe malfunction incident at Super Bowl XXXVIII.”
“*NSYNC's members most recently regrouped for a one-off performance at the 2013 MTV Video Music Awards.”
“Shit, he's doing his thing."”
“He pointed out, "There's nothing wrong with that.”
“The former *NSYNC singer didn't appear upset about the fact that a reunion wasn't happening.”
“So, obviously, there's your proof."”


"Timberlake will perform in the super bowl on February 4, 2018 in Minneapolis, Minnesota, where the Philadelphia Eagles will face the New England Patriots."
"Then, it seemed to realize that Timberlake had his share of the controversy, too," he added, "in a sense, but not on purpose
"He's not the kind of person who's controversial."
Although Fatong could not confirm or deny Jackson's presence, he did say, "he's not that kind of person."
"TMZ's cameraman also asked if he thought Timberlake would bring Janet Jackson to the show in recognition of their controversial clothing breakdown at the 38th Super Bowl."
"* nsync members have recently regrouped to perform at the 2013 MTV Video Music Awards."
"Damn, he's doing his thing."
"It's no problem," he pointed out
"The former nsync singer didn't seem upset because he didn't get together."
"Obviously, this is your evidence."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
“He has thought about starting a family with Selena at some point down the line maybe in a few years and he has told her that he would want to have a girl because nothing would be better for him...”
“He and Selena Gomez are happy as can be right now, but HollywoodLife.com has learned EXCLUSIVELY that The Weeknd may be just a little happier if they had a few more people to love!”
“The Weeknd, 27, and Selena Gomez, 25, are young and in love, but that doesn’t mean they can’t think about the future.”
“An insider close to the The Weeknd revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that the “Starboy” singer is very interested in making babies with the “Fetish” songstress when the time comes!”
“OMG, we’re dying.”
“Can you imagine these two as parents?!?”
“Well, maybe not right away!”
“Click here to see pics of Selena’s 25th birthday.”
“...then to have a cute little Selena look alike bouncing around the source said said...”


"Tell us next!"
"He once thought about forming a family with Selena sometime in the next few years. He told Selena that he would want a girl because there was nothing more suitable for him..."
"He and Selena Gomez are very happy now, but I only know that if they have more people to love, they may be happier on the weekend!"
"Weeknd, 27, and Selena Gomez, 25, are both young and in love, but that doesn't mean they can't think about the future."
A person familiar with the matter told reporters that Hollywood Life exclusive reported that "star boy" singer is very interested in baby and "fetishism" female singer's time has come
"God, we're going to die."
"Can you imagine these two are parents?"
"Well, maybe not immediately!"
"Click here to see a photo of Serena's 25th birthday."
“… And then there was a lovely little Serena who looked like she was bouncing, and the source said



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source close to the couple previously told PEOPLE the pair tried to make things work after “growing apart” over the past year.”
“| Credit: Ethan Miller/GettyLast week, she updated Instagram with her first post since her separation, writing, “Thank you guys for all your love.”
“Channing Tatum is having a tough time adjusting to his split with ex Jenna Dewan, sources say.”
“The breakup has “been hard for Channing,” a source close to the couple, both 37, tells PEOPLE.”
““He always had Jenna and their family to go home to, so having their separation be ‘official’ now has been a big adjustment for him.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“As for Dewan, a second source says, “Jenna has a super-packed schedule and a ton of girlfriends to lean on and spend time with.”
“Her life isn’t really changing … if anything, she’s just busier.”Both Dewan and Tatum have been spotted out and about without their wedding rings since jointly announcing their split on April 2.”
“Days after news of their breakup was made public, Dewan went back to shooting her upcoming TV show Mixtape.”
“This past weekend, Tatum stepped out for the Honda Indy Grand Prix on Sunday, attending his first public event since he and Dewan announced their split.”
“The 37-year-old actor attended the event in Birmingham, Alabama, where he served as the grand marshal and hung out with Bachelor star Arie Luyendyk Jr.”


"A source close to the couple had previously told people that they were trying to make things go smoothly after" going their separate ways "in the past year."
Credit: Ethan Miller / Getty updated her first post on instagram last week: "thank you for your love."
Tatum is struggling to adapt to the breakup with former Jenna Dewan, the source said
"It's hard for Channing to break up," a 37 year old person familiar with the matter told people
"He always has Jenna and their family back home, so it's a big adjustment for him to make their separation" official "now," he was informed by news, feature and other tweets. “
"As for Dewan, another source said," Jenna has a super crowded schedule and a ton of girlfriends to rely on and spend time with
"Her life has not really changed If anything, she's just busier Since the joint announcement on April 2, both Dewan and Tatum have been found to have no wedding rings
"A few days after the news of their breakup came out, Dewan went back to film her upcoming tv mix."
"Last weekend, Tatum took part in the Honda Indy Grand Prix on Sunday and took part in his first public event since the announcement of the breakup with Dewan."
The 37 year old actor took part in the event in Birmingham, Alabama, where he served as Grand Marshal and dated single actor Arie luyendyk Jr



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[h/t: Refinery29]”
“"Getting to work with Charlize and what we did together will always be remembered as a great high point of my life."”
“After scheduling issues made the actress turn down a role in the DC Extended Universe film, it appears that she's very open to appearing in Wonder Woman 2.”
“During a panel at last month's San Diego Comic-Con, Theron addressed the possibility of reuniting with Wonder Woman director Patty Jenkins - who previously teamed up with the actress in Monster.”
“"Look I would love to work with her again."”
“Theron revealed.”
“"I had such an incredible time.”
“I trusted her from the first time I met her.”
“That’s a big thing for an actor, to be able to trust your director that way and she just never disappointed.”
“She’s incredible so to see her have this moment, I just feel incredibly happy for her."”


“[h/t:Refinery29]”
"Working with Charlize and what we did together will always be remembered as a great pinnacle in my life."
"Due to schedule problems, the actress turned down a role in Washington's extended universe films. It seems that she's very open-minded about starring in wonder woman 2."
"At last month's San Diego comics conference, Theron talked about the possibility of reuniting with wonder woman director Patty Jenkins, who had previously worked with the actresses in monsters."
"Look, I'd love to work with her again."
"Cylon revealed."
"I had an incredible time."
"I trusted her the first time I saw her."
"For an actor, it's a big thing. If you can trust your director like this, she will never be disappointed."
"She's incredible, so I'm very happy to see her have this moment."



**Something goes wrong**
“Ben and Jen officially filed for divorce in April 2017, with Jen reportedly making the first move.”
“We were only there for I think, a week and a half, two weeks, working, but I went to Jen a couple times asking advice on certain things and she’s an incredible woman, she really is,” Duhamel revealed.”
“Josh Duhamel finally responds to those Jennifer Garner dating rumors and he can’t stop smiling!”
“Josh Duhamel, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, are the same age, they’re both in the business and they’re both single.”
“So, when rumors began to swirl that the two Hollywood A-listers were dating, fans went wild.”
“However, you can pump the breaks on that one, because, although Duhamel thinks his Love, Simon co-star is “incredible,” he’s laughing off those pesky dating rumors.”
““It does truly amaze me what some of the things that are printed,” Duhamel told E!”
“News at the premiere of the movie in Los Angeles on March 13.”
““It’s like, how is that even legal?”
“I try not to comment on it.”


"Ben and Jen formally filed for divorce in April 2017, and Jen is reported to have moved for the first time."
"I think we only worked there for a week and a half, two weeks, but I went to Jen a few times to ask for advice on certain things. She's an incredible woman and she really is," duhamer revealed
"Josh Duhamel finally responded to the rumor that Jennifer Garner was dating. He couldn't help laughing!"
"Josh Duhamel, 45, is about the same age as Jennifer Garner, 45. They're both business people and single."
"So, when the rumors of two Hollywood stars dating started to spread, the fans went crazy."
"However, you can rest on this pump because, while Duhamel thinks his love, Simon co starring is" unbelievable, "he laughs at those nasty dating rumors."
"It really surprised me that some things were printed out," Duhamel told e! "
"The film premiere in Los Angeles on March 13."
"Like, how is that legal?"
"I try not to comment."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They started telling friends a few weeks ago,” said the source.”
““Kylie is very happy.”BABY ON BOARD — SEPTEMBER 2017In September, multiple sources told PEOPLE the Kylie Lip Kit creator was pregnant with her first child.”
““They also talked a lot.”
“Later, the couple headed to Boston’s Theater District where Scott made an appearance at Bijou nightclub“He was definitely looking for something intimate,” one club-goer told PEOPLE.”
“Located just outside Boston in the town of Waltham, Bentley was celebrating their annual Spring Day, which always included a big a concert on campus featuring Scott.”
“A SHOW OF SUPPORT — APRIL 2017Jenner headed to Bentley University outside Boston to support her beau.”
“Once he got back, they definitely looked like a couple, cuddled up next to each other among her friends,” said the onlooker, who attended the game and spotted Jenner kissing Scott’s neck.”
“...courtside club anxiously waiting for him to come back to her...”
“According to an onlooker at the Houston Rockets vs Oklahoma City Thunder game where Scott performed before tip off the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and the hip hop artist were spotted holding hands and definitely looked like a couple During his performance Kylie was hiding in the Rockets...”
“PACKING ON PDA — APRIL 2017Image zoom Credit: Bob Levey/GettyA few weeks after hanging out at Coachella together, the couple seemed to make their love official by getting cuddly at an NBA playoff game in Houston, Texas.”


"They started telling friends a few weeks ago," the source said
"Kelly is very happy." Baby on board, -2017, September, September, a number of sources told people that Kylie's Lipstick maker was pregnant with her first child.
"They talked a lot, too."
"Later, the couple went to the theater district of Boston, and Scott showed up at the bijo nightclub," a frequent nightclub guest told people. "He must be looking for something intimate."
Bentley, in Waltham, a suburb of Boston, is celebrating their annual spring day, when there is always a big campus concert attended by Scott
"Support - in April 2017, Jenna went to Bentley university outside Boston to support her boyfriend."
"When he came back, they looked absolutely like a couple, hugging each other among her friends," bystanders said. He took part in the competition and found Jenna kissing Scott on the neck
“… The stadium club is anxiously waiting for him to come back to her... "
"According to a bystander in the Houston Rockets Oklahoma thunder game, Scott performed" keep up with Kardashian "before receiving the report, and the hip-hop artist was found holding hands. During the performance, Kelly must be hiding in the Rockets like a couple..."
"Package on PDA - April 2017 photo zooming credit: after Bob Levi / gaitia played together in cochella for a few weeks, the couple seemed to express their love by embracing at the NBA playoffs in Houston, Texas."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See our fool-proof list of nine most-foolish rumors making their way through grapevines over the years but, fortunately, never between the Carters.”
“On their anniversary day of April 4, the day that the couple marks another successful year as Mr. and Mrs. Carter, we celebrate the unbreakable, unshakable, undeniable forces of Black love the Carter way.”
“Namely, cheating scandals, pregnancy hoaxes and whispers of divorce have been abundant among the public, of which Bey and Jay may thinly address via lyricism — if the chatterboxes are lucky enough.”
“And though the Carters have obviously withstood them, it never stopped the rumor mills from spinning with attempts to creep into their private life.”
“But even the most idolized of relationships trail obstacle-ridden roads.”
“...twins of the Carter family...”
“The rightfully glorified relationship between the Houston starlet and New York rap heavyweight blooming from over a decade ago has since gracefully passed the test of time and birthed a beautiful baby girl Blue Ivy Carter and soon to be...”
“Despite being among music’s most respected and iconic artists, influencers and, ultimately, power couples, one of their most admirable qualities has been keeping their personal business in the background while still standing at the forefront of elite stardom.”
“Even before tying the knot with a private wedding in 2008, Beyoncé and Jay Z have long been #RelationshipGoals.”


"Look at the nine stupidest rumors we've heard on the grapevine over the years. Fortunately, there's never been such a thing between cartels."
"On their anniversary on April 4, this couple marks another successful year for the Carter couple, and we celebrate the unshakable, unshakable, and undeniable power of the black Carter way."
"That is to say, cheating scandals, pregnancy scams and divorce rumors abound in the public. If these chattering people are lucky, Bei and Jay may express these rumors in a lyrical way."
"Although the cartels apparently resisted their attack, it never stopped the rumor makers from trying to sneak into their private lives."
"But even the most admired relationships are on a path full of obstacles."
“… The Carter twins... "
"The relationship between Houston starlets and New York rap heavyweights has been honored since more than ten years ago. Now they have gracefully passed the test of time, and have given birth to a beautiful baby girl, blue Ivy Carter. Soon..."
"Although they are the most respected and iconic artists and influencers in the music industry, and ultimately the powerful couple, one of their most admirable qualities is to remain in the forefront of elite stars while maintaining their personal business background."
"Even before their private wedding in 2008, Beyonce and jay z had long had a love goal."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“...but she won t accept that she ll never be a part of their lives again We pay for juicy info...”
“She s going overboard with presents for Kim s new daughter Caitlyn Jenner Looks Exactly Like Jessica Lange Adds the informant Caitlyn has been sending all kinds of extravagant presents for the nursery as well as some jewelry for Kim Caitlyn isn t in a rush to apologize to Kris...”
““She sees them as her own grandchildren.”
““It’s tough for Caitlyn to be pushed out of the family in this way, but the thing she really struggles with is not being able to see the kids,” an informant told Radar.”
“She then blamed the reality show juggernaut for destroying their 24-year marriage in her memoir, The Secrets of My Life.”
“Drama first unfolded when the I Am Cait star slammed ex Kris Jenner as a Hollywood wife from hell who controlled her money and forbid her from speaking to her own family.”
“As readers know, transgender icon has been shunned by her family after a series of snubs and the 68-year-old Olympian is doing all she can to return to the famous family’s good graces.”
“Now, in Caitlyn’s latest attempt woo back their love, the transgender star has honed in on new mom Kim Kardashian, showering her with baby gifts.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
“… But she won't accept that she'll never be a part of their lives again. We pay for interesting information... "
"As like as two peas, Jessica Lange has prepared too many gifts for Kim's new daughter Caitlin Jenna. She added that the informant Caitlin has been giving various luxury gifts and some jewelry to Kim at the nursery, and Caitlin is not in a hurry to apologize to Chris... "
"She sees them as her grandchildren."
"It's hard for Caitlin to get out of the house like this, but what she's really struggling with is not seeing the children," an informant told radar
"Then in her memoir, the secret of my life, she accused the reality TV stars of ruining their 24-year marriage."
"It's only when the" I'm Cain "star criticizes former Chris Jenner as a Hollywood wife from hell who controls her money and forbids her to talk to her family that the play begins."
"As readers know, transgender idols have been shunned by their families after a series of colds. The 68 year old Olympian is doing her best to restore the style of the famous family."
"Now, in Caitlin's latest effort to reclaim their love, transgender stars hone her with new mom Kim kardashan, shower and baby gift."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Prior to the relationship, Bendjima reportedly dated model Jourdan Dunn, and Kardashian had a nine-year relationship with Scott Disick, the father of her three children.”
““He doesn’t realize that making a joke could be perceived as something totally different or negative.” (TMZ reports the Instagram comment wasn’t the cause of the split.)”
““It was him trying to make a joke, and it wasn’t perceived well on Instagram,” a source later told Us Weekly.”
““Thats what you need to show to get likes?” he asked.”
“But in July 2018, breakup rumors started circulating after Bendjima left a harsh comment on a photo Kardashian posted on Instagram, a pic in which she’s wearing a floral thong.”
““The relationship is still developing and it’s getting more serious.”The couple still seemed happy as recently as June 2018, when they took a romantic vacation to Italy, visiting Rome and Capri with her kids in tow.”
““Younes and Kourtney are great,” a source exclusively told Us Weekly in August 2017 of their romance.”
“Kardashian and Bendjima started dating in 2016 after meeting at Paris Fashion Week that October, and before long, they seemed totally smitten.”
“(Ozuna was previously linked to Tyga and Justin Bieber.)”
“Bendjima, 26, has since headed to Mexico, where he was spotted getting handsy with former Las Vegas waitress Jordan Ozuna on Monday, August 6, according to TMZ.”


It is reported that before the romance, benjima dated model Jordan Dunn and Kardashian dated her father of three, Scott disc, for nine years
"He didn't realize that joking could be considered a totally different or negative thing." (TMZ reported that instagram's comments were not the cause of the breakup.)
A source later told us weekly: "he's joking. He doesn't feel very good on instagram."
"That's what you need to show that you want to be liked?"? "He asked
"But in July 2018, after benjima made harsh comments on the photos of Kardashian posted on instagram, rumors of a breakup began to spread, in which Kardashian was wearing a thong."
"This relationship is still developing, and it's getting more and more serious." The couple were happy until June 2018, when they took their children on a romantic holiday in Italy and visited Rome and Capri
"Younes and Courtney are great," a source told us weekly exclusively about their relationship in August 2017
"Kardashian and benjima started dating after they met at Paris Fashion Week in October 2016, and it didn't take long for them to seem completely enthralled."
(ozuna was previously associated with TEGA and Justin Bieber)
Benjima, 26, then left for Mexico and was found having sex with former Las Vegas waitress Jordan ozuna on Monday, TMZ reported



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Bombers fell to the Boston Red Sox 5-4, ending their eight-game hot streak.”
“Am I staying or am I [going]?”Lopez and Rodriguez appear to be going full-speed ahead, ending their New York tour with a pit stop in the Bronx for Thursday night’s Yankees game.”
““Like we’re good, everything’s great, what’s going on?”
“'” the thrice-married star explained.”
““The song is definitely about that, it is, but I felt like it was kind of something that all women get to a point where they say, ‘OK, what’s up?”
“...rock...”
“They made it for me I heard it for the first time and I knew it was going to be a smash the first time I heard it Lopez 48 previously said El Anillo is about women ready for the...”
“I read the song and I go, ‘Babe, it sounds like they’re talking about us.’ And she goes, ‘Yeah.”
““I know nothing about music.”
““I’m reading the piece of paper like this and it’s the song,” Rodriguez said of his late-night trip to Lopez’s recording studio.”


"The bombers lost 5-4 to the Boston Red Sox, ending their eight game warm-up
"Shall I stay or go? "Lopez and Rodriguez seem to be at full speed, finishing their New York trip and making a pit stop for the Yankees game on Thursday night in the Bronx."
"It's like we're fine. Everything's fine. What's the matter?"
"The star of three marriages explained
"The song must be about that, yes, but I think it's a way that all women say, 'OK, what's the matter?"
“… Rock... "
"They did it for me, I heard it for the first time, I knew it would be a smashed first time, I heard it 48 years ago, Lopez said, Al Arno is about women ready..."
"I read the song and said," honey, it sounds like they're talking about us. " And she said, "yes."
"I know nothing about music."
Rodriguez said of his late night trip to the Lopez Studio: "I'm reading this piece of paper. This is the song."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re very excited about this exhibit and helping to share a fascinating story about a hometown hero who’s gone on to remarkable achievements,” the museum say in a press release.”
“It features various Bieber memorabilia on display, including stage outfits, running shoes, a personal letter from Michelle Obama and the aforementioned underwear.”
“Titled Steps to Stardom, the exhibit launched at the Stratford Perth Museum on Sunday (February 18) and runs until December 31.”
“2018 I M CONVINCED WE ARE BACK IN 2011 I M NOT OKAY pic twitter com zBqKIuiqGe Megan marvelstaylena February 20 2018 Meanwhile an exhibition dedicated to Justin Bieber has opened in the singer s hometown of Stratford Ontario and it features a pair of his underwear...”
“...pic twitter com gBpr9fTUZB mags JANUARY 10 selmilasnature February 20 2018 Advertisement Justin and Selena will get married Selena isn t using Justin for promo Jelena forever Jelena isn t toxic anymore If Justin s happy with Selena then I m happy pic twitter com sLchIqh0zd Britt jdbpurposes February 20”
“...melinazrr February 20 2018 Jelena s back so I can listen to Love Will Remember and Nothing Like Us now without spiraling into depression bi sinceritiescary February 21 2018 My whole timeline is jelena and I m not complaining leslie brunosIovely February 20 2018 the eye contact is killing me...”
“@justinbieber @selenagomez #JustinBieber pic.twitter.com/SIUS4GRaqc — belieber?”
“?❣❣❣❣ just look at them ….”
“...im going to cry right now ?????”
“Ooooooohhhh myyyyyyyy goo000od i am dreaming????????????????????”


"We are very excited about the exhibition and help share a fascinating story about the extraordinary achievements of heroes in our hometown," the museum said in a press release
"There are various Bieber souvenirs on display, including stage costumes, running shoes, Michelle Obama's personal letters and the underwear."
"The exhibition, steps to the stars, was launched at the Perth Museum in Stratford on Sunday (February 18) and will last until December 31."
"In 2018, I'm sure we're back to 2011. I'm not good at pictures. On twitter website zbqkiuiqge Megan marvelstaylena on February 20, 2018, meanwhile, Justin Bieber's hometown Stratford Ontario held an exhibition with one of his underwear on display..."
“… Pic twitter com gbpr9ftuzb mags January 10 selminassnature February 20, 2018 advertisement Justin and Selena will get married Selena doesn't use Justin to promote Jelena forever, Jelena is no longer toxic if Justin s is satisfied with Selena, then I'm very happy pic twitter com slchiqh0zd Britt jdbpurposes February 20 "
“… Melinazir, February 20, 2018, jelina came back, so I can hear love will remember, nothing like us now, not into depression, my whole timeline is jelina, I don't complain about Leslie brunosi, February 20, 2018, eye contact is killing me... "
“@ justinbieber@selenagomez#justinbieber ” pic.twitter.com/SIUS4GRaqc -Bellebo
“? ❣❣❣❣  Look at them... "
“… I'm going to cry now
"Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Source: gossipcop comTags: Catherine Duchess of Cambridge, Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge, Royals, British Royals, Kate Middleton, Kate Duchess, Outlet Track Record, Magazine, Pregnancy Craving, Health, Pregnancy...”
“Much like those untrue tales, this latest one is equally inaccurate.”
“And prior to her third pregnancy announcement, we called out the tabloid for wrongly claiming in a baseless cover story that Middleton’s third baby had been confirmed by the palace.”
“Last month, Gossip Cop corrected the often disproven magazine when it falsely alleged that Meghan Markle made Middleton a “miracle” soup to help cure her morning sickness.”
“Unfortunately, given the outlet’s track record, we’re not remotely surprised by the magazine’s latest piece of royal fiction.”
“The article leaves a sour taste in our mouth.”
“Additionally, establishing that the report never happened, the quotes provided by the magazine appear to be completely bogus.”
“A royal source close to the situation tells us the entirety of Star’s latest tale is simply “false.” Tellingly, not a single British outlet reported the story, proving that Middleton did not have a jar of pickles delivered to Kensington Palace to fulfil her pregnancy craving.”
“...but staffers found themselves in an actual pickle they didn t have a single one Gossip Cop however is assured the story is 100 percent manufactured...”
“In the accompanying story the publication quotes a so called palace insider as saying Will was thrilled when Kate said she was hungry and asked for a pickle sliced thinly on well done toast Further purports the magazine s seemingly made up tipster An SOS was dispatched to the kitchen...”


"Source: gossip" comtag:Catherine Duchess  of Cambridge，Catherine，Duchess of Cambridge，Royals，British Royals，Kate Middleton，Kate Duchess，Outlet Track Record，Magazine，preving Craving，Health，preving…”
"Just like those untrue stories, the latest ones are just as inaccurate."
"Before she announced her third pregnancy, we cried out that the tabloid wrongly claimed in an unfounded cover story that Middleton's third child had been confirmed by the palace."
Last month, gossip police corrected the often refuted magazine by falsely claiming that Megan Marcel had made a "miracle" Soup for Middleton to help her treat morning sickness
"Unfortunately, given the media's track record, we are not at all surprised by the magazine's latest Royal novel."
"The article left a sour taste in our mouths."
"In addition, it seems that the quotation provided by the magazine is totally false because it is confirmed that the report never happened."
"A royal source who knows the situation told us that the latest report of Starr is completely" false. ". It is worth noting that no British media has reported this story, proving that Middleton did not send a can of pickles to Kensington Palace to satisfy her desire to be pregnant. "
“…… But the staff found themselves in a dilemma. They didn't have a gossip policeman, but it's certain that the story was 100% fabricated... "
"In an accompanying report, the magazine quoted a so-called palace insider as saying that when Kate said she was hungry and asked for a thin piece of pickle to be put on the well baked toast, will was very excited, and further claimed that the magazine seemed to have fabricated an informant to send a distress signal to the kitchen..."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See more: Kate Mara and Jamie Bell Asked a Neighbor If They Could Borrow Her House For Their Wedding...”
“They didn't make anything official until they walked the Cannes red carpet together hand-in-hand a few months later.”
“Still, lots of fans think they might have taken their very discreet and laid-back relationship to the next level: Mara was recently spotted wearing a diamond ring on her left hand, igniting rumors that she secretly got engaged to the actor.”
“Mara was recently photographed wearing a huge sparkler on her left hand while casually running errands in Los Angeles.”
“Neither she nor Phoenix have confirmed an engagement, and both of their reps declined to comment to People earlier this week.”
“However, they’ve been dating for a while, and even though they’re exceptionally private, Phoenix revealed during an interview in 2017 that they had moved in with one another.”
“The actors first worked together on Spike Jonze’s 2013 Oscar-nominated film Her, in which they played a recently divorced couple.”
“Later, they starred opposite each other in the 2018 biblical drama Mary Magdalene.”
“During shooting, they were often spotted hanging out on and off set, sparking relationship rumors.”
““They were talking to one another nonstop,” a source told People at the time.”


"See more: Kate Mara and Jamie bell ask their neighbors if they can borrow her house for their wedding..."
"It wasn't until a few months later that they walked hand in hand on the red carpet of Cannes that they made a formal statement."
"Nevertheless, many fans think that they may have taken their very cautious and leisurely relationship to a new level: Marla's recent discovery that she is wearing a diamond ring in her left hand has sparked rumors that she is secretly engaged to the actor."
"Marla was recently photographed running errands in Los Angeles with a huge spark light on her left hand."
"Neither she nor Phoenix confirmed their engagement, and both of their representatives declined to comment earlier this week."
"However, they have been dating for some time, and although they are very private, Phoenix revealed in an interview in 2017 that they have moved together."
"The two actors first collaborated in spike jonz's 2013 Oscar nominated film she, in which they played a newly divorced couple."
"Later, they starred in a rival play in the 2018 Bible drama Mary Magdalene."
"In the process of shooting, it is often found that they are wandering around inside and outside the set, causing rumors of love."
"They kept talking," one source told people at the time



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I wouldn’t bother framing a Rolling Stone magazine, although people do still ask me to sign it occasionally.”
““But I’m sorry, that’s not true.”
“He admits he was shocked to get the call – “I thought I was being punk’d!” – and a fair few “Who is Gavin Rossdale?” pieces made their way to publication.”
“A massive rock star in the US who has shifted about 20m albums, he has been a comparative flop back home.”
“Photograph: Joel Anderson/ITVRossdale was not an obvious choice for the UK version of The Voice.”
“I glance at the gleaming triangular ring on his finger, which would double neatly as a knuckle duster, and wonder how this encounter might go …Will.i.am, Jennifer Hudson, Sir Tom Jones and Gavin Rossdale.”
“Most journalists, he says, are nice to his face – “because I’m bigger than they think I am” – but end up stitching him up when they get behind their keyboard.”
“He’s polite and engaged, but he doesn’t trust me very much.”
“...press...”
“I was not really saying anything and just waiting for them to cut me up like a sushi chef one more time It hasn t escaped my mind that Rossdale is sitting here talking to a member of the British...”


"I don't bother to design a Rolling Stone magazine, even though people occasionally ask me to sign it."
"But I'm sorry, that's not true."
He admitted that he was shocked by the call. "I thought I was a punk! Who's Gavin Rossdale? "The work was published."
"He's a superstar in the United States, releasing 20 million albums, but he's quite a failure at home."
"Photo: Joel Anderson / itvrossdale is not the obvious choice for the British version of sound."
"I glanced at the glittering triangle ring on his finger. It would turn up like a knuckle duster. I wanted to know what this encounter would be like Will I. Eminem, Jennifer Hudson, sir Tom Jones and Gavin Rosedale. "
Most journalists were nice to his face, "because I'm bigger than they thought," he said, but when they got to the back of the keyboard, they stitched him up
"He's polite and busy, but he doesn't trust me very much."
“… Press
"I didn't say anything, just waiting for them to chop me up like a sushi chef. I think of rosdale sitting here talking to an Englishman again..."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“Eric clearly thought the whole thing was hilarious.”
“She missed a curb and almost fell to the ground before he caught her!”
“Check out the pics here.”
“Oops!”
“Jessica Simpson, 36, had a little mishap leaving her husband Eric Johnson‘s 38th birthday party on September 19.”
“The couple, who have been married for three years, were spotted leaving posh Los Angeles hotspot Craig’s in the wee hours of September 20 after what appeared to be an absolute banger of a bash.”
“As paparazzi surrounded the couple, the fashion mogul had a bit of trouble getting around the cameramen.”
“She missed a curb while wearing sky-high heels and nearly fell to the ground!”
“Good thing Eric was by her side and holding her hand!”


"Let us know!"
"Eric obviously found the whole thing funny."
"She missed the curb and almost fell to the ground, so he caught her!"
"Look at the pictures here."
"Oh dear!"
"Jessica Simpson, 36, had a little accident when she left her husband Eric Johnson's 38th birthday party on September 19."
On the early morning of September 20, the couple, who had been married for three years, was found to have left Craig's department store, a fashion hot spot in Los Angeles. It seemed like a complete carnival
"As paparazzi surrounded the couple, the fashion tycoon had some trouble bypassing the photographer."
"She was wearing sky high heels, didn't step on the curb, almost fell to the ground!"
"It's a good thing Eric's holding her hand by her side!"



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts below!”
“Justin tells HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY”
“Update: After we received EXCLUSIVE info that the two of them would travel before Valentine’s Day, Justin and Selena were finally seen headed to Los Angeles International Airport on Feb. 10 in a black SUV, which means their Valentine’s Day getaway is definitely underway!”
“The adorable duo looked cute together as they chatted while sitting in back of the vehicle.”
“The romantic trip can’t last too long though — Selena will have to be back for the Coach 1941 fashion show on Feb. 13 for NYFW.”
“SEE THE PICS OF THE LOVEBIRDS ON THEIR WAY TO THE AIRPORT HERE!”
“Meghan Markle and Prince Harry aren’t the only celebrity couple with special Valentine’s Day plans!”
“Justin Bieber, 23, is putting his own twist on the romantic holiday by celebrating his love for Selena Gomez, 25, a few days early!”
““Justin is on his way out of town and he invited Selena Gomez to join him for a intimate getaway.”
“Justin has left LA for some fun on a spiritual retreat, and he is hoping Selena will join him for a pre-Valentine’s vacation together.”


"Let's know what you think below!"
"Justin tells Hollywood life exclusively"
"Update: after we received the exclusive news that they will travel before Valentine's day, Justin and Selena were finally seen riding a black SUV to Los Angeles International Airport on February 10, which means their Valentine's day trip must be in progress!"
"The lovely couple are chatting in the back of the car. They look lovely."
"But the romance won't last long - Serena has to come back for the coach 1941 fashion show at FW in New York on February 13."
"On the way to the airport, take a look at the photos of the couple!"
Megan markel and Prince Harry are not the only celebrity couple with special plans for Valentine's Day
Justin Bieber, 23, celebrated his love for Serena Gomez, 25, a few days in advance, which made him change in this romantic festival
"Justin is on his way out of town. He invited Selena Gomez to elope with him."
"Justin has left Los Angeles for a mental health center, and he hopes Serena can spend a holiday with him before Valentine's day."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To a country she doesn’t know or remember, with a language she may not even speak?””
“Where are we supposed to send her?”
“What if our kid’s science teacher, or our friendly neighbor turns out to be a Dreamer?”
““And it is cruel.”
“It is self-defeating – because they want to start new businesses, staff our labs, serve in our military, and otherwise contribute to the country we love,” Obama said in a poignant Facebook post.”
“...on social media including former President Obama To target these young people is wrong because they have done nothing wrong...”
“But we must also recognize that we are a nation of opportunity because we are a nation of laws While many are protesting at Trump Tower and in D C Los Angeles Denver and New York City sharing their outrage and heartbreak over the announcement others are expressing their grievances...”
“After Attorney General Jeff Sessions announced the news, the president said in a written statement: “I do not favor punishing children, most of whom are now adults, for the actions of their parents.”
“The policy, formed under the Obama administration and implemented in 2012 to protect from deportation the nearly 800,000 young undocumented immigrants who were brought to the U.S. as children, will be rescinded in six months.”
“The Trump administration formally announced on Tuesday the end of DACA (Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals).”


"To a country she doesn't know or remember, in a language she doesn't even speak?"
"Where should we send her?"
"What if our child's science teacher, or our friendly neighbor, becomes a dreamer?"
"It's cruel."
"It's self humiliating because they want to start a new business, staff our labs, serve our military, or contribute to the country we love," Obama said in a touching Facebook post
“…… It's wrong to target these young people on social media, including former President Barack Obama, because they didn't do anything wrong... "
"But we also have to realize that we are a country full of opportunities, because we are a country full of laws, and many people protest in the trump building, D C District of Los Angeles, Denver and New York City, and they are indignant and heartbroken at the statements of dissatisfaction from others..."
After justice minister Jeff seshens announced the news, the president said in a written statement: "I don't approve of punishing children for their parents' actions. Most of them are now adults."
"This policy, formulated by the Obama administration and implemented in 2012, aims to protect nearly 800000 young undocumented immigrants from deportation, which will be abolished in six months."
"The trump Administration officially announced the end of DACA on Tuesday."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more of our opinion pieces, take a look at our analysis of Rihanna's recent photo-stir right here.”
“And not just because both of them are blonde, caucasian women enjoying more extremes of wealth and privilege than we are capable of imagining.”
“After cultivating an image of being a woman of high moral character worthy of a seat on the King s Small Council she had this narrative irrevocably destroyed by the High Sparrow the Westerosi equivalent of the Pope who promptly...”
“Cersei found herself in a very similar PR disaster during Game of Thrones' fifth season.”
“...argue unnecessary response...”
“The catastrophic blow to her clean cut image led Swift to decamp out of the public eye for the better part of a year only emerging now with Look What You Made Me Do a long overdue and some would...”
“The world saw for themselves that the Taylor Swift PR-factory had completely fabricated the notion that Kanye West acted without her knowledge or consent when honoring her with the lyrical compliment that they "might still have sex."”
“While there are numerous plot points in that story (for a detailed overview, head here), the most integral is the moment last year when she was outed as a liar by Kim Kardashian West.”
“The lead-up to Taylor unveiling her latest radio-juggernaut was one that played on the now-widespread public opinion of the pop star being a 'snake.'”
“...of her upcoming album Reputation carries many of the same personal traits that have allowed Cersei to usurp herself to the Iron Throne of Westeros...”


"For more on our point of view, please see our analysis of Rihanna's recent photos."
"It's not just that they are all Blonde white women who enjoy more wealth and privileges than we think."
"After shaping the image of a virtuous woman worthy of a seat in the king's small Council, she irreversibly destroyed this statement by the tall sparrow, which is equivalent to the Pope's westrossi. He immediately..."
"Cersei found herself in a similar PR disaster in the fifth season of game of Thrones."
“… Argue about unnecessary responses... "
"The disastrous blow to her innocent image led to Swift's disappearance from the public eye for most of the year. Now she appears. You asked me to do something I should have done. Some people will..."
"The whole world has seen Taylor Swift's PR factory completely fabricate the idea that when they pay their respects to her with lyrical compliments, Kanye West acts without her knowledge or consent, and they" may have sex again. "
"Although there are many plots in the story (click here for a detailed overview), the most complete one is the moment when she was exposed as a liar by Kim Kardashian west last year."
"Taylor's latest radio superstar started when the public generally believed that the pop star was a" snake. "
“…… In her upcoming album, her reputation carries many of the same personal traits that make cersei usurp her iron throne in vestros... "



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This isn’t just a disease of the architecture profession; it’s a phenotype of human culture and how we develop stereotypes and perceptions.””
“That photo has since been taken down.”
“The actor, 54, was spotted at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology back in November where he seemingly dropped by one of Oxman’s classes the week after Thanksgiving.”
“Several students posted pictures of the actor posing with the class, including one where he is standing next to Oxman.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She’s genius and gorgeous,” an architect, who has seen Oxman lecture and knows her work, tells PEOPLE.”
“The actor kept it casual in an all-black outfit as he happily smiled along with the students for several pictures.”
“He also stood next to Oxman in another picture with his hands behind his back as the larger group beamed at the camera.”
“Page Six first reported last week that the two had struck up a friendship based on their shared love of architecture.”
“But it’s not only true for architecture; it’s true in musical composition, for females working in theater, for film directors.”


"It's not just a disease of the construction industry; it's a manifestation of human culture, and it's also a manifestation of how we form stereotypes and ideas."
"That picture was taken later."
The 54 year old actor, who was discovered at MIT last November, seems to have gone to a class in Oxman a week after Thanksgiving
Several students posted pictures of the actor with the class, including one of him standing next to Oxman
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She is talented and beautiful," an architect, who has seen Oxman lectures, knows her work and tells people
"The actor, dressed in all black clothes, laughed happily with the students at random and took some pictures."
"In another photo, he's standing next to Oxman, hands behind his back, as a larger group smiles at the camera."
"Page six reported for the first time last week that the two had built a friendship based on a shared love of architecture."
"But it's not just for architecture, it's for music, it's for women who work in theaters, it's for film directors."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Goodbye Private Hudson.”Read on for more industry reactions to Paxton’s death.”
“Once again, an icon, far too young, gone far too soon.”
“...of BillPaxton is beyond crushing...”
“His friendship was a blessing In his memory on this Oscar Sunday watch One False Move or A Simple Plan to see this lovely leading man at his finest Referencing Paxton s role in Aliens Josh Gad added The loss...”
“Renaissance man, raconteur and uniquely American national treasure,” Lowe tweeted Sunday morning.”
““Devastated by the sudden loss of my close friend and one of the finest actors in the business, Bill Paxton.”
“...the Golden Globe nominated HBO series Big Love on social media soon after the news of his death broke...”
“Stars like Tom Hanks Charlize Theron Jordan Peele William Shatner Rob Lowe Kumail Nanjiani and Jamie Lee Curtis paid tribute to the late actor best known for his roles in films like Aliens Twister Apollo 13 True Lies Titanic and...”
“Aliens type MovieThe entertainment industry is mourning Bill Paxton, who died Sunday at the age of 61.”


"Good bye, private Hudson." Read on to learn more about the industry's reaction to Paxton's death
"Once again, an idol, too young, too fast."
"Bill Paxton's It's indestructible... "
"His friendship is a blessing in his memory, watching a wrong move or a simple plan on this Oscar Sunday, and seeing this lovely hero in his best reference Paxton's role in aliens, Josh gard added loss..."
"Renaissance people, talkative people, unique national treasures of the United States," Roy tweeted Sunday morning
"I was shocked to suddenly lose my best friend and one of the best actors in the industry, Bill Paxton."
“… Shortly after Golden Globe nominated HBO series Da Ai on social media, the news of his death came out... "
"Stars like Tom Hanks Charlize Theron Jordan peel, William Shatner, rob lo Kumer nangarni and Jamie Lee Curtis salute the late actor for his contributions to alien whirlwind, Apollo 13 the truth Titanic and Titanic
"The alien genre of film entertainment is mourning bill Paxton, who died on Sunday at the age of 61."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Russell plays a contract killer to Ryan's private investigator in the film, with the pair working together to solve the mysterious disappearance of a porn star in 1970s Los Angeles.”
“In terms of the drinking I am supposed to be drunk all the time in the film but it actually worked out because I went out with Russell right before we started shooting so I was still drunk the entire...”
“But Ryan Gosling seems to have found the best way to quit smoking once and for all, and according to him, it actually works.”
“The 35-year-old actor told Australian radio hosts, Kyle And Jackie O, on Tuesday that he 'smoked himself out' whilst filming The Nice Guys, in which he plays a private investigator Holland March, who is addicted to cigarettes.”
“Scroll down for video'I never want another cigarette again!'”
“Ryan Gosling told KIIS FM on Tuesday that he smoked himself out whilst filming The Nice Guys in which he plays a private investigator who is heavily addicted to cigarettes Admitting he was a smoker in real life before filming...”
“...the father of two revealed he has since quit after being turned off by smoking too much...”
“'I use to, but in this movie I smoked myself out,' he laughed, adding: 'I never want another cigarette again!'”
“It really is the greatest way to quit it s hard to come by you really have to get a film where you have to smoke all the time but I highly recommend it if you are trying to quit...”
“...he went on...”


"Russell plays a contract killer for Ryan's private detective in the film, and the two work together to solve the mysterious disappearance of a pornographic star in Los Angeles in the 1970s."
"When it comes to drinking, I should be drunk all the time in the movie, but in fact, because I went out with Russell before shooting, so I was drunk all night..."
"But Ryan Gosling seems to have found the best way to quit smoking completely, and according to him, it really works."
"The 35 year old actor told Australian radio hosts Kyle and Jackie o on Tuesday that he" sucked himself out "while filming" the good man, "in which he plays Holland March, a private detective addicted to cigarettes
"Scroll down the video 'I don't want to smoke anymore!"
"Ryan Gosling told kiis FM on Tuesday that he smoked his own cigarette while shooting good man. In this film, he plays a private detective addicted to cigarettes and admits that he is a smoker in real life before shooting..."
“…… The father of the two children revealed that he quit smoking because of excessive smoking.... "
He said with a smile, "I used to smoke, but in this movie I pulled myself out. I don't want to smoke any more!"
"It's really the best way to quit smoking. It's hard to do it. You really want to make a movie that you have to smoke all the time, but if you want to quit smoking, I strongly recommend that you..."
“… He went on... "



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And celebrities, such as Billy Eichner and Chelsea Handler, also took to Twitter following Trump’s announcement.”
“Meanwhile, many Democrats voiced their opposition with senators Bernie Sanders and Elizabeth Warren among those who expressed outrage on social media.”
“As to be expected, conservative pundits like Sean Hannity and Ann Coulter weighed in in support of the nominee.”
“Other members of Trump’s party, like Marco Rubio, John McCain and Lindsey Graham, who have been willing to criticize the new president on some of his actions, also tweeted positive reviews of Gorsuch.”
“Many Republicans, including Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell and Ted Cruz, applauded Trump’s selection as House Speaker Paul Ryan called Gorsuch a “phenomenal nominee.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“"Gorsuch must explain his hostility to women's rights, support of corporations over workers and opposition to campaign finance reform," Bernie Sanders tweetedD.C. and Hollywood voiced their personal and political opinions immediately following the announcement of President Donald Trump‘s Supreme Court Justice nominee, Neil M. Gorsuch.”


"Following Trump's announcement, celebrities like Billy Eisner and Chelsea Handler also tweeted."
Meanwhile, many Democrats expressed their anger on social media, including senators Bernie Sanders and Elizabeth Warren
As expected, conservative experts like Sean Hannity and Ann Coulter joined in the support of the nominees
"Other members of Trump's party, such as Marco Rubio, John McCain and Lindsay Graham, are willing to criticize some of the new president's actions, and they also gave a positive evaluation of gorsoech on twitter."
Many Republicans, including Senate majority leaders Mitch McConnell and Ted Cruz, praised Trump's election as house speaker Paul Ryan, who called him such an "extraordinary candidate.". "Get push notifications for news, features, etc."
"Goresuke has to explain his hostility to women's rights, his support for companies over workers, and his opposition to campaign funding reform," Bernie Sanders announced in a statement to President Donald Trump's Supreme Court nominee, Neil M. goresuke M. Immediately after that, they tweeted their personal and political views



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Playing a set tonight at the Hellfest in Clisson, France, the guitar-strumming actor is on a summer tour with Alice Cooper, Aerosmith’s Joe Perry and other members of the Hollywood Vampires band – livin’ the dream, for now.”
“As the summer trial seems certain to occur, Depp himself was not in court today.”
“Prior to that, he was with repping Depp at Manatt, Phelps & Phillips LLP.”
“Chew is now with DC’s Brown Rudick.”
“...of JAMS,” noted Chew in the unsuccessful application with the court today.”
“...the Honorable Peter Lichtman Ret...”
“She added The parties are to work with the discovery referee to create a schedule to complete the discovery prior to the FSC final status conference The parties have agreed to and scheduled a mediation on July 14 2018 before...”
““The ex parte application is denied at this time,” the LASC Judge wrote in longhand on the proposed order Friday.”
“Fortunately for the studio, who had nothing to do with today’s actions, the Honorable Teresa Beaudet wanted to stick to the schedule and get things dealt with sooner rather than later.”
“...financial and otherwise to come out during their peak press period for the tentpole pic...”


"Tonight at the hell festival in clizon, France, the guitarist is on a summer tour with Alice Cooper, Joe Perry of Smith airlines and other members of the Hollywood vampire band. They are all living in their dreams."
"Depp himself didn't appear in court today, as the summer trial seemed certain."
Prior to that, he represented Depp at manatt, Phelps & Phillips LLP
"Chew is now with brown Rudick of DC."
"About jam," Zhou said in an unsuccessful application to the court today
“…… Dear Mr. Peter Lichtman... "
"She added that the parties would work with the discovery arbitrators to develop a timetable to complete the discovery before the FSC final status meeting. Both parties have agreed and plan to mediate before July 14, 2018.... "
"Now the unilateral application has been rejected," judge LASC wrote in handwritten form on Friday in the proposed order
"Fortunately, for the studio that has nothing to do with today's action, the respected Theresa bird hopes to stick to the schedule and solve the problem as soon as possible."
“… Financial and other aspects come out at the peak of their peak photos... "



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In these days of quickie engagements like Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson after only three weeks of dating, it’s refreshing to see a couple who has taken so much time bonding and growing so close yet not feeling the rush into marriage.”
“They’re already like one big family without being married.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why they’re putting off the big commitment.”
“So many celebrity couples these days are getting engaged after dating for mere weeks.”
“Yet Blake Shelton, 42, and Gwen Stefani, 48, are coming up on three years together this fall without getting betrothed.”
“They’re wildly in love, yet the country singer still hasn’t put a ring on the beautiful blonde’s finger.”
“It turns out that their incredible success is standing in the way of an engagement and marriage.”
““With Gwen’s Vegas residency and Blake’s constant touring and duties with The Voice there really isn’t anytime to get married.”
“And instead of getting engaged and waiting forever to get married they want to be in a spot where they can do both quick and the way they want to do it,” a source close to the couple tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Their careers just need a bit of a break before that happens and they aren’t interested in slowing down right now.”


"In the days when Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson are dating for only three weeks, it's refreshing to see a couple spend so much time building relationships and getting closer without feeling the urge to get married."
"They are like a big unmarried family."
"We have exclusive details of why they delayed major commitments."
"Now a lot of celebrity couples are engaged just a few weeks after dating."
"However, Blake Sheldon, 42, and Gwen Stefani, 48, will be living together for three years this fall without engagement."
"They're in love, but the country singer hasn't put a ring on this beautiful blonde yet."
"It turns out that their incredible success hindered their engagement and marriage."
"With Gwen's right of abode in Vegas and Blake's constant touring, as well as the role of voice, there's really no time to get married."
A source close to the couple told reporters: "they don't want to get engaged and wait to get married forever, but want to be in a place that can be done quickly and in their own way." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Before that, their careers only needed a little rest, and now they don't want to slow down."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know, do you think Heather Locklear should be on reality TV?”
“Naturally anyone who brings the drama is prime housewives material in our book, but in the case of Heather Locklear we think that this is one rumor that should stay a fantasy.”
“The actress might be getting her own diamond!”
“Genny GlassmanIn a turn of events that would truly be shocking, is it possible that actress Heather Locklear will be joining the cast of The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills?”
“We’re not so sure that this story checks out.”
“The buzz started yesterday, April 9, when Lisa Rinna was a guest on Andy Cohen’s radio show, Radio Andy.”
“The two talked Housewives, Amelia’s history with mental health, and Andy even probed Lisa about her relationship her former Melrose Place co-star.”
““Did you have a friendship with [Heather Locklear]?” the Bravo host asked.”
““I did and I will say to you, I learned more from Heather […] I learned professionalism, coming in and owning a set, and being kind to everyone, and polite, and on time, knew their lines, funny,” Rinna tells him.”
““Heather Locklear was everything and she was one of the biggest starts of that time.”But things have not been smooth sailing for Locklear as of late.”


"Let's know, do you think Heather lockrier should be on the reality show?"
"Of course, in our book, anyone who brings drama is the main material for housewives, but in the case of heather lockrier, we think it's a rumor that should become a fantasy."
"The actress may get her own diamond!"
"Genny glassmanin is at a really shocking turning point. Is it possible for actress Heather Locklear to join the cast of the real housewife of Beverly Hills?"
"We're not sure the story is true."
"Yesterday, April 9, Lisa Lina made a sensation by visiting Andy Cohen's radio show Andy radio."
"They talked about housewife, Amelia's mental health history, and Andy even asked Lisa about her relationship with former Melrose square co stars."
"Do you have any friendship with [Heather rockill]? "Great," the host asked
"I did, and I want to tell you that I learned more from Heather ]I learned professionalism, came in with a set, was nice to everyone, polite, punctual, knew their lines, it was fun, "Lina told him
"Heather lockrier was everything. She was one of the greatest beginnings of that era." Recently, however, Locklear's career has not been smooth



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although the Baldwins are looking forward to their cake and wine, Hilaria opened up about the importance of the upcoming ceremony.”
“The couple has four children: Leonardo, 9 months, Rafael, 2, Carmen, 3, and 21-year-old Ireland (Alec’s daughter from his marriage to Kim Basinger).”
“...plans with wife Hilaria...”
“The 59-year-old actor and the yoga instructor, 33, will ring in their fifth wedding anniversary this month, and (thanks to Alec) the cat’s out of the bag on how they plan to celebrate.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I see what I have and I’m very lucky,” he told E!”
“News on Tuesday at the New York premiere of Blind.”
““We’re getting remarried on Friday.”Hilaria chimed in: “Now there’s gonna be people at our doorstep!”Naturally, Alec worked to cover up his snafu.”
““I’m sorry.”
“I shouldn’t have said that … Did I say remarried?”


"While the Baldwins are looking forward to their cake and wine, Hilaria is open about the importance of the upcoming wedding."
"The couple have four children: 9-month-old Leonardo, 2-year-old Rafael, 3-year-old Carmen and 21-year-old Ireland (daughter of Alec's marriage to Kim Basinger)
“… And his wife Hillary's plan... "
The 59 year old actor and 33 year old yoga instructor will be married on their fifth wedding anniversary this month, and (thanks to Alec), the secret of how they plan to celebrate the wedding has come to light
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I saw what I had and I was very lucky," he told e! "
"News on Tuesday at the New York Premiere of the blind."
"We're going to remarry on Friday." "There will be people at the door now," chimed Hilaria! "Of course, Alec tries to cover up his mistakes."
"I'm sorry."
"I shouldn't have said that I mean remarried? "



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Until the lawsuit is (possibly) refiled, Usher seems to be celebrating.”
“Back in 2012, the singer settled for $1.1 million after a woman accused him of infecting her with herpes.”
“Usher has previously been in a similar situation.”
“The encounter allegedly took place back in 2014.”
“Sharpton claims that she and Usher had "sexual contact" at a Days Inn in Atlantic City.”
“Quantasia Sharpton has also accused Usher of potentially exposing her to herpes.”
“Usher's Georgia Accuser in Herpes Lawsuit Reveals Her Identity https://t.co/pBJqhae6Rd — TMZ (@TMZ) September 21, 2017So, a brand new lawsuit will probably be filed in the coming days and weeks.”
“The woman's new lawyer went ahead and dismissed the case without prejudice and "with intent to refile," TMZ reports.”
“Rather, it seems what is going on is that the woman accusing Usher, whose name is Laura Helm, was unsatisfied with her attorney.”
“But Usher isn't in the clear yet.”


"Arthur seems to be celebrating until the lawsuit is (possibly) reopened."
"Back in 2012, after a woman accused him of herpes, the singer settled for $1.1 million."
"Usher has been in a similar situation before."
"It is said that this encounter took place in 2014."
Sharpton claimed she had "sexual contact" with usher at a days hotel in Atlantic City
"Quantasia Sharpton also accused usher of possible exposure to herpes."
Usher's lawsuit in Georgia revealed her identity https://t.co/pBJqhae6Rd-TMZ (@ TMZ) September 21, 2017, so a new lawsuit may be filed in the next few days and weeks. "
"The woman's new lawyer went on, dismissed the case without prejudice and" intends to re prosecute, "TMZ reported
"On the contrary, it seems that the lady named Laura helm who sued Arthur is not satisfied with her lawyer."
"But Arthur hasn't arrived yet."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since October 2016, Casey has been in a relationship with actress Floriana Lima, 36.”
“The pair tied-the-knot in 2006 - and had performed together in the 2000 film Committed and a 2002 stage production of This Is Our Youth.”
“(Image: Splash News)"She was going out with someone else and I said, 'Man, she's cute,' and [Joaquin] said, 'You should see if she'll go out with you… don't worry about that dude,’” Casey told The Daily Beast in 2013.”
“The soon-to-be-ex-husband and wife originally began dating back in 1999 - when Summer was in a relationship with someone else, but her brother Joaquin encouraged Casey to pursue her.”
“Summer and Casey have two sons together - 13-year-old Indiana and nine-year-old Atticus.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America) (Image: PA)The news comes two years after the couple separated - although they only made their separation public in 2016.”
“News, Summer has cited “irreconcilable differences” as the reason for wanting a divorce.”
“According to E!”
“However it was only on Monday that Summer officially filed for divorce from her husband.”
“The 41-year-old Oscar winner (and younger brother of Ben Affleck) and 38-year-old actress Summer (the younger sister of Joaquin and the late River Phoenix) split in 2015.”


"Since October 2016, Casey has had a relationship with actress Floriana Lima, 36."
"They got married in 2006 - they performed together in the film promise in 2000 and the stage play this is our youth in 2002."
(picture: splash News) "she's dating people, and I say, 'man, she's cute,' (Hua Jin) says, 'you should see if she's going to date you Don't worry about that guy, "Casey told the Daily Beast in 2013
"The relationship between the soon to be ex husband and wife started in 1999, when summers was having a relationship with someone else, but her brother Huajin encouraged Kathy to pursue her."
"Summers and Casey have two sons together - Indiana, 13, and Atticus, 9."
"(photo source: Getty Images North America) (photo source: PA) the news came two years after the couple separated - although they only publicly separated in 2016."
According to sources, summers used "irreconcilable differences" as a reason for divorce
"According to e!"
"However, it was not until Monday that Xia formally filed for divorce with her husband."
"The 41 year old Oscar winner (Ben Affleck's younger brother) and 38 year old actress summer (Hua Jin and the sister of the late River Phoenix) split up in 2015."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...tummy will be wearing And although the new baby s sex is a nice bonus what Alba was most looking forward to about caring for an infant one more time has everything to do with those first moments of new motherhood...”
“You showed up a few days early but we couldn’t be any happier.”“Your Mamma is the strongest woman I know … you’re so lucky to have her by your side,” he added.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Jessica Alba announced her third child on the way in July, revealing in October that she and husband Cash Warren would be expecting their first sonCash Warren is no longer the lone male in his and Jessica Alba‘s household!”
“The spouses of nine years welcomed their third child and first son, Hayes Alba Warren, on Sunday, Dec. 31, Alba announced on Instagram Monday alongside the first photo of her baby boy shared to social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The newest member of the family joins Alba and Warren’s two daughters: Haven Garner, 6, and Honor Marie, 9½.”
““Hayes Alba Warren 12/31/17 Best gift to ring in the New Year!”
“!” wrote the actress.”
““Cash and I feel so blessed.”


“… The belly will wear, although the gender of the new baby is a good reward, Alba is most looking forward to taking care of a baby, again and again, everything has something to do with the first moment of the new mother... "
"You came a few days earlier, but we couldn't be happier." "Your mother is the strongest woman I know You're lucky to have her by your side, "he added
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
Jessica Alba announced her third child in July and revealed in October that she and her husband, KASH Warren, would expect their first son, KASH Warren, to be no longer the only male in his and Jessica Alba's family! "
On Sunday, December 31, Alba announced on instagram that the 9-year-old couple had their third child and their first son, Hayes Alba Warren, and her first baby boy photo was shared with social media
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"New members of the family have joined alba and Warren's two daughters: six-year-old HARVIN Garner and nine-and-a-half-year-old honorary Mary."
"Hayes Alba Warren 12 / 31 / 17 New Year's best gift ring!"
"!" the actress wrote. "
"Cash and I feel lucky."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Video kiriman WorldstarHipHop (@worldstar) pada Mei 28, 2016 pada 9:59 PDT”
“"No I don't man, I'm protecting you," PND responded.”
“Jun 1, 2016AceShowbiz - Things between Kylie Jenner and PARTYNEXTDOOR seem to be heating up.”
“The two fueled rumors that they're dating after they were caught getting cozy at Drake's Memorial Day house party on Monday, May 30.”
“A woman who also attended the party took to social media to reveal that the 18-year-old star and the Canadian rapper got affectionate during the party.”
“She said that the two were acting like a couple as they mingled with some friends.”
“At one point, the "Keeping Up with the Kardashians" star and the 22-year-old musician were seen kissing and making out.”
“"They were all over each other, kissing and making out," said the source.”
“"It was almost like she was trying to make a statement."”
“Another source told HollywoodLife.com, "Kylie was cute.”


"Video kiriman Worldstar hiphop (@ Worldstar) Pada Mei April 28, 2016 Pada 9:59 PDT"
"No, I don't know, man, I'm protecting you," PND replied
"Things seem to be heating up between Kelly Jenner and party next door on June 1, 2016."
"After the two were found to be enjoying themselves at a drake memorial day home party on Monday, May 30, there were rumors that they were dating."
"A woman who also attended the party revealed on social media that the 18-year-old star and Canadian rapper were affectionate during the party."
"She said the two acted like a couple in their relationship with some friends."
"Once, someone saw the" follow Kardashian "star kissing the 22-year-old musician."
"They kiss and make out with each other," the source said
"It's like she wants to make a statement."
Another source told the reporter that "Kelly is very cute."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In any case, you can watch the announcement video and original film trailer for yourself below.”
“Ouch.”
“We want to make it clear to the fans that Norman is NOT creatively involved or collaborating on this project.”
“...consult with us in advance...”
“Another section also clarified that we are still going to be making the 3rd film for you too but only after we get the tv series up and running while GossipCop reportedly got a bleak assessment from Reedus representation Troy Duffy put out this video and did not speak or...”
“Sometimes, good things do come on small(er) screens.”
“And who knows… maybe they pop by from time to time in the TV Series.”
“Norman and Sean absolutely will be back for the 3rd film and are aware of this television reboot of the brand.”
“The Christopher Nolan with Christian Bale version, if you will pardon the analogy.”
“Batman with Michael Keaton The Boondock Saints Origins will be its own stand alone reboot of the franchise...”


"In any case, you can watch the announcement video and original movie trailer below."
"Ouch."
"We want our fans to understand that Norman is not creatively involved in or collaborating with this project."
“… Consult with us in advance... "
"Another part also clarifies that we will still make a third film for you, but only after we start and run the TV series, and it is reported that gossip got a dim assessment from the Reedus representative office. Troy Duffy released the video, but did not speak or..."
"Sometimes, good things appear on the small screen."
"Who knows Maybe they appear from time to time in TV series. "
"Norman and Sean will definitely come back to see the third film, and they know that the brand's TV is restarted."
"The version of Christopher Nolan and Christian bell, with all due respect."
"Batman and Michael Keaton's Boondock Saints origin will be their own independent restart franchise..."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[H/T Entertainment Weekly]”
“"I got to lie on a rock with my hair strewn, and blood," Kidman pointed out.”
“The new issue of Entertainment Weekly offers our first look at Nicole Kidman's character in the film, Queen Atlanna, alongside Momoa and Amber Heard as Mera.”
“Check out the cover below.”
“(Photo: Entertainment Weekly)Atlanna debuted in 1959's Adventure Comics #260, which focused on the early years of Arthur Curry.”
“The comic depicted Atlanna getting washed ashore by a hurricane, ultimately falling in love with lighthouse keeper Tom Curry, resulting in Arthur's birth.”
“It's unclear exactly how closely to her comics origins the film will stick, though Kidman has professed her enthusiasm over the experience.”
“"I got to be [like] a mermaid!"”
“Kidman revealed to The Hollywood Reporter last year.”
“"I got to be a queen, I got to wear a crown...I have a particular way of looking."”


"[H / T Entertainment Weekly]"
"I had to lie on a rock with my hair strewn and blood all over," Kidman pointed out
"The new issue of entertainment weekly lets us see for the first time Nicole Kidman's role in the film, Queen atrana, as well as Mora and amber as Myra."
"Look at the cover below."
(photo source: Entertainment Weekly) Atlana made her debut in 1959's adventure cartoon 260, which is mainly about Arthur Curry's early life
The cartoon depicts Atlantis being washed ashore by a hurricane and finally falling in love with lighthouse keeper Tom curry. Arthur is born
"It's not clear how close the film will be to her comic book background, but Kidman has said she's passionate about the experience."
"I have to be like a mermaid!"
"Kidman told Hollywood reporters last year."
"I have to be queen, I have to wear a crown I have a special look



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They will apparently be “trading insults, put-downs, and breakup songs for a long time to come.””
“AdvertisementSources say that the divorce deeply shook both Miranda Lambert and Blake Shelton and it doesn’t appear either one will ever get over it.”
“Even though rumors are swirling he is ready to wed Gwen Stefani, Shelton has been throwing shade at Lambert online.”
“And, according to industry insiders, the feud between the country superstars is escalating.”
“But, Lambert isn’t going to quietly put up with Shelton’s attacks anymore.”
“After the news of Lambert’s new relationship broke, Shelton posted a cryptic tweet about karma, and sources say it was exactly what everyone thought it was – a direct shot at Lambert.”
“And, it appears that The Voice coach is getting a lot of joy out of Lambert’s embarrassment because for him this is personal.”
“@blakeshelton #countrymusicfreakstour gx A post shared by Gwen Stefani (@gwenstefani) on Mar 14, 2018 at 3:28pm PDT“Blake is reveling in Miranda’s humiliation now that she’s been accused of having an affair with a married man because he believes she cheated on him,” claims the insider.”
“Even though they have been apart for three years, sources say the feud continues between Shelton and Lambert, and he believes that she will never change.”
“The 41-year-old believes in the “once a cheater always a cheater” theory.”


Obviously, they will "trade insulting, demeaning and breaking up songs for a long time"
"The source of the advertisement said that the divorce deeply shocked Miranda Lambert and Blake Sheldon. It seems that neither of them can overcome it."
"Despite rumors that Sheldon is ready to marry Gwen Stefani, he has been casting a shadow over Lambert online."
"Moreover, according to the industry, the grudge between the country stars is escalating."
"But Lambert will no longer endure Sheldon's attack in silence."
"After the news of Lambert's new love affair came out, Sheldon tweeted a mysterious message about karma. The source said that it was just what everyone thought - shooting Lambert directly."
"Also, the voice coach seems to get a lot of fun out of Lambert's embarrassment because it's personal to him."
"A post shared by @ blakeshelton#countrymusicfreaktour GX Gwen Stefani (@ gwenstefani) at 3:28 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time on March 14, 2018" Blake was intoxicated by Miranda's humiliation because she was accused of having an affair with a married man because he thought she had cheated him, "the insider claimed
"Although they have been separated for three years, the source said the feud between Sheldon and Lambert continues and he believes she will never change."
"At 41, he believes in the theory that" once cheaters are always cheaters. "



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"He would like to be able to spend time with Sofia when he is with his kids and even have her featured on KUWTK."”
“(Image: Kourtney Kardashian/Instagram)"Scott is convinced that if he can get Kris to approve of him dating Sofia, then maybe the rest of the family will follow.”
“(Image: E!)”
“Hollywood Life says: "Scott has been sweet talking Kris constantly telling her all the wonderful qualities of Sofia, trying to get Kris more on board and accepting of their relationship.”
“It’s reported that Scott is hoping that Sofia can make appearances on the family show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, in the future.”
“(Image: Instagram)However, while Sofia did not make an appearance, Kourtney's toyboy boyfriend, 24-year-old Younes Benjima was in attendance.”
“Scott was in attendance despite no longer being with his ex-girlfriend of nine years, Kourtney Kardashian, with whom he shares three children, Mason, eight, Penelope, five, and three year old Reign.”
“However, the teen daughter of Lionel Richie was notably missing from Kris Jenner’s annual Christmas Eve bash, with it rumoured that she was snubbed from the guest list.”
“(Image: Getty)Scott and Sofia began dating in September and even spent Christmas together.”
“"Scott is hopeful that if Sofia is allowed into the family, his life will get easier and it will create more opportunity for them as a couple."”


"When he's with the kids, he wants to be with Sophia and even make her appear in Kuyt."
(photo: Kourtney Kardashian / instagram) "Scott is convinced that if he can get Kris to agree to his date with Sophia, the rest of the family may follow him."
"(image: e!)"
Hollywood Life said: "Scott has been sweet mouthed and Chris has been telling her all the wonderful qualities of Sophia, trying to get Chris more board and accept their relationship."
"It's reported that Scott hopes Sophia will appear on the family show in the future to catch up with the kardashians."
"(photo: instagram) however, although Sofia did not show up, Courtney's toy boyfriend, 24-year-old yones benjima, also attended
Scott attended the wedding despite breaking up with his ex girlfriend of nine years, Kourtney Kardashian. Courtney and Courtney Kardashian have three children, Mason, eight, Penelope, five and three
"However, Lionel Richie's teenage daughter apparently disappeared at Kris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party, and there are rumors that she was left out on the guest list."
(photo: Getty) Scott and Sophia started dating in September and even spent Christmas together
"Scott hopes that if Sophia is allowed into the family, his life will become easier, which will create more opportunities for them as a couple."



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoomCarrie Underwood and Mike FisherEarlier this month, she shared sweet photos of herself working out with Fisher and their son Isaiah Michael, who turns 3 this month.”
“The American Idol alum has been keeping her fans posted on her progress, however, and Fisher has been by his wife’s side during her recovery.”
“...to her face...”
“RELATED VIDEO Carrie Underwood Looked Amazing Posing for Photo With Below DeckAlum One Month After Fall The Blown Away singer has been staying under the radar since she had a hard fall on the steps outside their home in November leaving her with a broken wrist and around 50 stitches...”
“See if there is any offensive way in me, and lead me in the way everlasting.”Though their relationship is going strong, Underwood and Fisher — who wed in 2010 — have indeed had a trying few months.”
“Thanks,” the athlete responded after a fan wrote that she was “praying for you and Carrie.”Fisher’s post was a passage taken from the Bible, reading: “Search me, God, and know my heart; test me and know my anxious thoughts.”
““We’ve never been better.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The country superstar, 34, and the hockey player, 37, were hit with split rumors last week, but Fisher addressed the speculation on his Instagram account over the weekend.”
“Fisher set the record straight about his marriage to Carrie Underwood, saying the couple have "never been better"Carrie Underwood's Husband Mike Fisher Hits Back at Split Rumors: 'We've Never Been Better'Carrie Underwood and Mike Fisher‘s marriage is just fine, thank you very much.”


Earlier this month, she shared with Fischer and their son Isaiah Michael sweet photos of her exercising with Fischer, who turns three this month
"The American Idol alumnus has been keeping her fans focused on her progress, but Fisher has been with his wife during her recovery."
“… In her face... "
"Related video Carrie Underwood looks amazing when she takes a picture with deckalum a month later in the fall. Since November last year, he fell on the doorstep of their house, broke his wrist and sewed about 50 stitches, the singer, who was blown away by the wind, has been receiving much attention. "
"See if there is any offence in me, and lead me to the eternal road." Despite the fact that their relationship is going well, Underwood and Fisher - who got married in 2010 - have indeed gone through months of ordeal
"Thank you," the athlete replied after a fan wrote that she "prayed for you and Carrie.". "Fisher's post is an excerpt from the Bible, which reads:" God, please search me and understand my heart; test me and understand my anxious thoughts. "
"We've never been better."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 34 year old country superstar and 37 year old hockey player were rumored to be split last week, but Fisher talked about it on his instagram account last weekend."
"Fischer said frankly about her marriage to Kelly Underwood, saying that the couple" have never been better than they are now. "Kelly Underwood's husband, Mike Fischer, retorted the split rumor:" we have never been better than we are now. "Kelly Underwood and Mike Fischer's marriage is very good. Thank you very much."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I think as long as you keep remembering who you are as a person — and keep remembering the good and the good around you — then nothing can stop you.””
““That can make you change and feel guarded or shut down and weird.”
““Once you obtain a certain level of success, you can become jaded and you can see certain people around you change,” she said.”
“In addition to spilling the tea, Aguilera shared some advice with the aspiring drag performers.”
“The “Genie in a Bottle” singer is currently engaged to longtime love Matthew Rutler.”
“After her split from Santos, whom she described as her “first love,” Aguilera married Jordan Bratman, from whom she split in 2010.”
“...track was inspired by her ex boyfriend dancer Jorge Santos whom she dated for two years...”
“When discussing the inspiration behind her 2002 song Infatuation on RuPaul s Drag Race Untucked on Thursday she admitted It was heartbreaking because I found out he played for your team not mine Aguilera 37 didn t reveal her muse s name but she previously told MTV News that the...”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Christina Aguilera was infatuated with a guy who was into guys.”


"But I don't think anything can stop you as long as you always remember that you are a person - the good people and the good people around you."
"It makes you change, feel protected or shut down, it's strange."
"Once you get a certain degree of success, you get bored and you can see that someone around you is changing," she said
"In addition to splashing tea, Aguilera also shared some suggestions with aspiring drag performers."
"Spirit in the bottle" singer is currently engaged to Matthew rutler, who has been in love for a long time
After breaking up with Santos, Aguilera called Santos her "first love" and married Jordan bratmann in 2010
“… The song was inspired by her ex boyfriend dancer Jorge Santos, who she dated for two years
"When it comes to the inspiration in her 2002 song" infatuated with rupaul ", she admits that it's very sad because I found that he played for your team, not my team. Aguilera 37 didn't disclose the name of her muse, but she told MTV News before..."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Christina Aguilera is infatuated with a boy who likes boys."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Harry was still a prince," says Nicholl, "and it wasn't the life Chels wanted."”
“While Nicholl writes the pair still had "deep feelings" for one another, Davy still knew she wasn't ready for life in The Firm, the cheeky name Harry and brother Prince William use for their family.”
“But while their rendezvous was romantic, it wasn't the start of lasting union.”
“So when Harry – in Africa for his philanthropic work – asked her to meet up in Cape Town, she agreed.”
“By the summer of 2015, Davy was fresh out of a romance with jeweler Charles Goode.”
“In an effort to mend it, Harry turned back to his other serious love.”
“"I think she really broke his heart."”
“He was in love with her and he tried to convince her they could make it work, but Cressida's mind was made up," says Nicholl.”
“"Harry didn't want things to end.”
“Despite Harry's best efforts, he couldn't convince her to restart it.”


"Harry is still a prince," Nicole said. "It's not the life that Cher wants."
Nicole wrote that although the two still have "deep feelings" for each other, David still knows that she is not ready to live in the company, and that Harry and the Prince William brothers call their families by this cheeky name
"But while their date is romantic, it's not the beginning of a lasting union."
"So when Harry was doing charity in Africa, he invited her to meet in Cape Town and she agreed."
"By the summer of 2015, David had just broken up with jeweler Charles Goode."
"To make up for that, Harry went back to his other serious lover."
"I think she really broke his heart."
"He fell in love with her and he tried to convince her that they could make it work, but cresida's decision," Nicole said
"Harry didn't want it to end."
"Despite Harry's best efforts, he couldn't persuade her to start over."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Angelina Jolie has remained single ever since.”
“Jolie famously filed for divorce last September, with reports at the time claiming that Pitt’s alcohol addiction had gotten so out of hand, it was beginning to affect everyone’s life around him, including his own family.”
“Magazine‘s claims, Gossip Cop‘s sources question the credibility of the outlet’s insiders, insisting that the story regarding Angelina Jolie’s weight loss is far from true.”
“Despite OK!”
“Angelina Jolie has yet to finalize her divorce from Brad Pitt, as the couple continues to work out a custody plan with visitation rights that they are both in agreement with.”
“A statement regarding new claims about her unhealthy food intake will most likely not be addressed by the actress, for she has stayed away from even commenting on anything that concerns her weight.”
“Angelina Jolie has never shied away from her dark past, which consisted of multiple health issues, but she has never commented on people’s recent concerns regarding her weight loss.”
“Magazine is simply through the way that the mother of six has been treating herself as of late.”
“Whatever the case may be, it’s evidently clear that Angelina Jolie has been losing weight, which sources tell OK!”
“Brad Pitt...”


"Angelina Jolie has been single ever since."
"Julie was famous for her divorce in September last year when it was reported that Pete's addiction to alcohol was out of control and began to affect the lives of everyone around him, including his own family."
Gossip police sources questioned the credibility of the company's insiders, insisting that reports about Angelina Jolie's weight loss were far from true
"All right!"
Angelina Jolie has yet to divorce Brad Pitt because the couple are still working on a custody plan and both sides agree on visitation rights
"A new statement about her unhealthy food intake is likely not to be mentioned by the actress because she didn't even comment on anything about weight."
"Angelina Jolie has never avoided her dark past, including a number of health issues, but she has never commented on recent concerns about her weight loss."
"Magazines are just a way in which mothers of six have been treating themselves lately."
"Whatever the situation, it's clear that Angelina Jolie has been losing weight, and the source tells us it's OK!"
"Brad Pitt..."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And this week - not long after the five-year mark had passed since Katie filed for divorce on June 29 2012 - she finally went public with Jamie Foxx.”
“(Image: Reuters) (Image: XPOSUREPHOTOS.COM)The settlement also reportedly contained “iron-clad” rulings that Suri would not be made a member of the controversial Church of Scientology, where Tom holds a high rank.”
“...open secret in Hollywood...”
“But while the public were wondering why it took them so long to confirm their relationship, it seems to stem back to her five-year marriage to Tom Cruise.”
“Much has been reported about their bizarre divorce - and how Katie literally fled the country to get herself and daughter Suri away - but the actress has never spoken publicly about life as part of TomKat.”
“Here we look back at the bizarre claims surrounding Tom s marriage rules for his wife Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now Scientology elders audition for wives Image Eyevine After Tom s divorce from second wife...”
“Nicole Kidman he began getting more into Scientology the religious organisation he was introduced to by first wife Mimi Rogers in the late 1980s...”
“And there have been claims that Katie - who fancied Tom as a teenager - wasn't the Mission Impossible star's first pick.”
“According to the controversial book Going Clear: Scientology, Hollywood and the Prison Belief by Lawrence Wright, Tom invited Scientology elders to hold screen tests to find his next wife - a claim which the church's lawyers have denied.”
“But the author claimed a number of eligible Hollywood women were 'auditioned' by the church for the role of Tom's next spouse, including Lindsay Lohan, Scarlett Johansson and Jessica Alba.”


"This week, five years after Katie filed for divorce on June 29, 2012, she finally made it public with Jamie fox."
"(source: Reuters) (source: Reuters) Exposurephotos.COM According to the report, the settlement agreement also contains a "rock solid" ruling that Suri will not become a member of the controversial Church of Scientology, where Tom has a high status. "
“… Hollywood's open secret... "
"But when the public is wondering why it took them so long to confirm their relationship, it seems to go back to her five-year marriage to Tom Cruise."
"There have been a lot of reports about their bizarre divorce and how Katie fled the country to let herself and her daughter Suri go, but the actress has never talked publicly about her life as part of Tom Kate."
"Here, let's review the bizarre statement about Tom's wife's marriage rules. Video loading is not available. Click play. Click play will play the video automatically soon. 8. Cancel playing now. Now, after Tom divorced his second wife..."
"Nicole Kidman, who was introduced to Scientology by his first wife, Mimi Rogers, in the late 1980s, began to get more involved in this religious organization..."
"It's also said that Katie - who imagines Tom as a teenager - is not the first choice for impossible task."
"According to Lawrence Wright's controversial book going to the light: Scientology, Hollywood and the prison faith Clear:Socktology Tom invited the elders of Scientology to do a screen test to find their next wife, a claim denied by church lawyers
"But the author claims that some eligible Hollywood women have been taught to" audition "as Tom's next spouse, including Lindsay Lohan, Scarlett Johnson and Jessica Alba."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jordan reveals, "He is very happy with her.”
“Former Real Housewives of Atlanta star, and a friend of Foxx's, Claudia Jordan, lets a little too much info about her friend's relationship slip while appearing on a podcast.”
“August 2013: Foxx and Holmes are seen dancing together in the Hamptons.”
“CBS reports that Cruise is blindsided by the divorce, and tells a German television station, "I didn't expect it."”
“Please allow them their privacy."”
“...which says, "Kate has filed for divorce and Tom is deeply saddened and is concentrating on his three children.”
“Cruise's rep releases a statement (reported via Yahoo!)”
“June 29, 2012: Holmes files for divorce from Tom Cruise.”
“She is seen chatting to Foxx on the field, who is clearly an acquaintance, as she attends the game with Cruise.”
“Getty ImagesHolmes attends a football game between the Minnesota Vikings and the Washington Redskins on September 11, 2006 in Maryland.”


"He was very happy with her," Jordan said
Claudia Jordan, a former Atlanta star housewife and a friend of fox, revealed too much about her friendship in the podcast
"August 2013: Fox and Holmes dance together in Hampton."
CBS reported that cruise was blindly divorcing and told a German television station, "I didn't expect that."
"Please allow their privacy."
“…… It says, "Kate has filed for divorce. Tom is very sad and is concentrating on taking care of his three children."
A representative of cruise issued a statement (via Yahoo) "
"June 29, 2012: Holmes filed for divorce with Tom Cruise."
"When she was playing with cruise, she chatted with Fox on the court. Fox was obviously an acquaintance."
On September 11, 2006, in Maryland, Getty imesherms played in a football match between the Minnesota Vikings and the Washington Redskins



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Little did I know it would become my turn to say no.”
“He had said yes.”
“At the same time, it was unimaginable for a Mexican actress to aspire to a place in Hollywood.”
“...into the mainstream...”
“In the 14 years that I stumbled from schoolgirl to Mexican soap star to an extra in a few American films to catching a couple of lucky breaks in Desperado and Fools Rush In Harvey Weinstein had become the wizard of a new wave of cinema that took original content...”
“Well, not anymore.”
“...can do anything he wants to women...”
“I am inspired by those who had the courage to speak out especially in a society that elected a president who has been accused of sexual harassment and assault by more than a dozen women and whom we have all heard make a statement about how a man in power...”
“We are finally becoming conscious of a vice that has been socially accepted and has insulted and humiliated millions of girls like me, for in every woman there is a girl.”
“I felt that by now nobody would care about my pain — maybe this was an effect of the many times I was told, especially by Harvey, that I was nobody.”


"I don't know it's my turn to say no."
"He said yes."
"At the same time, it's hard to imagine a Mexican actress yearning for a place in Hollywood."
“… Into the mainstream... "
"In the past 14 years, I've gone from a schoolgirl to a Mexican soap opera star, to an extras in several American movies, to seizing a few lucky opportunities in Outlaws and dunce. Harvey Weinstein has become a wizard in the new wave of movies, and the movies have adopted original content..."
"Well, not anymore."
“… He can do anything to women... "
"I am encouraged that those who have the courage to express their opinions, especially in a society where a president has been elected, who has been accused of sexual harassment and abuse by more than a dozen women, have all heard that he has published a report on how a person in power can..."
"We finally realized that a bad habit has been accepted, insulted and humiliated millions of girls like me, because every woman has a girl."
"I don't think anyone cares about my pain right now - maybe it's because I've been told many times, especially Harvey, that I'm nobody."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The actress captioned a photo from their shoot, "Always a great time with this love bug @vanessahudgens #stooplife#ShootinginNYC.””
“Jennifer, Marc and Alex have remained friendly – joining each other in the Dominican Republic last year.”
“On Friday, May 4, the World of Dance judge dined with boyfriend Alex Rodriguez and her ex-husband Marc Anthony.”
“The trio enjoyed breakfast at Miami hot spot Greenstreet Cafe in the Coconut Grove area.”
“The trio kept their outing low key, with the help of two bodyguards.”
“The group also kept their meal healthy – munching on some of the eatery’s prime dishes including, egg whites, egg white veggie omelettes, the spinach and feta omelette, turkey bacon and avocado.”
“After their meal, Jennifer and Alex left together, while the Vivir Mi Vida singer left in a separate car.”
“Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez dined with Marc Anthony in Miami Photo: The Grosby GroupMORE: Jennifer Lopez is proud to take on this role for Alex Rodriguez's daughtersJennifer and Marc, who were married from 2004-2014, share ten-year-old twins Max and Emme.”
“Alex is father to daughters Natasha, 12, and Ella, nine.”
“In June, the El Anillo singer opened up about the possibility of blending her modern family for Father’s Day.”


The actress added a title to one of their photos: "it's always nice to shoot with this bug in New York."
"Jennifer, mark and Alex have always been friendly - joined in the Dominican Republic last year."
"On Friday, May 4, the judges of dance world had dinner with their boyfriends Alex Rodriguez and ex husband Mark Anthony."
"The three have breakfast at the Miami hotspots GREENSTREET cafe in coconut grove."
"With the help of two bodyguards, the three went on a low-key trip."
The group also kept their diet healthy - munching on some of the restaurant's best dishes, including protein, protein vegetable fried eggs, spinach and goat's milk eggs, turkey bacon and avocado
"After dinner, Jennifer and Alex left together, while vivil Mi Vader's singer left in another car."
"Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are having dinner with Mark Anthony in Miami. Photo: Groby group photo: Jennifer Lopez is very proud to play this role for Alex Rodriguez's daughter. Jennifer and mark, who married in 2004-2014, have 10-year-old twins Max and Amy."
"Alex is the father of two daughters, Natasha, 12, and Ella, 9."
"In June, Al anillo's singer publicly said it was possible to bring her modern family together on father's day."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If this is true, then her doctor actually did a great job.”
“Beyonce’s nose was believed to have been narrowed down with a carefully planned nose surgery and its tip was expertly refined.”
“But one top surgeon, Anthony Youn of the American Society of Plastic Surgeons, assessed that Beyonce did have breast surgery that made her boobs look naturally rounder and bustier.”
“Arguably, however, a woman’s bra size can change naturally due to hormones and weight gain.”
“Beyonce’s breasts definitely look larger and fuller now than before, as seen in these photos.”
“Did Beyonce Have Boob Job?”
“This should tell us whether there’s any beauty “SECRETS” behind her perfect looks all these years.”
“Before & After PhotosIn order to find out whether Beyonce had any cosmetic procedures, we will go over her photos before and after she became famous.”
“So, has that time finally arrived?”
“When her star power was just coming into the radar, in her early 20s, Beyonce did say that she was not OK with cosmetic surgery, but she also added that she could change her mind when she’s older.”


"If that's true, then her doctors are actually doing very well."
"Beyonce's nose is believed to have shrunk after a well planned nose operation and the tip of her nose has been professionally retouched."
But Anthony youn, a top surgeon at the American Society of plastic surgery, estimates that Beyonce did have breast surgery to make her breasts look rounder and fuller
"However, it can be said that a woman's bra size changes naturally due to hormones and weight gain."
"From these photos, we can see that Beyonce's chest is definitely bigger and fuller than before."
"Has Beyonce had breast augmentation?"
"This should tell us whether there is a beautiful 'secret' behind her perfect appearance over the years."
"In order to find out if Beyonce has had plastic surgery, we will carefully examine the photos before and after she became famous."
"Is time at last, then?"
"When she was in her early 20s, the power of the star just came into people's eyes. Beyonce did say that she was not suitable for plastic surgery, but she also added that when she grew up, she could change her mind."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kidman also has two children with ex Tom Cruise.”
“DURING HER MARRIAGE TO TOM CRUISE The reason it started at the beginning was because I didn t know how to text and it just kind of worked for us...”
“Kidman told Parade Magazine on Sunday that she and Urban don’t text each other at all – even after their long-lasting marriage.”
“Kidman said they call each other instead.”
““We’ve done this since the very beginning.”
“The reason it started at the beginning was because I didn’t know how to text and it just kind of worked for us.”
“So now we don’t,” Kidman told Parade.”
““We just do voice to voice or skin to skin, as we always say.”
“We talk all the time and we FaceTime but we just don’t text because I feel like texting can be misrepresentative at times.”
“And I ve had the thing where I reread texts and I m like What does that mean and then read it to somebody and go Can you interpret that I don t want that between my lover and I NICOLE KIDMAN REVEALS HER MASSIVE GRIEF AFTER HAVING A MISCARRIAGE”


"Kidman and former Tom Cruise have two children."
"In her marriage to Tom Cruise, it started because I didn't know how to text, which worked for us..."
"Kidman told Parade magazine on Sunday that she and urban don't text at all - even after their long marriage."
"Kidman said they would call each other."
"We did it from the beginning."
"I did it in the beginning because I didn't know how to text, which worked for us."
"So now we don't need it," Kidman told pared
"We just do sound to sound or skin to skin, because we always say."
"We chat all the time, but we just don't send text messages, because I think sending text messages can sometimes be misinformation."
"I've had this experience before. I reread the text, I think what it means, and then read it to others, and then go. Can you explain that I don't want my wife and I to share Nicole Kidman's great grief after her abortion?"



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““No matter how desperately she tries, Danny won’t be bought of — even with his own beach!”For more on this story, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
““As beautiful as Little Dume is, riding the same waves can get monotonous, so the novelty will probably be short-lived and he’ll still have an itch to go to exotic locations with his wave-riding buddies,” the insider says.”
“Julia Roberts made a very pricey purchase in an attempt to save her marriage to husband Danny Moder, an insider exclusively tells In Touch.”
“According to the source, the A-list actress, 49, bought Danny, 48, his own private surf shack in Malibu, CA, so that he spends more time at home with their family.”
“In June 2016, Julia — whose main home is a $10 million Craftsman-style house atop a bluf in the seaside enclave’s tony Point Dume neighborhood — previously bought the $6.84 million house directly across the street, so that nannies and visiting family members could have a place to stay.”
“However, as In Touch has previously reported, it has become a refuge for the Pretty Woman star’s cinematographer hubby — especially when the two were fighting.”
“MORE: Julia Roberts’ Children Are All Grown Up — See What They Look Like Now!”
“Well this past June Julia who married Danny in 2002 shelled out 3 9 million for a 1 600 square foot ranch house just down the road that a friend says is basically a tear down While the pad may not be fancy it comes with a deeded key to...”
“...the gates leading to one of Malibu s best most idyllic and private surf spots known as Little Dume the perfect gift for her surf enthusiast husband...”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images)“She’s hoping that the purchase of the most expensive surf shack in Malibu will help her marriage by keeping Danny from going away on extended surf trips,” the source tells In Touch.”


"No matter how hard she tries, Denny won't be bought - even if he has his own beach! "To learn more about this story, check out the latest issue of contact at the newsstand!"
"Although young dum is beautiful, he will become monotonous when riding the same storm, so the novelty is likely to be short-lived. He will still be eager to go to foreign countries with his storm partners," the insider said
"Julia Roberts made a very expensive deal to save her marriage to her husband, Denny Maud," an insider told contact exclusively
"According to sources, the 49 year old A-level actress has bought 48 year old Denny's own private surfing cabin in Malibu, California, to give him more time to stay at home with her family."
"In June 2016, Julia's main home was a $10 million craftsman style house on the roof of a building in the seaside enclave of Tony point dume community. She had bought the $6.84 million house directly, so that nannies and visiting families could have a place to live."
"However, as previously reported by contact, it became a refuge for the photographer's husband - especially when they were fighting."
"More: Julia Roberts' children have grown up - look what they look like now!"
"In the past June, Julia spent $3.9 million on a 1600 square foot farm house. At the end of the road, a friend said it was basically a dilapidated house, and the mat might not be able to imagine that it had an authenticated key..."
“…… The gate to one of Malibu's best idyllic private surfing resorts, known as little dum, is the perfect gift for her surfer husband... "
"(photo source: Getty Images)" she hopes that buying Malibu's most expensive surfing cabin will help her marriage and prevent Denny from leaving during a long surfing trip, "the source told touch



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They had different ideas on where to liveAniston and Theroux’s general differences were major factors in their split, but their inability to agree on where to live ultimately drove them apart.”
“6.”
“For starters, couples will normally share a little birthday love for their spouse, but Theroux stayed silent on Aniston’s 49th birthday on Feb. 11, 2018.”
“There were some warning signsRumors had been circulating about their marriage being on the rocks, and granted, there were a few warning signs.”
“2.”
“Next: We could see it coming for these reasons.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else’s fictional narrative.”
“Normally we would do this privately, but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent, we wanted to convey the truth directly.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”


"They have different ideas about where Aniston lives, and the common differences in seru are the main factors leading to their breakup, but they can't agree on where to live, which eventually leads to their parting ways."
“6.”
"First of all, couples usually share a little birthday present for their spouse, but on February 11, 2018, on Aniston's 49th birthday, Cyrus kept silent."
"There are signs that their marriage is in danger, and there are signs, of course."
“2.”
"Next step: for these reasons, we can see it coming."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
"Anything printed about us, not directly from us, is someone else's fiction."
"Normally, we do it in private, but as the gossip industry can't resist the opportunities of speculation and invention, we want to convey the truth directly."
"We are two best friends and decided to go our separate ways, but we are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For what it’s worth, Gossip Cop debunks this and says that Garner’s rep maintains that she’s single.”
“I’m here for it, but the details are too vague at this point.”
“The man had his arm around her but it didn’t look romantic and was more like a side hug as they walked.”
“According to the National Enquirer, Garner has been seeing a lawyer and it’s so serious that she’s introduced him to her family in West Virginia.”
“She allegedly did this over the holidays, which means she’s been with him for a while.”
“There’s no mention in the article if it’s the same guy from the photos or if he’s met her kids.”
“Jennifer Garner… introduced her new lawyer beau to family members during a New Year’s weekend in Montana… “They stayed at a private residence in Yellowstone Club,” dished the source.”
““Jen and Ben arrived with the children.”
“Ben celebrated Christmas with the kids but left to spend New Year’s with Lindsay.”
“Jen’s boyfriend and her family arrived after Ben left… “In October, Jen’s sisters wanted to set her up on a blind date with a doctor, but she refused… “Everyone thought it was because Jen wanted to stay single.”


"It's worth mentioning that the gossip police exposed this and said that Ghana's representative insisted that she was single."
"I'm looking for it, but the details are too vague at the moment."
"The man hugged her, but it didn't look romantic. It was more like a side hug when they walked."
"According to the National Enquirer, Ghana has been looking for a lawyer and the matter is very serious. She introduced him to her family in West Virginia."
"It's said that she did this during the holidays, which means that she has been with him for some time."
"There's no mention in the article of the same person in the picture or the child he's met with."
"Jennifer Garner One new year's weekend in Montana, she introduced her new lawyer Bo to her family. " "They live in a private home at the Yellowstone club," the source said
"Jane and Ben are here with the children."
"Ben celebrated Christmas with the children, but left to spend the new year with Lindsay."
"Jane's boyfriend and family arrived after Ben left..." In October, Jane's sisters wanted to arrange a blind date with her doctor, but she refused... " Everybody thinks it's because Jane wants to stay single



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She can’t wait to just hold her baby girl in her arms and know that she’s safe,” OK’s insider said.”
““I wouldn’t put my baby at risk,” she said at the time.”
“Find out here what reportedly went wrong.”
“At nearly nine months pregnant, Khloe Kardashian, 33, recently experienced a health scare that “left her rattled,” according to OK!”
“...magazine.”
“While everything is ok now, and Khloe is no longer at Cedars-Sinai in LA, she’s reportedly SO shaken up that she’s reconsidering giving birth in Cleveland!”
““Word is, she suffered some pregnancy complications and had to be rushed to Cedars-Sinai in Los Angles,” an insider told the publication.”
““Everyone was worried she’d need an emergency C-section.” Click here to see pics of Khloe’s lavish baby shower.”
“The source didn’t expand on what type of complications Khloe was having, but, apparently Khloe thinks it COULD have to do with her recent trip to Japan with her sisters.”
“Although she was already eight months along, the reality star decided to fly overseas, insisting her doctor approved the entire thing.”


"She couldn't wait to hold the baby girl in her arms and knew she was safe," said an OK insider
"I will not put my children in danger," she said at the time
"Find out what's wrong here."
According to OK, Khloe Kardashian, 33, was nearly nine months pregnant and recently experienced a health scare that "upset her!"
“… Magazine. "
"It's all right now. Carol is no longer in cedars Sinai, Los Angeles. It's reported that she's very shocked. She's reconsidering childbirth in Cleveland!"
"It is reported that she suffered some pregnancy complications and had to be rushed to sidas Sinai in Los Angeles," a person familiar with the matter told the journal
"Everyone is worried that she needs an emergency C-section." Click here to see photos of Khloe's luxurious baby bathroom
"The source did not elaborate on what complications Khloe had, but it was clear that Khloe thought it might be related to her recent trip to Japan with her sisters."
"Even though she has been eight months, the reality TV star decided to fly overseas, insisting that her doctor approved the whole thing."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reagan...”
“The survey from the Pew Research Center found that 44 percent of Americans believed Obama was the best or second best president of their lifetime while 33 percent named Bill Clinton and 32 percent came out in support of Ronald...”
“Fans of the former president and first lady posted videos of the pair enjoying themselves on Instagram, with one social media user describing the moment she saw the former first couple as "the highlight of my life."”
“"The HIGHLIGHT of my life.”
“I saw my idols @barackobama and @michelleobama be normal and jam out to @beyonce and Jay-z," she wrote, posting footage of the pair dancing in what appeared to be a private box.”
“From the looks of the footage, all eyes were on Barack and Michelle, with numerous camera phones pointed at the pair to get a snap of them enjoying themselves.”
“Barack and Michelle spent their Friday night at Beyoncé and Jay-Z's On the Run II Tour in Washington, D.C., surrounded by a host of excited fans.”
“Obama is at Beyoncé s concert I wanna cry IM BREATHING THE SAME AIR AS MY PRESIDENT another social media user wrote while one excited fan added So I m at a Beyonce concert waiting for the queen and her...”
“...husband to come out and I see people turning around and losing their s h i t and o turn around and see THE”
“FUCKING.”


"Reagan..."
"A survey from the Pew Research Center found that 44% of Americans think Obama is the best or second best president in their life, 33% think Bill Clinton is the president, and 32% support Ronald..."
"Fans of the former president and first lady posted a video of them having fun on instagram, and one social media user described the moment she saw the former first couple as" the highlight of my life. "
"The best part of my life."
"I saw my idols @ BarackObama and @ micheleobama as normal, crowding into @ Beyonce and Jay-Z," she wrote, posting scenes of them dancing in a seemingly private box
"From the picture, everyone's eyes are focused on Barack and Michelle, and countless camera phones are pointing at the couple to take pictures of them enjoying themselves."
"Barack and Michelle spent Friday night at Beyonce and Jay-Z's run II tour in Washington, D.C., surrounded by excited fans."
"Obama at Beyonce's concert, I want to cry, I breathe the same air as my president, another social media user wrote, an excited fan added, so I wait for the queen and her at Beyonce's concert..."
“… When the husband comes out, I see people turning around, losing their s, I, t and O. turning around, I see
"Damn it."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I think she will fight for it."
"Jennifer has been through three failed marriages and is sad to hear Alex talking to Lauren," the person said
"On January 24, the former Yankees batter posted a picture in a few hours with a mysterious quote on it. There is nothing wrong with making a mistake. The mistake is not to try to correct it. The shadow of blue star shared a picture with a
“…… Alex gave her a big bunch of flowers... "
The next day, she uploaded a self portrait with the title "everything is in God's hands" and the label "let go and let God"
"It's directed at Alex," according to one person familiar with the matter Hollywood's hottest duet is on the verge of a hit
"On the 48th, Jennifer privately questioned her relationship with her boyfriend who has been dating for nearly a year. She learned that her boyfriend is still in contact with former flying Lauren hunter, a fitness model. In an interview last year, she said that Alex 42 had sent her sex messages for several months, including during dating..."
"Jerome..."
"Recently," someone revealed some new details to Jennifer, saying that Alex is still texting Lauren, and that's why she lost contact, "a person familiar with the matter told contact
"Of course, he says it's not physical, maybe not, but in Jennifer's book, it's still cheating."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Everyone is distraught!”We pay for juicy info!”
““But it seemed his life was slowly getting back on track, and then he almost died.”
““After everything Bobby’s gone through with Whitney [Houston] and Bobbi, he’s a nervous wreck,” said the source.”
“He hasn’t come to terms with losing his baby girl, Bobbi, and we thought this could be the final straw!”The former booze-bag and heroin addict was given a blood transfusion, and spent two days in the hospital before being released.”
““It’s a miracle Bobby didn’t die.”
“Doctors said he had just over one liter of blood left in his system,” a family source blabbed to Radar.”
““Bobby was minutes from death!”
““It really looked like the end!”The former New Edition singer, 47, was home alone when he collapsed on Dec. 19, and then drove himself to a medical center near his Tarzana, Calif., home.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Everybody's upset! "We pay for interesting information!"
"But his life seemed to be getting back on track, and then he almost died."
"After everything that went through with Whitney (Houston) and Bob, he's a neurotic loser," the source said
"He hasn't accepted the fact that he lost baby girl Bobbi. We think it may be the last straw! "The former drunk drug addict received a blood transfusion and was released after two days in hospital."
"It's a miracle that Bob didn't die."
"The doctor said there was only more than a liter of blood left in his body," a family source told radar
"Bobbie's only a few minutes away from death!"
"It's like the end! The 47 year old former new singer was at home alone when he fainted on December 19 and drove to a medical center near his home in Mount Tai, California



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Sofia Richie (@sofiarichie) on Jan 14, 2018 at 3:41pm PSTHollywoodLifers, did you think Scott and Sofia’s romance would last as long as it has?”
“Sofia’s just a teenager still so no wonder she has all of that energy.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s more adventurous than Kourtney KardashianWith all of the massive PDA that Scott Disick, 34 and his 19-year-old girlfriend Sofia Richie have been putting on lately, it’s even hotter when the pair are out of the public eye.”
“The reality star is loving that he’s been getting more adventurous action than he did when he was baby mama Kourtney Kardashian‘s partner.”
““One of the things that has Scott so sprung on Sofia is their sex life.”
“He’s actually pretty respectful and doesn’t share a ton of details, but he does hint that Sofia is way more adventurous in bed than Kourtney ever was,” a source close to The Lord tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Scott used to complain that Kourtney didn’t have enough sex drive, that she couldn’t keep up with him.”
“With Sofia there is no disconnect there, he says she’s just as much of a nymphomaniac as he is,” our insider continues.”
“Kourt has three young kids with Scott so she probably didn’t have the time for wild sex antics that he craves.”
“No wonder they can’t keep their hands off each other because once they get behind closed doors the fireworks really go off.”


"Sofia Richie (@ sofiarichie) shared a post in Hollywood lifers at 3:41 p.m. on January 14, 2018. How long do you think the romance between Scott and Sophia will last?"
"Sophia is just a teenager. No wonder she has so much energy."
"We have exclusive details of how she is more adventurous than Courtney Kardashian. Scott Disick, 34, and his girlfriend Sophia Ritchie, 19, have been wearing a huge handheld computer recently, which is even hotter when they are out of public view."
"The reality star is happy that he's got more risk-taking than when he was a partner with little mother Courtney Kardashian."
"One of the reasons why Scott is so obsessed with Sofia is their sex life."
A source close to God told reporters: "in fact, he is very respectful of others and did not disclose too many details, but he did imply that Sophia is more adventurous in bed than Courtney." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Scott used to complain that Courtney didn't have enough sex. She couldn't keep up with him."
"There's no disconnect with Sophia, he said she's as sexy as he is," our insider continued
"Kurt and Scott have three children, so she may not have time for the crazy sex antics he craves."
"No wonder they can't take their hands off each other, because once they close the door, the fireworks really go out."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The happy mother-to-be revealed the baby's gender with popping balloons held by her boyfriend, brother Wyatt and two sons.”
“In a joyful gender reveal, Hudson's growing bump is highlighted in a white, eyelet dress.”
“Hudson has two sons, Ryder Robinson, whose father is ex-husband Chris Robinson, and Bingham Hawn Bellamy with Matt Bellamy.”
“The couple reportedly met in 2003, when Hudson was pregnant with her first child.”
“The baby girl will be her first child with Lightwave Records founder and Chief guitarist, Danny Fujikawa.”
“Kate Hudson, 38, announced Friday she’s pregnant with baby number three.”
“Kate Hudson Reveals She Is Pregnant With Third ChildAnd she's just unveiled the baby's gender.”


"The happy mother to be revealed her baby's gender with balloons in the hands of her boyfriend Wyatt's brother and two sons."
"Revealed in a joyous gender, Hudson's growing bulge is highlighted in a white, eyelet dress."
Hudson has two sons, red Robinson. His father is ex husband Chris Robinson, Bingham horn Bellamy and Matt Bellamy
According to reports, the couple met in 2003 when Hudson was pregnant with her first child
"The baby girl will be her first child with the founder and lead guitarist of lightwave records, Danny Fujikawa."
Kate Hudson, 38, announced on Friday that she was pregnant with her third child
"Kate Hudson revealed that she is pregnant with a third child, and she has just released the gender of the child."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Not only that, but David is also apparently helping her to record a pop album."”
“"She is getting close to David because she really wants a part in the upcoming musical about iconic character Betty Boop.”
“"Katharine is desperate to stay famous," the source added.”
“So what's in it for McPhee, whose marriage to ex-husband Nick Cokas, 52, ended when he caught her cheating on him with her Smash director, Michael Morris?”
“Recently, he's been pitching a show based on himself called The Prince of Malibu.”
“"David is desperate to get back on the reality television circuit and has been since he split with Yolanda.”
“But it isn't just basketball that has Foster interested in the much younger actress!”
“He can't even name one player on the team except for, who hasn't even played for the Lakers in years!"”
“"It was just a photo op.”
“"David does not even like basketball," the insider told Radar.”


"Not only that, David is obviously helping her record pop albums."
"She's getting closer to David because she really wants to play a role in the upcoming musical about the idol Betty Pope."
"Catherine really wants to be famous," the source added
McPhee's marriage to his 52 year old ex husband, Nick kokas, ended when he discovered that she was unfaithful to his film director, Michael Morris? "
"Recently, he's doing a show based on himself, called Prince Malibu."
"David is very eager to return to reality TV, which has been the case since he broke up with Yolanda."
"But it's not just basketball that foster is interested in this much younger actress!"
"He can't even name a player in the team, except him, he hasn't played for the Lakers for years!"
"It's just a picture."
"David doesn't even like basketball," the insider told radar



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think that Selena has every right to be upset with Charlie or do you believe he didn’t do anything wrong?”
“Click here to see pics of celebs, including Selena and Justin, who got back together in 2017.”
“Time will tell if Charlie’s big reveal will throw a wedge into Jelena’s relationship, but all signs point to the two of them continuing to make it work in 2018.”
“While they arrived separately, the two of them definitely left together.”
“...hockey games...”
“She s learned from the first time dating Justin and The Weeknd that less is more which explains her relationship with Justin now being much more under the radar We reported earlier how Selena and Justin put to rest rumors that they had split by reuniting at one of his...”
““Now, she will definitely have to respond down the line, and it’s just frustrating when people add their dirty laundry to a situation,” our source added.”
“According to our source, it’s only a matter of time before Selena responds to Charlie’s bombshell admission that they were briefly an item — and that Justin Bieber, 23, may have caused the two to go their separate ways.”
“It’s clear that when it comes to who she dates, Selena apparently is all about maintaining her privacy.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Serena has every right to be angry with Charlie, or do you think he did nothing wrong?"
"Click here to see photos of celebrities, including Serena and Justin, who met again in 2017."
"Time will tell us whether Charlie's revelations will have an impact on jelina's relationship, but all the signs are that they will continue to work together in 2018."
"Although they came apart, they must have gone together."
“… Hockey game... "
"She knew" less is more "from her first date with Justin, which explains that her relationship with Justin is getting more and more attention. We have previously reported how Serena and Justin have been able to calm down the rumor of their breakup by reuniting in one of his places.... "
"Now, she's definitely going to respond, which is just frustrating when people add their dirty clothes to a situation," our source added
"According to our sources, Selena responded to Charlie's revelations by admitting that they were just an item, just a matter of time - Justin Bieber, 23, could lead the two to go their separate ways."
"It's clear that when it comes to dating someone, Serena is obviously defending her privacy."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more exclusive stories, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
““Katy thinks she’s found Mr.”
““They sat in the corner and were drinking a lot,” an eyewitness told In Touch at the time.”
““They came in together really late and stayed until 2 a.m.” The pair were with a group of friends and managed to fly under the radar for most of the night.”
““They really blended in,” a different eyewitness revealed.”
““People didn’t even recognize them!”But don’t expect the duo to start walking red carpets together anytime soon.”
“A source tells In Touch the Twilight star is dating multiple women at the moment!”
“Rob and Katy in 2015.”
““He’s been playing the field like crazy,” the source shares.”
“And the revelation will no doubt crush Katy, who believed their fling was something more substantial.”


"For more exclusive news, listen to the latest issue of in touch right now at the newsstand!"
"Katie thinks she found sir."
"They sat in the corner and drank a lot," one witness said in contact magazine at the time
"They came really late together and stayed until 2 a.m." Together with a group of friends, they successfully flew under the radar for most of the night. "
"They really got mixed up," another witness revealed
"People don't even know them! "But don't expect them to start walking the red carpet soon."
"A source told contact magazine that the Twilight star is currently dating a number of women!"
"Rob and Katie in 2015."
"He's been playing games like crazy," the source said
"This news will undoubtedly make Katie collapse. She thinks their indulgence is more substantial."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The night didn't end well for the couple.”
“Keith looked on as Nic grabbed he co-star's face and planted a kiss right on his lips.”
“"Meanwhile, Nicole made an instant beeline for Alexander despite Keith already accusing her of blatantly disregarding him."”
“"They’d posed for pictures on the red carpet outside, but they separated as soon as they got inside the party - with Keith going straight to the bar, tucking into the dumplings and pagodas which were being passed around."”
“In Big Little Lies, Nicole and Alexander play a couple in a troubled marriage.”
“WATCH: Nicole's acceptance speech for Best Actress in a Limited Series for Big Little Lies, post continues below...”
“"They looked tense as soon as they walked into the after party and it was clear there was something going on despite their initial attempts to put on a united front."”
“"Keith had accused Nicole of disrespecting and humiliating him by kissing Alexander in front of everyone," our insider explains.”
“Those at the awards celebration say they now fear for the couple’s marriage after what is being described as "a fight to end all fights."”
“Onlookers at an Emmy’s after party have revealed exclusively to Woman’s Day details of the couple’s explosive showdown.”


"It didn't end well for the couple that night."
"Keith watched Nick grab his partner's face and kiss him on the lip."
"At the same time, Nicole goes straight to Alexander, even though Keith has accused her of blatantly ignoring Alexander."
"They used to pose for pictures on the red carpet outside, but they separated as soon as they entered the party - Keith went straight to the bar and ate the dumplings and pagodas that came and went."
In the big lie, Nicole and Alexander play a couple who are in a difficult marriage
"Observation: Nicole's acceptance speech for best actress in a big lie series, the post continues below..."
"As soon as they entered, the party was very nervous. It was obvious that something had happened despite their initial attempt to establish a united front."
"Keith accused Nicole of disrespect and humiliation for kissing Alexander in front of everyone," our insider explained
"Those who attended the ceremony said they were worried about the couple's marriage now because they were described as" the fight to end all the fights. "
"The onlookers at the Emmy Awards party revealed the details of the couple's explosive showdown exclusively to women's day."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He is the James Taylor to my Carole King and I can’t imagine a time when he wouldn’t be.””
“I think it’s actually like, I think it’s time.”
““I don’t think she needs [to be defended] at all,” he told People magazine at the 2017 Songwriters Hall of Fame 48th Annual Induction and Awards Gala.”
““I don’t think feud songs are a hot thing – there’s always been beef songs.” Sheeran specifically cited Carly Simon’s “You’re So Vain” as an example of a classic “diss track”; Simon revealed in 2015 that she penned the 1972 hit with Warren Beatty in mind.”
“Earlier this year, Perry incurred the wrath of many Swift fans after the release of her hit “Swish Swish,” which many interpreted as a direct attack on the “Wildest Dreams” singer.”
““Don’t you come for me / No, not today / You’re calculated / I got your number / ‘Cause you’re a joker / And I’m a courtside killer queen,” one verse partly reads.”
“(As though confirming that the song was indeed about Swift, Perry changed the lyrics to hold a more conciliatory tone during a live-streamed concert: “God bless you on your journey, baby girl.” Days earlier, Perry had delivered that same line when chatting with Arianna Huffington about Swift.)”
““I am ready to let it go,” she said at the time.”
““I forgive her and I’m sorry for anything I ever did, and I hope the same from here.”
“There are bigger fish to fry, and there are real problems in the world.”


"He's my Carol King's James Taylor. I can't imagine if he will one day."
"I think actually, I think it's time."
"I don't think she needs (to be defended)," he told people at the 48th annual awards ceremony of the songwriter Hall of fame in 2017
"I don't think revenge is a hit song - there's always been a beef song." Sheeran specifically cited Carly Simon's "you're too vain" as an example of the classic "dis track"; Simon revealed in 2015 that she had Warren Beatty in mind when she wrote the hit song in 1972
"When Perry's hit song" whoosh whoosh "was released earlier this year, many swift fans were angry. Many people interpreted it as a direct attack on the" wildest dream "singer."
"Don't come to me / no, not today / you've figured it out / I know your number / because you're a clown / and I'm a killer queen by the court," one of the stanzas says
"As if to confirm that the song was really about swift, Perry changed the lyrics at a live concert to maintain a softer tone:" God bless your journey, baby girl. " A few days ago, Perry said the same thing when talking about swift with Arianna Huffington
"I'm ready to let go," she said at the time
"I forgive her, I'm sorry for what I've done, and I hope from now on."
"There are bigger fish to fry, and there are real problems in the world."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The former couple, who split in 2014 and divorced in November, continue to remain close as co-parents of their children, and their bond reportedly irked Tanaka, leading him to flirt with other women in front of Carey as revenge.”
“...ex husband Nick Cannon with whom she shares 6 year old twins Monroe and Moroccan...”
“This is a good time for her to be single and focus on herself FROM PEN Nick Cannon on His Broadway Inspiration for Wild n Out TMZ first reported the news that Carey had broken up with Tanaka due to his spending habits and his jealousy over her relationship with...”
“She is focusing on her kids and new music.”The insider added, “Bryan was a good distraction after she split from James.”
“Mariah is happy.”
““She has better things to focus on.”
““Everyone hoped that she would,” the Carey source said.”
“News of their split came last month with a source close to Carey telling PEOPLE it was the singer who ended things.”
“Carey, 47, had posted a nostalgic photo of a date she shared with Tanaka, 33, on Friday, captioning,“#fbf.”After calling it quits with fiancé James Packer in October, Carey embarked on a whirlwind romance with her backup dancer Tanaka, with the pair spending holidays together and traveling the world.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"The former couple broke up in 2014 and divorced in November. As the child's co parents, their relationship is still very close. It is reported that their relationship angered Tanaka, which led Tanaka to flirt with other women in front of Kelly to show revenge."
“… Former husband Nick Cannon, she and he have a pair of 6-year-old twins, Monroe and Moroccan... "
"For her, it's a good time to be single and pay attention to herself. Peng Nick Cannon's inspiration for wild n out TMZ on Broadway first reported that Kelly and Tanaka broke up because of his consumption habits and his jealousy of her relationship with Tanaka..."
"She's focused on the kids and the new music," the person added. "It's easy to distract her after Brian and James split up."
"Maria is very happy."
"She has better things to focus on."
"Everyone hopes she will," Carey's source said
"The news of their breakup came last month, and a source close to Kelly told people that it was the singer who ended everything."
"Kelly, 47, released a nostalgic photo of her date with Tanaka, 33, on Friday with the title # FBF." In October, after Kelly broke up with her fiance James Parker, Kelly and her dancing partner Tanaka started a whirlwind romance. They went on holiday together and traveled around the world. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s that continuing contact with dad … all those little pieces that eventually lead to some sort of reunification with their dad.””
“An alienation refers to where children have been told by the other parent that the parent they’re not seeing is bad, or doesn’t like them, or doesn’t care about them.”
“According to court documents obtained by PEOPLE, Jolie could be in danger of losing primary custody of the children if she doesn’t take steps to improve their relationship with their father.”
“A judge in the couple’s ongoing divorce case said in the documents that “it is critical that each of [the six] children have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother,” and that Jolie must allow Pitt to maintain and repair that.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Family law attorney David Glass, who is not associated with the case, tells PEOPLE that it “is extremely rare” to see a court intervene in this way, though they typically do so after extensive evaluation and to prevent children from being alienated from one parent.”
“Image zoom Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie.”
“| Credit: Jason Merritt/Getty“It looks like what this judge was weighing was the difference between estrangement and alienation,” says Glass, who has not had access to the court documents.”
““The difference there is, estrangement is when children aren’t connected to one of the parents, mainly because of something that parent did.”
“So a hypothetical, if dad screams and yells at the kids and doesn’t treat them nicely, the kids stop wanting to see dad, that’s estrangement.”


"It's this constant contact with my father All of these little pieces eventually led to some kind of reunion with my father. "
"Alienation is when a child is told by another parent that the parents they don't see are bad, or don't like them, or don't care about them."
"According to court documents available to people, if Julie does not take steps to improve their relationship with their father, she may lose primary custody of the child."
"A judge in the couple's ongoing divorce case said in the document," it's crucial that each of the (six) children have a healthy and strong relationship with their parents, "and Julie must allow Pete to maintain and repair the relationship."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Family law lawyer David glass, who has nothing to do with the case, tells people that it is" extremely rare "to see the court intervene in this way, but they usually do so after extensive evaluation to prevent the child from alienating one of the parents."
"Image zooming Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie."
Credit: Jason Merritt / Getty "it seems the judge is weighing the difference between alienation and alienation," glass said, without access to court documents
"The difference is that estrangement means that the child has no connection with one of the parents, mainly because of what the parents do."
"So suppose that if the father yells at the children and treats them badly, the children no longer want to see him, that's alienation."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“John Wayne was always a version of “John Wayne”.”
“...the audience had read a synopsis...”
“As the new year progressed, analysts gawped at the unstoppable success of a little-heralded family entertainment entitled Jumanji: Welcome to the Jungle, which had been released in December.”
“A more useful question, however, would have been: who grossed more for films released in 2017?”
“He dredged up $1.6 billion on the back of Fast & Furious 8 and xXx: Return of Xander Cage.”
“When the sums were done at the end of 2017, Dwayne Johnson’s great rival Vin Diesel – more on that later – was declared the highest-grossing star of the year.”
“The Rock remains.”
“His name is Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson and, this month, he will be saving that eponymous skyscraper from terrorists.”
“Yet, there is one man who can can still open a movie.”
“The superhero chains are now the real stars and the actors are merely flipping the meat and refilling the napkin dispensers.”


John Wayne has always been a copy of "John Wayne"
“…… The audience read a synopsis... "
"As the new year goes on, analysts are gaping at the unstoppable success of the December release of the family entertainment show" Jumanji: welcome to the jungle. "
"A more useful question, however, is: which films will be released in 2017 have the highest box office?"
"He made $1.6 billion with" fast fury 8 "and" XXX: the return of sander cage. "
"When these figures were completed at the end of 2017, Dwayne Johnson's arch rival, Vin Diesel, was declared the highest box office star of the year."
"The rocks are still there."
His name is Dwayne "rock" Johnson. This month, he will save the skyscraper of the same name from terrorists
"However, there is one person who can still open a movie."
"The superhero chain is now a real star, and the actors are just turning the meat and pouring the napkins."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gigi fears her younger brother will fall in love with Kendall after one kiss so she told him to slow down.”All we can do is watch this space!”
“However, Anwar “has had a crush on Kendall for years.”
“So Gigi has made it clear to Anwar that while Kendall is a beautiful, sweet, smart, sexy, and a trusted friend, she is not to be messed with.”It's true, since Kendall was just seen on a romantic date with NBA star Ben Simmons only a few days earlier.”
“Gigi knows that Kendall puts work and her career first with little time for a serious boyfriend or a long term relationship.”
““ She told him that Kendall is a heartbreaker, and not to fall in love with her.”
““Gigi is giving her little brother a warning,” the source has revealed.”
“Well, she isn't happy.”
“The one thing we kept wondering is, how does Kendall's best friend Gigi feel about this?”
“But each to their own.”
“Video footage emerged just yesterday of Kendall kissing Anwar while at the CDFA Awards after-party, which not only made us applaud her efforts, but also kind of creeped us out since they're semi-related.”


Gigi was worried that her brother would fall in love with Kendall after a kiss, so she told him to slow down, "all we can do is look at the space!"
"However, Anwar" has been infatuated with Kendall for many years
"So Gigi has made it clear to Anwar that although Kendall is a beautiful, sweet, smart, sexy and trustworthy friend, she should not be provoked." It's true, because Kendall was dating NBA star Ben Simmons a few days ago
"Gigi knows that Kendall puts work and career first, and has little time for a serious boyfriend or a long-term relationship."
"She told him Kendall was a heartbroken man. Don't fall in love with her."
"Qiqi is giving a warning to her brother," the source said
"Well, she's not happy."
"What we always wanted to know was how Kendall's best friend, Gigi, felt about it?"
"But each has its own way."
"Just yesterday, Kendall's video clip of kissing Anwar at the CDFA awards party appeared, which not only let us applaud her efforts, but also made us a little creepy, because they are half relatives."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Thomas, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex want to have kids.”
“On Monday, Markle's dad appeared on ITV's "Good Morning Britain" and supports the claims that the royals want to start their own family soon.”
“National Enquirer reported that the Duke and Duchess of Sussex are already having some marital problems just a month after their royal wedding.”
“The outlet published a report with a headline that read: "The Honeymoon’s Over!”
“Harry Storms Out On Meghan."”
“The report claims that Prince Harry and Markle's marriage has "hit the rocks following a blistering fight."”
“A so-called insider claimed that "Harry and Meghan hadn't even had time to unpack from their honeymoon when tempers flared."”
“The blame was put on Markle who reportedly wanted to shirk her royal responsibilities because she was supposedly pregnant.”
“The tabloid added that her "excitement turned to horror when she learned they could be at risk for contracting" the Zika virus which is dangerous for expectant moms.”
“"I'm told Meghan turned to Harry and announced, 'Of course, if the threat of Zika is still there in October, we will cancel the trip'," the insider added.”


"According to Thomas, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex want children."
On Monday, markel's father appeared on ITV's "good morning Britain" program, supporting claims that members of the royal family want to form their own family as soon as possible
The Duke and Duchess of Sussex had some marital problems just a month after the royal wedding, the national inquirer reported
The media published a report with the title: "honeymoon is over!"
"Harry rushed to Megan."
Prince Harry and Marcel's marriage "hit the rocks after a heated argument," the report said
One so-called insider said, "Harry and Megan suddenly lost their temper before they even got out of their honeymoon."
"It is reported that markel wants to evade the royal family's responsibility because she is considered to be pregnant."
The tabloid also said that when she learned that they might be in danger of contracting Zika virus, her excitement turned into fear, and Zika virus is dangerous for her mother
"I was told Megan turned to Harry and announced," of course, if the Zika threat persists in October, we will cancel the trip, "the person familiar with the matter added



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mirror Celeb has contacted Storm Models for a comment.”
“All of the actress's projects will now be dealt with by American agency William Morris and it seems Storm have been quick to cut ties by deleting her from the main board of models they represent on their website.”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailCara Delevingne has been deleted from the Storm Models website after reportedly dropping the agency to focus on her acting career.”
“The 22 year old star who was signed as a fresh faced 15 year old became one of the biggest supermodels on the globe and was known as the new Kate Moss who has been represented by the agency since...”
“...she was a teenager...”
“According to The Sun newspaper, the agency's boss, Sarah Doukas, is disappointed to have lost the star, who is now hoping to make it in Hollywood after bagging a number of film roles.”
“A source said: "Cara left Storm a month ago but it's been kept very much on the down-low.”
“"Sarah was gutted to lose her huge cash cow — Cara's now one of the biggest models in the world with huge earning potential from brands.”
“But Cara wants to do what makes her happy and fulfils her.”
“She knows that's not modelling in the long term."”


"Mirror celebrity has contacted storm model for advice."
"Now, all of the actress's projects will be in the charge of William Morris, an American agency. It seems that storm quickly cut off contact and removed her from the model board represented on their website."
"Thank you for subscribing to our more newsletters that show that I see our privacy notification invalid email. Kara delaviny has been removed from storm model website and is reported to have abandoned her agency and focused on her acting career."
"The 22-year-old star signed with a 15-year-old new face to become one of the world's largest supermodels, known as the new Kate Moss Since then, it has been represented by a brokerage company. "
“… She's a teenager... "
Sarah Ducas, the boss of the agency, is disappointed to lose the star and now hopes to succeed in Hollywood after winning some movie roles, the Sun reported
"Kara left Stormwind a month ago, but it's been low," a source said
"Sarah has lost her huge cash cow, which makes her frustrated - Carla is now one of the biggest models in the world and has huge revenue potential from the brand."
"But what does Carla want to do to make her happy and content?"
"She knows it's not a model in the long run."



**Something goes wrong**
“And Zahara and Viv want to help their mum pick out a dress.'”
“Even with all the drama, he’s come out a better person, and he’s grateful to Angie for kicking him in the pants when he needed it most.'”
“USA that the former couple are taking steps to get their marriage back on track.”
“'They’ve called off their legal attack dogs and are working through the logistics of withdrawing their divorce petitions… They don’t want to throw away the 11 years they spent together,' a source spilled to the magazine.”
“The pair have been spending more time together ever since Ange 42 and the kids moved into a mansion just down the road from Brad 54 making it easier for the Fight Club star to spend more time with their children Maddox 16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and...”
“...twins Knox and Vivienne nine...”
“Pitt and Jolie share six children Getty'Things are so much better among the entire family now,' continues the insider, confessing that Brad is now fully committed to being sober.”
“'He’s sober and attending weekly therapy sessions.”
“In fact, the shock split may have been Angie’s plan to get Brad to shape up.”
“'Shiloh and Knox will be in charge of food and music selection.”


"Zahara and vivi want to help their mother choose a dress."
"Even with so much drama, he's become a better man and he's grateful to Angie for kicking his pants when he needs them most."
"The former couple are taking steps to get their marriage back on track."
A source said: "they have stopped legal assault dogs and are withdrawing divorce applications through logistics They don't want to lose the 11 years they spent together. "
"Since Angie, 42, and her children moved into a mansion near Brad 54, they have spent more and more time together, which makes it easier for the fight club star to spend more time with the children, 16 from Maddox, 14 from Zahara, 11 from Shiloh, and..."
“… The twins Knox and Vivian nine... "
"Pete and Julie have six children, and Getty's" family is much better now, "the insider continued, admitting that Brad is fully committed to staying awake."
"He's sober, and he's in therapy every week."
"In fact, this shocking breakup may be Angie's plan to cheer Brad up."
"Shiloh and Knox will be responsible for the choice of food and music."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch “The Colbert Report” clip here.”
“Also Read: Seth Rogen on ‘The Interview’ Fallout: ‘We Just Wanted to Make a Really Funny, Entertaining Movie’ (Video)“I do know that, yes,” Rogen replied, before adding he was going to also avoid Korean BBQ just to be safe.”
““You know you can’t go to North Korea now,” Colbert told him.”
“But he did imply Rogen’s own safety could be in jeopardy.”
““We honestly tried to make him — for lack of a better word — adorable.”Colbert did not ask Rogen about the crippling Sony hacks which have plagued the backing studio in recent weeks, which have lead to leaks of private information and threat against the families of Sony employees.”
“Also Read: James Franco, Seth Rogen: Sony’s Interview-Less ‘Interview’ Premiere (Photos)“When you’re in a room with him, it’s not like you’re always aware of where he is,” Rogen explained.”
“He said their accounts let him to believe that the North Korean leader was actually quite unassuming in person.”
“Rogen then spoke about the research that went into making the film, including reading up on the country and interviewing people who had met the dictator.”
““I personally think it is appropriate,” Rogen responded.”
“Colbert then asked Rogen whether joking about real people is fair game.”


"Look at the" Colbert Report "clip here
"Also read: Seth Logan on the 'interview' aftereffect: 'we just want to make a really interesting, entertaining movie' (video)" I know, yes, "Logan replied, then added that he also wants to avoid Korean barbecue just for safety."
"You know you can't go to North Korea now," Colbert told him
"But he did hint that Logan's own security might be threatened."
"We sincerely try to make him - because there is no better word - likable." Colbert did not ask Logan about the serious Sony hacking attacks that have plagued back office studios in recent weeks, which have led to the leakage of private information and posed a threat to Sony employees' families
"Also read: James Franco, Seth Logan: Sony's interview less' interview 'premiere (photo)" when you're in the same room with him, it's not that you always know where he is, "Logan explained
"He said that what they said convinced him that the North Korean leader himself was actually quite modest."
Logan went on to talk about the research that had been done to make the film, including learning about the country and interviewing people who had seen the dictator
"I personally think it's appropriate," Logan replied
"Colbert went on to ask Logan if it's fair to joke about real people."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Speaking of reboots, Doherty will next be seen in the Paramount Network’s reboot of Heathers.”
“Also, the reboot’s new cast better have different character names…Oh, and in case you’re wondering what Doherty is watching lately:Previously, co-star Holly Marie Combs had her turn to weigh in on the Charmed reboot.”
“Between vanquishing supernatural demons, tearing down the patriarchy, and maintaining familial bonds, a witch’s work is never done”).”
“...sisters in a college town who discover they are witches...”
“So at one point the original Charmed was likewise considered by some to be a knock off And Doherty would rather not be negative about it BUT that official description though which described the new series this way This fierce funny feminist reboot of the original series centers on three...”
“...the 1995 book Practical Magic which released a film version the same year Charmed hit the air...”
“Image zoom Credit Getty Images First on the very idea of a reboot And notes that it will mean more lead roles for women Likewise while some have slammed the idea of bringing back Charmed as unoriginal The WB series actually followed 1996 s similarly premised film The Craft and...”
“...reboot of the original series when the 1998 2006 series was considered feminist too...”
“Based on her tweets she s intrigued and curious about the new project and doesn t want to be negative about it she even defends the idea of a reboot in general yet strongly agrees with some fans who object to the network s description of the project as feminist...”
“Doherty’s opinion is nuanced and complex; she isn’t simply pro- or anti-reboot.”


"Speaking of restart, Doherty will appear next in paramount network restart heather."
"In addition, it's better for new actors to have different role names when they are rebooted Oh, if you want to know what Doherty is looking at, recently: previously, it was her turn to co star Holly Marie combs in this glamorous restart
"Between defeating supernatural demons, overthrowing patriarchy and maintaining family ties, the work of a wizard will never be completed."
"The sisters who found themselves witches in the university town..."
"Therefore, some people once thought that the curse was a fake, and dorty didn't want to deny it, but the official description described the new series in this way. This fierce and interesting feminist relaunched original series focuses on three aspects..."
“…… Practical magic, published in 1995, released a film version of glamour in the same year
"Image zooming credit Getty Images for the first time on the idea of restart, and pointed out that it would mean more heroines, too, while some attacked the idea of bringing back glamour, as the non original WB series actually followed the same premise of 1996 film craft and..."
“… When the 1998-2006 series is also considered a feminist, restart the original series... "
"According to her micro blog, she is very interested and curious about the new project, and does not want to deny it. She even defended the idea of restarting it in general, but also strongly agrees with some fans who oppose the Internet's description of the project as a feminist..."
"Doherty's views are subtle and complex; she's not just for or against a restart."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“As Gossip Cop […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“It’s an inane article that seeks to score traffic by encouraging their respective fan bases to duke it out in a poll and in the comments section.”
“HollywoodLife is turning Robert Pattinson ’s new haircut into clickbait by asking fans to vote on whether he “rocks” a buzz cut better than Kristen Stewart .”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"As a gossip cop ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"This is a boring article designed to score traffic by encouraging their fans to make it up in opinion polls and comments."
Hollywood life let fans vote whether Robert Pattinson's new hairstyle can "shock" a popular hairstyle more than Kristen Stewart, thus turning Robert Pattinson's new hairstyle into a "click bait"



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s going to be hard to top this batch, though!”
“...as Blake continues to support her during her residency...”
“See their cutest kissing pics EVER, here!”
“Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton‘s lives basically consist of constant, mushy PDA, so it seems crazy to say that they upped the ante in new pics.”
“But they managed to do the impossible!”
“Gwen shared a sweet and intimate moment with her boyfriend on Instagram, which appears to have happened in the greenroom at her Las Vegas residency show.”
“In the pics, which you can see below, Gwen and Blake are kissing tenderly, and she shows the whole moment, from their adoring gaze, to her leaning in for the kiss, and their warm embrace.”
“They look so, so in love.”
“Blake has been by Gwen’s side since the first night of her Gwen Stefani: I’m Just a Girl show at Planet Hollywood’s Zappos Theater.”
“Gwen shared a peek at her dressing room on her Instagram story that showed a beautiful vase of flowers from Blake, along with a sweet note.”


"But it's going to be hard to stand out in this shipment!"
“… Continue to support Blake while she is in hospital... "
"Look at their cutest picture of kissing, here!"
"Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon's lives are basically made up of constant, mushy handheld computers, so it seems crazy to say that they've increased their bets on new photos."
"But they managed to do the impossible!"
"Gwen shared a sweet and intimate moment with her boyfriend on instagram, which seems to have happened in the lounge of her Las Vegas residence show."
"In the photo below, you can see Gwen and Blake kissing tenderly. She shows the whole moment, from their adoring eyes to her bending over to kiss and their warm embrace."
"They seem to be in love."
"Blake has been with Gwen ever since the first night of Gwen Stephanie: I'm just a girl show at Zappos theater on the Hollywood planet."
"Gwen shared a glimpse of her in the dressing room on instagram, a beautiful bottle of flowers from Blake and a sweet note."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When Foxx was asked during the NBA All-Star Celebrity Game in February about shooting hoops with the mom of 12-year-old Suri days earlier, he immediately took off his microphone and walked off of the live interview.”
“The outfit featured high-waisted, pleated shorts with a semicircle trim and a cropped, off-shoulder bodice top.”
“Night Out!”
“Jamie Foxx and Katie Holmes Grab Dinner in the Big Apple After Split RumorsJamie Foxx was the constant gentleman while out with Katie Holmes on Monday night.”
“The Beat Shazam host, 50, was photographed helping Holmes out of their black SUV as the two headed to dinner at popular Asian fusion restaurant Tao in New York City.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Earlier in the day, Foxx was spotted heading to a taping of The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, where he and costar Taron Egerton promoted their upcoming movie, Robin Hood.”
“For the dinner date, Foxx wore skinny white pants and a navy blue polo.”
“Holmes, meanwhile, kept cool from the summer heat in a Zimmermann two-piece look.”
“The 39-year-old Dawson’s Creek alum paired the ensemble with a red handbag, tan shoes, a pendant necklace, and oversized sunglasses.”


"In February, when fox was asked to shoot with 12-year-old Suri's mother a few days ago at the NBA all star masters, he immediately took off the microphone and left for the interview."
The dress features high waist Pleated Shorts with semicircular edges and a cropped off shoulder bodice
"Go out at night!"
"Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes have dinner at the big apple after they split up. Jamie fox is a regular on Monday night when they go out with Katie Holmes."
"Beat Shazam, 50, was photographed helping Holmes get out of the black SUV while dining at Tao, a popular Asian fusion restaurant in New York City."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Earlier in the day, it was found that fox was on his way to the recording scene of the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon, where he and his partner Taron Eagleton promoted their upcoming film Robin Hood
"On the dinner date, fox was wearing white tights and Navy polo."
"At the same time, Holmes wore Zimmerman's two-piece suit to keep out the cold and spend the summer."
"The 39 year old Dawson stream alum paired the outfit with a red handbag, a pair of Tan shoes, a pendant necklace and a pair of oversized sunglasses."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Markle Has Paid Tribute to Princess Diana...”
“Gifts from strangers have to be turned down, but what about offerings from her friends?”
“The new Duchess of Sussex has managed to shake things up since joining the royal family, but she would be breaking royal protocol if she were to throw a bash before any future baby is born.”
“This rule might be a bummer for Meghan, but it actually makes a lot of sense.”
““[The royals] are clearly very wealthy, and a lavish baby shower would be seen as highly inappropriate,” ABC News’ royal expert Vickie Arbiter said back in 2013 when Kate Middleton was pregnant with Prince George.”
““There’s nothing they can’t go out and buy themselves.”Whether or not Meghan could accept baby-related gifts is murky.”
“According to British rules Gifts offered by private individuals living in the United Kingdom not personally known to the Member of the Royal Family should be refused where there are concerns about the propriety or motives of the donor or...”
“...the gift itself This is why she and Prince Harry had to return more than 9 milion worth of wedding presents...”
“The answer seems unclear, but it’s possible the Duke and Duchess of Sussex would return everything, including gifts from friends, just so they can’t be accused of being improper.”
“More From Woman s World Meghan Markle s New British Accent Confuses Fans But She s Not the Only Celeb to Change Her Voice Why You ll Never See Meghan Markle Wearing Wedges Around the Queen 4 Heartwarming Ways Meghan...”


"Mark salutes Princess Diana..."
"Gifts from strangers must be rejected, but what about gifts from friends?"
"The new Duchess of Sussex has managed to change the situation since she joined the royal family, but it would be against Royal etiquette if she was furious before the birth of her future child."
"This rule may be a problem for Megan, but it actually makes a lot of sense."
"[the royal family] is obviously very rich, and luxurious baby showers would be considered very inappropriate," said Vickie arbiter, a royal expert at ABC News, when Kate Middleton was pregnant with Prince George in 2013
"There's nothing they can't go out and buy on their own." It's not clear whether Megan will accept gifts related to babies
"According to British rules, a gift given by an individual living in the United Kingdom, if a member of the royal family is not personally aware of it, if he is concerned about the donor's etiquette or motives, or And shall refuse. "
“… The gift itself, which is why she and Prince Harry have to return more than nine million wedding gifts... "
"The answer seems unclear, but the Duke and Duchess of Sussex may return everything, including gifts from friends, so they won't be accused of wrongdoing."
"More from the women's world, Megan markel's new British accent puzzles fans, but she's not the only celebrity to change her voice. Why don't you ever see Megan markel walking around the queen with a wedge? Megan..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Image Credit: InstagramThe ultimate #wcw @tarajiphenson  #wombmates  A post shared by Kelly Ripa (@kellyripa) on Apr 12, 2017 at 2:36pm PDT”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below and don’t forget to check CDL for more Kelly Ripa news and updates right here.”
“Do you think she’s still bitter over her former co-star’s ratings bonanza, or has she moved on?”
“What do you guys think about Kelly Ripa’s jealousy over Michael Strahan’s new career successes?”
“But alas, there’s only so long that she can keep faking the fact that she doesn’t care about Michael’s success off the show, especially as she still struggles to find longer term co-hosts who’ll put up with her alleged attitude problems and diva behavior.”
“Plus, the fact that he was immediately inundated with offers from other shows and higher rated shows, at that, reportedly made her seethe more, even though she had to put on a confident facade for the show.”
“She was reportedly already jealous of the fact that Michael’s star was rising so quickly, and the fallout from their final days together on the show certainly didn’t help.”
“The show has been gaining steam on the game show circuit, and as its been amassing a large fan base and impressive ratings, Kelly Ripa has allegedly felt even more slighted than she did before.”
“ABC has confirmed that stars like Rachael Ray, Tom Bergeron, Aaron Rodgers, and Cam Newton will all be appearing on the second season of ‘The $100,000 Pyramid’ when it returns in June.”
“However, Michael Strahan’s new game show ‘The $100,000 Pyramid’ has been making waves recently, both with ratings and guest stars.”


"Image source: instagram the ultimate# wcw@tarajiphenson#wombmates "A post shared by Kelly Ripa (@ kellyripa) at 2:36 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time on April 12, 2017"
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below, and don't forget to check CDL here for more Kelly Ripa news and updates."
"Do you think she's upset about her former partner's ratings, or has she reformed?"
"What do you think of Kelly Ripa's jealousy of Michael Strahan's success in his new career?"
"But it's a pity that it's only so long before she can continue to pretend that she doesn't care about Michael's success outside the show, especially when she's still trying to find a long-term co host to put up with her so-called attitude problems and behavior."
"In addition, in fact, he was immediately inundated by the invitation of other programs and higher ratings programs, which is said to let her see more, even though she had to put on a confident appearance for the program."
"She is reported to have envied Michael's star rise so quickly, and the impact of their last days together on the show certainly didn't help."
"The show is getting more and more popular at the game show, and with its huge fan base and impressive ratings, Kelly Ripa is said to be more despised than ever before."
"ABC has confirmed that stars such as Rachel ray, Tom bergeran, Alan Rogers and cam Newton will all appear when the second season of pyramid worth 100000 dollars opens in June."
"But Michael Strahan's new game show, the $100000 pyramid, has been booming lately, both in ratings and as a guest star."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has since rescheduled his two upcoming shows for his Saint Pablo tour that were originally scheduled for Oct. 4 and Oct. 6.this is a video of Kanye West starting Heartless then leaving @themeadowsnyc abruptly pic.twitter.com/2sPgj6LczW — Jenna (@chickenCARM_) October 3, 2016”
“He ended his set abruptly, in the middle of performing "Heartless," telling concert-goers he had a family emergency.”
“According to The Hollywood Reporter, attendees at Paris Fashion Week were less than sympathetic after Kardashian was robbed at gunpoint in her hotel room early Monday morning.”
“"Well, she should stop Instagramming pictures of herself in her hotel bathroom," an American magazine contributor told The Hollywood Reporter.”
“Another American fashion editor joked, "She was probably drunk after the L’Oreal party and let them in accidentally.”
“Or she tagged herself there.”
“Criminals can have Instagram too."”
“(Note: Kardashian famously does not drink.)”
“And some just questioned the entire ordeal, with a British journalist asking, "Where did they get a gun?”
“Sounds fake."”


"Since then, he has rescheduled two shows that were originally scheduled to tour San Pablo on October 4 and 6. This is a video of Kanye West starting with ruthlessness and then suddenly leaving@ themeadowsnycpic.twitter.com/2sPgj6LczW -Jenna (@ chickencorm) October 3, 2016 "
He abruptly ended up performing "heartless" and told the concert audience that he had a family emergency
"Participants at Paris fashion week were less sympathetic after Kardashian was robbed of her hotel room early Monday morning, according to the Hollywood Reporter
"Well, she should stop installing photos of herself in the hotel bathroom," an American magazine writer told the Hollywood Reporter
Another American fashion editor joked, "she might have been drunk after the L'Oreal party and accidentally let them in."
"Or she tied herself up there."
"Criminals can also use instagram."
(Note: the famous Kardashian doesn't drink.)
Some just question the whole ordeal, and a British journalist asks, "where did they get the gun?"
"That sounds fake."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And Zahara and Viv want to help their mum pick out a dress.'”
“Even with all the drama, he’s come out a better person, and he’s grateful to Angie for kicking him in the pants when he needed it most.'”
“USA that the former couple are taking steps to get their marriage back on track.”
“'They’ve called off their legal attack dogs and are working through the logistics of withdrawing their divorce petitions… They don’t want to throw away the 11 years they spent together,' a source spilled to the magazine.”
“The pair have been spending more time together ever since Ange 42 and the kids moved into a mansion just down the road from Brad 54 making it easier for the Fight Club star to spend more time with their children Maddox 16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and...”
“...twins Knox and Vivienne nine...”
“Pitt and Jolie share six children Getty'Things are so much better among the entire family now,' continues the insider, confessing that Brad is now fully committed to being sober.”
“'He’s sober and attending weekly therapy sessions.”
“In fact, the shock split may have been Angie’s plan to get Brad to shape up.”
“'Shiloh and Knox will be in charge of food and music selection.”


"Zahara and vivi want to help their mother choose a dress."
"Even with so much drama, he's become a better man and he's grateful to Angie for kicking his pants when he needs them most."
"The former couple are taking steps to get their marriage back on track."
A source said: "they have stopped legal assault dogs and are withdrawing divorce applications through logistics They don't want to lose the 11 years they spent together. "
"Since Angie, 42, and her children moved into a mansion near Brad 54, they have spent more and more time together, which makes it easier for the fight club star to spend more time with the children, 16 from Maddox, 14 from Zahara, 11 from Shiloh, and..."
“… The twins Knox and Vivian nine... "
"Pete and Julie have six children, and Getty's" family is much better now, "the insider continued, admitting that Brad is fully committed to staying awake."
"He's sober, and he's in therapy every week."
"In fact, this shocking breakup may be Angie's plan to cheer Brad up."
"Shiloh and Knox will be responsible for the choice of food and music."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See the full list of nominations below:”
“Cardi is up for Top New Artist, facing off against 21 Savage, Camila Cabello, Khalid and Kodak Black.”
“Justin Bieber and Cardi B are tied with 8 nominations, and the boys behind "Despacito," Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee, have 7 apiece.”
“It's also a good day for Post Malone, who is up for 13 BBMAs in 12 categories, and Imagine Dragons, who snagged 11 nods in 10 categories.”
“All three are up for Top Artist, competing against Drake (9 noms total), and Taylor Swift (5 noms total) in that field.”
“The nominees for the 2018 Billboard Music Awards have been revealed, and it's Kendrick Lamar and Ed Sheeran and Bruno Mars in the lead with 15 BBMA nominations apiece.”


"Please see the full list of nominations below:
"Caddy is a top new artist, facing 21 savages, Camilla Cabello, Khalid and Kodak black."
Justin Bieber and Katie B tied for eight nominations, while Lewis fonsey and Yankee dad, the boy behind despair, had seven nominations each
"It's also a good day for post Malone, who has 13 bbmas in 12 categories. Imagine dragons, who has 11 nods in 10 categories."
"All three are top artists, competing with Drake (nine) and Taylor Swift (five) in the field."
"The list of nominations for the 2018 Billboard Music Awards has been announced, led by Kendrick Lamar, ed Sheeran and Bruno Mars, with 15 bbma nominations each."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image Source: YouTube...”
“The statement comes on the heels of Gwen’s super emotional performance during the American Music Awards and a vague tweet from Blake about the performance.”
“...great Adam is...”
“When Adam looked at the camera to fake apologize for something he said about Blake Shelton Gwen looked at the camera and said I love you too Blake ish Adam told her it was a dumb thing to say and then Gwen went on a 2 minute spiel about how...”
“Before the most recent episode of “The Voice,” Adam Levine and Gwen Stefani took a few moments to talk with “Entertainment Tonight” about what they are thankful for this year and well…it got weird.”


"Image source: YouTube..."
"Before making this statement, Gwen showed great emotion during the American Music Awards, which Blake talked about vaguely on twitter."
“… The great Adam is... "
"When Adam looked at the camera and pretended to apologize for what he said about Blake Sheldon Gwen, he looked at the camera and said I love you, too. Blake ish Adam told her it was stupid to say that, and Gwen continued for two minutes about how to..."
"Before the latest sound episode, Adam Levin and Gwen Stephanie spent some time talking to entertainment tonight about their gratitude for this year, um It's so strange. "



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The news of Kylie’s pregnancy broke in September 2017.”
“— She’s falling more in love with him every day.”Throughout Kylie’s pregnancy, Wendy taunted the young star on her show.”
“Here’s how he’s supporting her amidst Wendy’s continuous disses!”
“Kylie Jenner, 20, is basking in the joy of being a new mother, but when she hears about Wendy Williams, 53, and her constant verbal attacks on her relationship with Travis Scott, 25, it’s hard not to get a bit frustrated.”
“Wendy has stood by her prediction that Travis will eventually leave Kylie and the baby to live the partying lifestyle of a successful rapper.”
“Before baby Stormi Webster was born on February 1, Wendy predicted that Travis would leave Kylie to raise the baby on her own.”
“However, Travis hasn’t done that, and he doesn’t plan to, a source tells HollywoodLife.com.”
“He’s sticking by Kylie’s side, and proving Wendy wrong.”
““Kylie is getting the last laugh in her feud with Wendy Williams thanks to Travis,” the insider says.”
““Kylie’s not being petty and dwelling on it but yes, she’s pretty thrilled that Travis is proving Wendy and all the haters wrong.”


"The news of Kelly's pregnancy came out in September 2017."
"She loves him more and more." During Kelly's pregnancy, Wendy mocked the young star on the show
"That's how he supported Wendy in her constant quarrels!"
"Kylie Jenner, 20, is immersed in the joy of becoming a new mother, but it's hard not to feel a bit frustrated when she hears about Wendy Williams, 53, and her constant verbal attacks on her relationship with Travis Scott, 25."
"Wendy insists on her prediction that Travis will eventually leave Kelly and her children and live the party life of a successful rap singer."
"Before baby Tommy Webster was born on February 1, Wendy predicted that Travis would leave Kelly to raise the baby alone."
"However, Travis hasn't done it, and he doesn't intend to," a source told Hollywood life
"He's on Kelly's side, proving Wendy wrong."
"Thanks to Travis, Kelly laughs to the end of her feud with Wendy Williams," the person familiar with the matter said
"Kelly wasn't mean and didn't indulge in it, but yes, she's glad Travis proved Wendy and all the haters wrong."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So to hear that they’re working on their relationship by working out sounds like a step in the right direction.”
“Things may have been difficult for this couple since Tristan’s infidelity surfaced right before Khloe gave birth, BUT we respect their dedication to stick with each other.”
“Khloe has been hitting the gym hard with her baby daddy since giving birth to True, which hasn’t just been great for her post-baby bod, but for her relationship as well!”
“We’ve all heard of the buddy system, but Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Tristan Thompson, 27, have been putting that into practice at the gym six days a week.”
“Turns out True Thompson‘s momma isn’t the only one working to stay slim after welcoming her baby girl in April — Tristan has been sweating at her side.”
“He is an NBA player, after all, so the training makes sense, but it isn’t just getting these two in shape!”
“It may be getting their relationship off of the rocks and back where they want it.”
“The rock-hard abs are just an added benefit… “Him being a professional athlete champion, he performs at a higher level.”
“He pushed her to reach that level,” their trainer Don Brooks told Us Weekly.”
““So really it’s having me go easier on my job, because he’s in there pushing her, so I can kind of demonstrate the exercises and let them support each other.” This isn’t just a way to get ripped, but to get romantic as well!”


"So hearing them exercise to improve their relationship sounds like a step in the right direction."
"Since Tristan's infidelity surfaced before colo gave birth, the couple's life may have been difficult, but we respect them and stick to each other's dedication."
"Since giving birth to true, Khloe has been working hard with her baby dad to exercise, which is not only good for her postpartum BOD, but also good for her relationship!"
"We've all heard of partnering, but Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Tristan Thompson, 27, do it at the gym six days a week."
"It turns out that Thompson's mother is not the only one trying to stay slim after welcoming the baby girl in April - Tristan has been sweating beside her."
"After all, he's an NBA player, so training makes sense, but it's not just about getting these two guys back in shape!"
"It could get their relationship out of the woods and back where they want to be."
"Hard abs are just an added benefit..." He is a professional athlete champion, and his performance is higher
"He pushed her to that height," their coach Don Brooks told us
"So my work is really easier, because he is pushing her inside, so I can demonstrate and practice, let them support each other." It's not just a way to be torn, it's also a romantic way! "



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...you don t then it s not...”
“Turner is just completely wonderful and he s my best friend so that s I guess you can either choose to talk about it or not She added If you talk about it it becomes interesting to people but if...”
““I’ve been lucky because I barely get recognized, and I keep my relationship super private,” Kirby shared.”
“Not even a snog, it was marriage.”“The Crown” actress has been dating actor Callum Turner for two years and plans to keep that part of her life private.”
““To be getting married to him?”
““None of it is real,” Kirby added.”
““The most disconcerting thing was the people I didn’t think would believe it, did, and they were texting my boyfriend, asking, ‘Are you OK?’ I don’t think they believe anything they read now because you just can’t.”
““Even though the [film] crew were there, it was all [in the tabloids] like, ‘The next wife falls at his feet,'” Kirby, 30, told Marie Claire UK in a new interview.”
“While filming “Mission: Impossible – Fallout” with 56-year-old Cruise last spring, paparazzi caught the co-stars kissing on set and the tabloids went wild.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Two years into a relationship with her boyfriend, actress Vanessa Kirby was shocked to wake up one day and find out she was married to Tom Cruise.”


“… You don't know that's not... "
"Turner is great. He's my best friend, so I think you can choose to talk about it or not." She added: 'if you talk about it, people will be interested in it, but if you talk about it
"I'm lucky because I'm almost unrecognized and I keep my relationship a secret," Kirby said
"Not even a kiss. It's marriage." The crown actress has been dating the actor for two years and plans to keep this part of her life secret
"To marry him?"
"None of this is true," Kirby added
"The most disturbing ones are the people I don't think I'll believe. They text my boyfriend and ask," are you ok? "I don't think they believe anything they read now, because you just don't believe it."
"It's like 'the next wife falls at his feet' even though [the film] crew is there," 30-year-old Kirby told Mary Claire UK in a new interview
Last spring, while filming "mission: Impossible - dust settled" with cruise, 56, the paparazzi caught two leading actors kissing on the set, which made the tabloid crazy
"Click to send this email to a friend who has been with her boyfriend for two years. Actress Vanessa Kirby was shocked when she woke up one day to find that she was married to Tom Cruise."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“My skirt is lifted in that photo.” she reportedly said.”
““My ass is located on the back of my body.”
““He did not touch my arm, He did not touch my hand.”
““He did not touch my rib,” Taylor reportedly testified.”
“David claimed earlier that he simply hand his hands on her “rib cage or ribs,” and Taylor was having none of that.”
“After more sparring with the prosecution over her bodyguard, Taylor adamantly disagreed that David accidentally touched her.”
“She also shockingly stated on the stand that David and his then-girlfriend Shannon Melcher, who was standing on Taylor’s other side in the photo, allegedly “appeared to be drunk” at the meet-and-greet.”
“She said she didn’t blame him for not stopping the alleged groping — she blamed David.”
“Taylor and David’s attorney reportedly went back-and-forth about whether or not her bodyguard, Greg Dent, saw anything happen.”
“Taylor reportedly explained to the jury that she didn’t say anything about David allegedly groping her while at the meet-and-greet because it would’ve cut things short for the fans waiting to see her.”


According to the report, she said: "my skirt was lifted in the photo."
"My ass is behind my body."
"He didn't touch my arm, he didn't touch my hand."
"He didn't touch my ribs," Taylor testified, according to reports
David claimed earlier that he just put his hand on her "ribs," while Taylor didn't
"Taylor had more arguments with prosecutors about her bodyguard, but she strongly disagreed that David accidentally touched her."
"She also said in the stands that David and his then girlfriend Shannon Melcher, who was on the other side of Taylor, were said to be" drunk "at the meeting
"She said she didn't blame him for not stopping touching the dog - she blamed David."
"Taylor and David's lawyers are reported to be running back and forth about whether her bodyguard, Greg dent, witnessed anything."
"According to reports, Taylor explained to the jury that she did not say David touched her at the meeting because it would shorten the time waiting to see her fans."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m just trying to let that heal up.””
“I love all that stuff.”Exclusive Details on Justin Bieber’s New Single ‘What Do You Mean’He added, “I got my heart broken.”
“I love to be in love, love cuddling.”
“When Kyle questioned why a young pop star would want to be seriously involved with anyone anyway, Bieber clarified, “I’m a relationship type of guy.”
““I haven’t been in a relationship for a while now,” the 21-year-old said after the hosts asked him who he’d be bringing with him to Australia when he performs there later this month.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The singer opened up about it during an interview on Monday with Australian radio hosts Kyle and Jackie O.”
“...at the moment...”
“The singer who dated Selena Gomez on and off for years made the confession in an interview on Monday Justin Bieber Explains Why He s Not in a Relationship I Got My Heart Broken There s a sad reason why there s no one special in Justin Bieber s life...”


"I just want it to heal."
"I like these things." Exclusive details of Justin Bieber's new single "what do you mean?" he added, "my heart is broken."
"I love to fall in love, I love to hug."
When Kyle asked why a young pop star would want to be serious with anyone anyway, Bieber clarified, "I'm an emotional person."
"I haven't been in love for a while," the 21-year-old said when asked by the host who he would take to Australia when he performs in Australia later this month
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Monday, the singer made it public in an interview with Australian radio hosts Kyle and Jackie O."
“… At present... "
"Singer Justin Bieber, who has been dating Serena Gomez intermittently for many years, admitted this in an interview on Monday. He explained why he didn't fall in love. I'm heartbroken. There is no special person in Justin Bieber's life, which is a sad reason..."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Looked So Desperate Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code Restart RELATED CONTENT Kourtney Kardashian Says Scott Disick Was Shocked to Hear Younes Bendjima Was Her Boyfriend Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Are Ready for 2018 As They Head to Aspen for New Year s KUWTK Kim Kardashian Mocks Scott Disick for Taking Bella Thorne to Cannes They...”
“Kendall Jenner isn’t here for Scott Disick’s antics.”
“The 22-year-old supermodel left a shade-filled Instagram comment on a fan account for Scott, 34, on Saturday night.”
“The fan account posted several paparazzi photos of Scott out with his three kids and his 19-year-old girlfriend, Sofia Richie.”
“On a photo of the group all in the car together with Sofia in the front passenger seat, Kendall commented, “Awww scott and his kids,” with a laughing emoji.”
“The photos seem to be the first time Scott has had his kids out with his new model girlfriend.”
“Scott’s famous ex – and Kendall’s half-sister – Kourtney Kardashian has not publicly commented on the romance between Scott and Sofia.”
“InstagramThe new pair has vacation together several times in the past month and hasn’t shied away from the PDA.”
“Sofia has not been featured on the family’s reality series Keeping Up With the Kardashians yet.”


"It looks desperate..."
"Kourtney Kardashian said that Scott disc was shocked to hear that younes bendjima is her boyfriend. Scott disc and Sofia Richie are ready for 2018 because they are going to Aspen for the new year's kuwtk. Kim Kardashian ridicules Scott disc for taking Bella Thorne to Cannes. They..."
"Kendall Jenner is not here for Scott disek's farce."
"The 22-year-old supermodel left a strong comment on the 34 year old Scott's fan account on instagram on Saturday night."
"Several paparazzi photos of Scott out with his three children and his 19-year-old girlfriend Sophia Ritchie were posted on his fan account."
In one photo, everyone was in the car, Sophia was in the co driver's seat, Kendall said with a smile, "Oh, Scott and his children."
"These photos seem to be Scott's first time out with his kids and his new model girlfriend."
"Kourtney Kardashian, Scott's famous ex girlfriend, Kendall's half sister, did not comment publicly on the relationship between Scott and Sophia."
"Instagram couple have spent several vacations together in the past month, and they haven't avoided PDA."
"Sophia hasn't appeared in the family's reality show series to keep up with the kardashians."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"They were with Angelina for probably 75 percent of the time when Brad was in the country and they'd go back and forth between her and Brad."”
“"All through production and filming, and on her most recent press trip, Brad came to Cambodia in secret to spend time with the kids," the second source shares.”
“...see Cambodia s sights...”
“A second source shares that the former couple s six children Shiloh Jolie Pitt Maddox Jolie Pitt Knox Jolie Pitt Vivienne Jolie Pitt Zahara Jolie Pitt and Pax Jolie Pitt split time between Brad and Angelina while they go to...”
“News that Pitt was in Cambodia "most of the time except when it conflicted with his own shoot schedule."”
“A source confirms to E!”
“While Angelina Jolie was filming First They Killed My Father in Cambodia with her kids in tow, Brad Pitt was taking trips whenever he could to spend time with their children.”


"When Brad is in the country, they spend about 75% of their time with Angelina, and they walk back and forth between her and Brad."
"Throughout the production and filming process, as well as her recent journalistic trip, Brad secretly came to Cambodia to be with the children," a second source shared
“… Look at the scenery of Cambodia... "
"Another source said that the six children of the former couple, Shiloh Jolie Pitt Maddox Jolie Pitt Knox Jolie Pitt Vivian Jolie Pitt Zahara Jolie Pitt and parks Jolie Pitt, went to Brad and Angelina It's time to divide the time. "
"Peter spends most of his time in Cambodian news, except when it conflicts with his own shooting plans."
"A source confirmed that!"
"When Angelina Jolie first shot" they killed my father in Cambodia with their children, "Brad Pitt would travel as much as he could to be with their children



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And she slept over again.”For more on this exclusive story, pick up the new issue of In Touch magazine, on newsstands now!”
““She said that the sex was good.” So good, the woman stayed the night and took a short video of Tristan — identifiable by his distinctive chest tattoos — asleep in bed afterward, which the source shared exclusively with In Touch.”
“As the mother-of-one reels from news of Tristan Thompson’s cheating scandal, In Touch has uncovered exclusive new details — and secret footage — of another betrayal.”
“In Touch has obtained a video showing that the devastating situation is even worse than Khloé knows.”
“An insider reveals the shocking details from Tristan’s hookups with a curvy stunner last November and again in February.”
“Tristan hit on the woman at an NYC club following a November game against the New York Knicks.”
“And while the woman — who the source says is a big fan of the Kardashians — “knew that he was with Khloé,” Tristan didn’t mention his pregnant girlfriend when he brought her back to the Four Seasons in an SUV.”
“He got out first and had her circle the block a few times before coming up to his room, where they had unprotected sex.”
““She slept with him because he’s an NBA star, but she thinks he’s hot, too,” the insider says.”
““He was definitely not careful at all about making sure that nobody knew who she was or that she didn’t have her phone,” adds the source.”


"She went to sleep again." To learn more about this exclusive story, check out the new issue of in touch magazine at the newsstand
"She said sex was good." Great. The woman stayed all night, took a short video of Tristan - which can be identified by his unique tattoo on his chest - and then fell asleep in bed. The source of this video is only shared with in touch
"When a child's mother learned about Tristan Thompson's cheating scandal, contact exclusively revealed new details and secret videos of another betrayal."
"In touch got a video that showed that the devastating situation was worse than Heroe knew."
"An insider revealed the shocking details of Tristan's hook up with a curve stuntman in November last year, and again in February this year."
"Tristan ran into the woman at a New York club after a game with the New York Knicks last November."
"Although this lady - who sources say is a big fan of Kardashian - knew he was with Heroe, Tristan didn't mention his pregnant girlfriend when he took her back to four seasons in her SUV."
"He got out of the car, made her walk around the block a few times, and then came to his room, where they had unprotected sex."
"She's sleeping with him because he's an NBA star, but she thinks he's sexy too," the person familiar with the matter said
"He must have been careless at all, no one knows who she is, no one knows she doesn't have a mobile phone," the source added



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In fact, Markle wanted to stick with traditions and have her dad walk her down the aisle.”
“Also, the show aired for four years and it involved dozens of briefcase girls.”
“Markle appeared on Mandel's TV show "Deal or No Deal" from 2006 to 2007.”
“The National Enquirer reported that Mandel wants to receive an invite to the "Suits" star's wedding.”
“"It would be nice if Meghan invited him," an unnamed source said.”
“"Howie gave her career a big boost, and he's very proud of all the young ladies from the show.”
“He's been reminding everyone who will listen that he found her first."”
“Gossip Cop debunked the previous report.”
“The publication reached out to Mandel's rep who denied the rumors.”
“The "America's Got Talent" judge's rep said that the report claiming that Mandel wants an invitation to the royal wedding is "made-up."”


"In fact, markel wants to stick to tradition and let her father keep her on track."
"What's more, the show has been on air for four years, with dozens of briefcase girls involved."
Markel appeared on Mandel's TV show deal or no deal from 2006 to 2007
Mandel hopes to receive an invitation to the wedding of the "suit" star, the National Enquirer reported
"It would be great if Megan invited him," said one source, who declined to be named
"Howie gave her a big boost in her career, and he was very proud of all the young women in the play."
"He kept reminding everyone who would listen that he was the first to find her."
"The gossip police exposed the previous report."
"The publication contacted Mandel's representative, who denied the rumors."
A representative of judge "America's got talent" said the report that Mandel wanted to invite him to the royal wedding was "fabricated"



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meet Francia Raisa, Selena Gomez’s Actress BFF Who Gave Her a KidneyThe Weeknd was in between dates of his Starboy: Legend of the Fall Tour from July 22 through Aug. 6, then again until Sept. 6.”
“Her close group of girlfriends have all been there for her”Earlier this week, another source told PEOPLE that The Weeknd scheduled performances around Gomez’s medical emergency.”
““The surgery was a couple months ago so she’s been recovering and is in a much healthier place now.”
“Image zoom Credit: Selena Gomez Instagram“She was feeling really lethargic and worn out before the surgery,” the insider tells PEOPLE.”
“It was what I needed to do for my overall health.”The insider says that Gomez is “feeling much better” in the wake of the operation.”
““So I found out I needed to get a kidney transplant due to my Lupus and was recovering.”
““I’m very aware some of my fans had noticed I was laying low for part of the summer and questioning why I wasn’t promoting my new music, which I was extremely proud of,” Gomez wrote in the post.”
“Image zoomImage zoom Credit: BACKGRIDGomez revealed the transplant news in an Instagram post on Thursday, sharing a photo of herself and her friend, Francia Raisa — who donated a kidney — next to each other in hospital beds.”
““He’s been very caring and it’s meant a lot to her to have him by her side.” The pair were seen out and about on Friday in New York City.”
“She had been traveling with him on his tour and he was off during her surgery and right after during her recovery,” the insider says.”


"Meet Francia Risha, Serena Gomez's girlfriend, who gave her a kidney during the" star boy: The Legend of autumn "tour from July 22 to August 6, and then until September 6."
Earlier this week, another source told people that this week's show was scheduled at the medical emergency center in Gomez
"The operation was done a few months ago, so she has been recovering and is now in a healthier place."
"Image scaling credit: Selena Gomez instagram," the person familiar with the matter told people. "She felt very sleepy and exhausted before the operation."
"This is what I need to do for my overall health." Gomez "felt better" after the operation, people familiar with the matter said
"So I found out that I needed a kidney transplant because of lupus and I was recovering."
"I'm very aware that some of my fans have noticed that I've been keeping a low profile for part of the summer and questioned why I didn't promote my new music," Gomez wrote in the post
"Image scaling image scaling credit: backgridgomez revealed the transplant in an instagram post on Thursday, sharing photos of her and her friend Francia Raisa donating kidneys side by side in a hospital bed."
"He's always been concerned about her and it means a lot to her to have him by her side." The two were sent out for a walk in New York last Friday
"She has been traveling with him and he left during her surgery and recovery," the person said



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The woman has reportedly served as a surrogate before, even appearing in a promotional video about the process with her family.”
“...previously told Us Weekly that Kardashian and her husband chose a San Diego mom in her late 20s as their surrogate...”
“This is the world we are creating she tweeted alongside a photo of a seahorse holding a Q tip to which one follower simply put Okay yes pollution is real but I need answers about Kylie s pregnancy A source...”
““Look at this little seahorse swimming in our polluted waters.”
“September 23”
“She s a business woman come on now For her part Kardashian has stayed mum about both hot topics but that didn t stop her fans from inquiring about the rumors by commenting on a tweet she wrote on Saturday...”
“3?” Another mused, “Anyone else think Kylie is just carrying a baby for Kim & Kanye?”Another person quipped, “If Kylie Jenner is actually pregnant, it’s because she’s Kim’s surrogate.”
“One Twitter user wrote, “What if the twist in the alleged Kylie Jenner pregnancy is that she’s Kim and Kanye’s surrogate for baby no.”
“After Jenner’s pregnancy news broke on Friday, September 22, the internet erupted with some conspiracy theorists openly wondering if Jenner, 20, is carrying her half-sister’s child.”
“As previously reported, an insider told Us Weekly that the Life of Kylie star is “at least four months” pregnant with her first child —a girl — with rapper Scott.”


"It is reported that the woman had been a surrogate mother before and even appeared in a promotional video about her surrogacy with her family."
“…… Previously, she told us weekly that Kardashian and her husband chose a 20-year-old San Diego mother as their surrogate mother... "
"This is the world we are creating. She tweeted a picture of a seahorse with a Q prompt. A follower simply said, OK, pollution is real, but I need the answer to Kelly's pregnancy, a source..."
"Look at this little seahorse swimming in our polluted water."
"September 23"
"She's a businesswoman, and Kardashian's silence on both hot topics hasn't stopped her fans from commenting on rumors on a microblog she wrote on Saturday..."
"3? Another mused," does anyone think Kelly just had a baby for Kim and Kanye? Another joked, "if Kelly Jenner is really pregnant, it's because she's Kim's surrogate mother."
One twitter user wrote: "what if Kelly Jenner is pregnant because she's a surrogate mother for Kim and Kanye's second child?"
After the news of Jenner's pregnancy came out on Friday, September 22nd, conspiracy theorists broke out on the Internet and openly doubted whether the 20-year-old Jenner was pregnant with her half sister's child
"As previously reported, a source told us weekly that Kelly Starr had her first child - a girl - with rapper Scott" for at least four months of her life. "



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s amazing.””
““There’s something about the mental aspect of boxing — the drills, your brain has to work, you’re not just sitting on a bike.”
“...for body acceptance...”
““I love that the Miss America pageant is going to get rid of the swimsuit competition altogether,” Aniston said in the September issue of InStyle.”
““You know, a swimsuit body is a body in a swimsuit, no matter what that body is.”Aniston — who plays an ex-pageant queen in her upcoming movie, Dumplin’ — said that shaming people for their size is outdated.”
““It’s time to just stop thinking beauty is in the shape of a size 4 and the right butt size and the right waist size and the right measurements,” she said.”
““It’s just old.”
“We’ve done it.”
“We’ve been there.”
“Let s move on Jennifer Aniston And while Aniston is likely around a size 4 herself she is still frequently body shamed she had to explain in 2016 that she wasn t pregnant she just ate a burger after photos...”


"It's amazing."
"There's something about the psychological side of Boxing - training, your brain has to work, you're not just on a bike."
“… The body accepts... "
"I'm glad that the Miss America beauty contest is going to eliminate the swimsuit race altogether," Aniston said in the September issue of fashion magazine
"You know, the body of a swimsuit is the body in a swimsuit, no matter what kind of body it is." Aniston, who plays a former beauty queen in her upcoming film "DUMPLIN," says humiliating people's bodies is out of date
"It's time to stop thinking about beauty as the size 4 shape, the right hip size, the right waist size and the right size," she said
"It's just too old."
"We've done it."
"We've been there."
"Let's continue to talk about Jennifer Aniston. Although Aniston may be only about the 4th, she still often feels sick. She had to explain in 2016 that she was not pregnant and just ate a Hamburger after taking a picture..."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kim has yet to comment on Star's outlandish allegations, but has in the past attributed her enviable figure to healthy eating and exercise.”
“'Ribs are there to protect your organs.'”
“'No reputable doctor would remove body parts that have a critical purpose,' says plastic surgeon Dr Matthew Shulman.”
“...the case of an accident...”
“Rib removal sometimes whispered about in celeb circles but never yet proven to actually occur is seen by mainstream medicine as a dangerous and unethical procedure as in theory it could potentially result in deadly injuries to internal organs in...”
“'Kim clearly enjoys the results - the procedure has given her the whittled middle she has always wanted - and considers it well worth the time and money spent.'”
“'There's no end to Kim's quest for perfection, but even her family is telling her this is madness,' an insider allegedly told Star of family reaction to the ridiculous procedure.”
“Getty imagesAccording to an outrageous report in US tabloid Star today, Kim is allegedly the subject of rumours that she's had ribs surgically removed in order to achieve an hourglass figure.”
“Kim looking trim - and Star suggests there's a horrifying reason why!”


"Jin Yan'er has not commented on the star's bizarre accusations, but has always attributed her enviable figure to healthy diet and exercise."
"Ribs are used to protect your organs."
Plastic surgeon Matthew Shulman said: "no reputable doctor will remove body parts that have important uses."
“… In the event of an accident... "
"Rib resection is sometimes well-known in celebrity circles, but it has never been proved to be a real occurrence. It is regarded as a dangerous and immoral procedure by mainstream medicine, because theoretically it can lead to fatal visceral injury..."
"Kim obviously enjoyed the result - the surgery gave her the sharp middle she had always wanted - and thought it was worth the time and money."
"Kim Jong Il's pursuit of perfection is endless, but even her family told her it's crazy," a person familiar with the matter said in an interview with the star family
According to a bizarre report in the US tabloid "star today", Kim Jong Il is said to be the main cause of the rumor that she had rib surgery to achieve an hourglass like figure
"Kim looks pruned and stars hint there's a terrible reason!"



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[We’ve had] a bit of FaceTime to ease it in you know.””
“He revealed: "Not yet no.”
“Get a daily email direct to your inbox with our newsletter Sign up Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailGwen Stefani has shut down rumours she's been "dumped" by Blake Shelton.”
“The No Doubt singer took to Instagram to share a picture of her country singer beau kissing her cheek.”
“The loved-up snap is a clear message that their relationship is still on - after claims she was dumped over "jealousy and drama" to do with her ex-husband Gavin Rossdale.”
“"Blake’s through with Gwen’s neediness and all the drama: her demanding, critical ex-husband and her jealousy of him and other women," a source told In Touch Weekly .”
““She told him she didn’t want to spend her life in fear of her famous partner cheating on her."”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now Image GC Images Image Instagram The source added Blake told Gwen that he was going to be doing the latter part of the month long Country Freaks Tour without her...”
“...said the source...”
“"Gwen was so used to accompanying him on tour, she was upended.”


"[we have] a little FaceTime to ease you know."
"Not yet," he revealed
"I receive an email every day, which is sent directly to your in box and our newsletters registration. Thank you for subscribing to our newsletters. We have more newsletters to let me see our invalid privacy notice email. Gwen Stephanie has closed the rumor that she was" dumped "by black Sheldon."
"There's no doubt that the singer shared a picture of country singer Bo kissing his cheek on instagram."
"This love affair shows clearly that their relationship is still going on - she was dumped for her" jealousy and drama "with her ex husband Gavin Rossdale
"Blake has seen Gwen's needs and all her plays: her harsh, critical ex husband, and her jealousy of him and other women," a source told in touch weekly
"She told him she didn't want to spend her life worrying about her famous partner cheating on her."
"Video loading video not available Click to play Click to play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel now image GC image instagram source added that Blake told Gwen that he would go on the second half of a month's country freak tour without her..."
“… The source said
"Gwen was so used to touring with him that she was subverted."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At one point, he mutters to nobody in particular, “I’m not a model, I’m an actor.””
“And despite her best efforts, Momoa will not be charmed into taking off his shirt.”
“Less frown!”
“The photographer prods him to loosen up—More smolder!”
“His latest film projects, though, will potentially catapult him into a different category of fame, and he’s learning that this sort of success comes with a price.”
“Until now, his most visible role has been the brutal warrior Khal Drogo on Game of Thrones.”
“Kidman and Amber Heard...”
“I don t normally pet myself in front of a bunch of people Momoa is on Australia s east coast to film Aquaman the 300 million fantasy flick due out next year in which he plays the lead opposite Nicole...”
““Sorry to ruin your moment,” he says to a nearby couple trying to have a romantic moment.”
“The 38-year-old American actor has been preening for hours, and he’s not entirely at ease with the situation.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“Not just the one who happens to be hot.”
“This should be a lesson to us all, we suppose: make sure that you hire the best and most highly recommended babysitter or dog-walker or whatever.”
“Katy Perry was the host, and she was just ... not overwhelming.”
“No huge controversies, sure, but not even Katy's terrible opening monologue was especially memorable.”
“That's a problem for Katy, but it might be an even bigger problem for American Idol producers, who are reportedly very concerned that they're paying $25 million to Katy Perry to be a judge only for her to flop.”
“On Sunday, I had friends over, and they mentioned that traffic was especially slow near my home.”
“Why?”
“Because American Idol auditions were in town.”
“Yes, in case you've managed to forget, American Idol is coming back, like some archetypal horde that people thought had been defeated.”
“The biggest stir of publicity about it is Katy Perry's salary of $25 million.”


"It's not just the one who happens to be sexy."
"We think it's a lesson for all of us: be sure to hire the best and most highly recommended nanny, dog walker or someone else."
"Katie Perry is the host, she's just... It's not overwhelming. "
"Of course, there's no big controversy, but even Katie's poor opening is not particularly memorable."
"It's a problem for Katie, but it may be a bigger problem for American Idol producers, who are reported to be very worried that they paid $25 million to Katie Perry to be a judge, and she failed."
On Sunday, I had friends who said the traffic near my home was very slow
"Why?"
"Because American Idol auditions are in town."
"Yes, in case you forget," American Idol "is back, like some typical tribe that people think has been defeated."
"The biggest sensation about this is Katie Perry's $25 million salary."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s New Calvin Klein Campaign Including Kylie Jenner and Some Strategically Placed Blankets...”
“At this point you can only decide for yourself see a photo of the excursion here or watch this shaky creepy video of Jenner labor ing a bit to get into an SUV Related A Close Examination of the Kardashians...”
“With her cosmetics company already set to be worth $1 billion by 2022, has she been spending her months closeted indoors planning a multimillion-dollar blogging haven for her new family with Travis Scott?”
“Still, countless questions remain: Did Jenner, with the help of her mastermind momager, wear a baggy sweater just in case she was spotted to add fuel to the fire, or have we finally gotten that long-awaited confirmation?”
“...s lived a life in the public eye something she ll reportedly return to when she switches gears and becomes a mommy blogger...”
“Calvin Klein What seems like an endless number of sources have offered details about the pregnancy and if the rumors are to be believed Jenner is due to give birth this month having kept her pregnancy a secret because she...”
“Kendall Jenner, Kylie Jenner, Kim Kardashian, Khloé Kardashian, and Kourtney Kardashian in the Calvin Klein spring 2018 campaign.”
“(As for her sighting on Wednesday, her baggy, somewhat bulky sweater definitely has served as confirmation of a significant bump for some.)”
“...posing alongside her family members and obscuring herself with some strategically placed blankets...”
“Jenner could have been planning out future mansions for herself and her long rumored baby but the locale was definitely an abrupt departure from Jenner s more recent appearance a Calvin Klein campaign revealed earlier this week that saw Jenner...”


“… The new Calvin Klein campaign includes Kelly Jenner and some strategic placement blankets
"At this point, you can only decide to watch a picture of a hike here, or this horrible video of Jenner laborer shivering to get into an SUV closely watched by kardashians..."
"By 2022, the market value of her cosmetics company has reached $1 billion. Has she spent months indoors planning a multi million dollar blogging paradise for her and Travis Scott's new family?"
"Despite this, there are still countless questions: is Jenner wearing a loose sweater with the help of her planner's mother in case she is found fueling the fire, or are we finally confirmed for a long time?"
“… S lives in the public eye. It is reported that when she changes her face and becomes a mummy blog, she will return to the world... "
"Calvin Klein seems to have countless sources providing details about the pregnancy. If the rumors are credible, Jenna will give birth this month because she has kept the pregnancy secret because she..."
"Kendall Jenner, Kylie Jenner, Kim Kardashian, khlo é Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian participate in Calvin Klein's 2018 spring campaign."
(as for her sightings on Wednesday, her loose, slightly bulky sweater must have confirmed that there was an obvious lump on some people.)
“… Pose with her family and cover yourself with some elaborate blankets... "
"Jenna could have planned a future mansion for herself and her long rumored children, but this site is obviously different from Jenna's recent appearance - earlier this week, a campaign by Calvin Klein revealed that Jenna..."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“Things could have gotten messy incredibly fast if Zayn was getting in touch with Perrie, 22, once again.”
“After she caught him texting his ex Perrie Edwards, he had quite a bit of explaining to do.”
“Get EXCLUSIVE details about what he told his girl right here!”
“Gigi Hadid, 20, was NOT happy to see Perrie Edwards‘ name pop up on Zayn Malik‘s cell phone, but Zayn was quick to defend himself!”
“While the 23-year-old singer couldn’t deny that he was texting his ex-fiance, he did everything he could to assure that there is nothing going on with Perrie.”
“But why was he texting her in the first place?”
““Perrie reached out to Zayn to discuss some items she still has of his,” an insider told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““It was not a flirty text and Perrie has absolutely no desire to ever get back with Zayn.”
“He has reassured Gigi that absolutely nothing is going on with Perrie.”Thank goodness!”


"Tell us next!"
"If Zahn gets in touch with Perry, 22, again, things could soon get messy."
"After she found out he was texting his predecessor, Perry Edwards, he had a lot to explain."
"Here are the exclusive details he told his daughter!"
"Gigi Hadid, 20, was not happy to see Perry Edwards' name suddenly appear on Zane Malik's mobile phone, but Zane soon defended himself!"
"While the 23-year-old singer can't deny that he's texting his ex fiance, he's doing everything he can to make sure nothing happens to Perry."
"But why did he text her in the first place?"
"Perry contacted Zane to discuss with him something she still has," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"It's not a flirting text message. Perry absolutely doesn't want to get back together with Zane."
"He assured Gigi that Perry was absolutely OK." Thank goodness



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story has been updated.”
“Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents.”
“But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner.”
“But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?”
“A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children.”
“If this description of Affleck is close to accurate, he could be the Oscar-winning, movie star version of “Bachelor” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show’s final episodes.”
“For her part, Garner really tried to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly.”
“This fall, Affleck also had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein.”
“In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power.”
“After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly.”


"The story has been updated."
"Despite this, Affleck and Ghana continue to appear in public, go to church together or take their children to school together - although these co-occurrence may be just part of their vows to be co parents who do it themselves."
But before long, Affleck more or less made public his love affair with Lindsay shokus, a "Saturday night live" producer who may have started dating Ghana when he married her
"But three years after the first divorce was announced in 2015, the 45 year old Affleck and Ghana have yet to finalize a divorce agreement, which raises the question: Why did it take so long?"
A new US weekly report quoted sources as saying that the reason why the leading actor of Batman and Superman procrastinates is that he wants to make up with Ghana, who has three children with him
"If the description of Affleck is close to accurate, he may be the Oscar winner and star of the movie star version of the bachelor, Arie luyendyk Jr., who swings between two women in the last few episodes of the play, angering the bachelor country and the rest of the United States."
For Ghana, she really tried to make things go smoothly for Affleck, despite reported difficulties with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, US Weekly reported
In the fall, a dark cloud hung over him, too, after news that Harvey Weinstein, his regular production partner, had been accused of multiple sexual misconduct
"After Weinstein's accusation and the launch of the Mayo movement, Affleck was accused of touching two women and participating in Hollywood culture, which allows sexually abusive men to stay in power."
A source told us weekly: "after Ghana and Affleck first announced their separation in 2015, the" pseudonym "actress" devoted herself to repairing the relationship. For the sake of the children and their children, she really wanted to turn the situation around. "



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Jamie has become really close to Suri over the past few years, and she truly sees him as a father figure, so thankfully she was over the moon when her mom told her.””
““Suri is Katie’s top priority, and she wouldn’t think about getting married unless she was sure it would last,” the insider said.”
“Posen will be designing her wedding gown and daughter Suri will be her maid of honor...”
“...their alleged wedding plans the unnamed source shared There s talk of a small intimate ceremony but of course they want to make sure whatever they do goes off without a hitch They also claim that Holmes close friend Zac...”
“Sources at OK revealed They had some struggles after they decided to go public It changed the dynamic of their relationship and briefly shook Katie s identity as a proud single mom who didn t need a man Speaking of...”
“Sources are now claiming the singer is ready to turn Katie into Mrs. Foxx, with plans for a wedding reportedly underway.”
“Since the Oscar winner’s ESPN walk-off after being asked about the former Dawson’s Creek actress, the couple have peacefully flown under the radar.”
“Jamie Foxx and Katie Holmes have managed to keep their relationship pretty quiet for a Hollywood couple.”


"In the past few years, Jamie and Suri have been really close. She really takes him as her father, so thank goodness, when her mother told her, she was crazy."
"Suri is Katie's top priority and she won't consider getting married unless she is sure it will continue," the person said
"Posen will design her wedding dress, and her daughter Suri will be her bridesmaid..."
“… Their so-called wedding plan - shared by anonymous sources - has a little intimate ceremony to say, but of course they want to make sure everything they do goes smoothly - they also claim that Sherlock Holmes's close friend Zach... "
"OK sources revealed that they struggled after their decision to go public, which changed the dynamics of their relationship and briefly shook Katie's identity as a proud single mother. She didn't need a man to talk about it..."
It is reported that the singer is going to turn Katie into Mrs fox, and the wedding plan is under way
"Since the Oscar winner left ESPN after being asked about the former Dawson Crick actress, the couple have been flying quietly under radar."
"Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes have managed to keep their relationship quiet in a Hollywood couple."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
“Scroll down to see our predictions for Selena and The Weeknd’s Relationship!”
“As In Touch previously reported, the two have been secretly seeing each other for a year.”
“The two have been getting serious since then, even making it official on Instagram.”
“Selena and The Weeknd first went public with their relationship shortly after the new year.”
“Friends are concerned that it’s only a matter of time before it all ends in tears due to Selena’s self-sabotaging ways.”MORE: Selena Gomez Poses Topless After Kissing The Weeknd — Bella Hadid Not Impressed!”
“The insider explains, “Selena’s acting so crazy that he’s starting to have second thoughts about their relationship.”
““She’s so scared that she’s threatened to dump him if he doesn’t let her come along on tour.”Unfortunately for the new couple, a breakup may be the best possible outcome.”
““Selena’s paranoid that fans will be throwing themselves at the Weeknd and he’ll be tempted to stray,” the insider adds.”
“He likes her, but he feels like she’s moving way too quickly.”And apparently, her insecurities are to blame for her neediness.”


"For more information, please click on the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please register for our press release!"
"Scroll down to see our forecast of Selena's relationship with the weekend!"
"As previously reported, the two have been in secret for a year."
"Since then, they have become very serious and even made a formal statement on instagram."
"Selena and Zhou de made their relationship public for the first time shortly after the new year."
"Friends worry that it's only a matter of time before everything ends in tears because of Selena's self destructive way." More: Serena Gomez poses naked after kissing weekend - Bella Hadid is not impressed
"Selena acted so crazy that he began to rethink their relationship," the person familiar with the matter explained
"She was so scared that she threatened to dump him if he didn't let her go on tour." Unfortunately, for the couple, breaking up may be the best outcome
"Selena's paranoid, fans will throw themselves at the weekend, he will be tempted to wander," the insider added
"He likes her, but he thinks she's going too fast." It is clear that her insecurity is responsible for her needs



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So take it all with a big grain of salt.”
“The report which said things could get quite nasty if Paris doesn t choose one of these girls to date exclusively is the kind of fan fiction that has become an annoying reality for celebrities who don t adhere to...”
“With that, unfortunately, comes having every aspect of her life analyzed.”
“Her relationship status and dating life are part of that and when a recent report surfaced that alleged Jackson was dating three women at once the daughter of the pop icon Michael Jackson took it upon herself to set the...”
“...record straight...”
“After Gossip Cop published a report refuting that Jackson was dating three women at the same time Cara Delevingne Ashley Benson and Caroline D Amore according to The National Enquirer Jackson s rep also denied it all saying No idea...”
“...how or why they come up with this stuff...”
“Definitely not true.” Jackson later hopped on Twitter to echo that statement, tweeting, "I’ve never met miss benzo.”
“Caroline is one of my bestest friends who is **straight** and **married**, and also the mother of my godchild.”
“Cara and I were never officially exclusive, you guys made that up."”


"Then eat it all."
"This report says that if Paris doesn't choose one of these girls to date alone, things can get pretty bad. This is a kind of fan fiction, which has become an annoying reality. Celebrities who don't insist on..."
"Unfortunately, it was followed by an analysis of all aspects of her life."
"Her relationship status and dating life are part of it. When a recent report said Jackson was dating three women at the same time, pop idol Michael Jackson's daughter decided to..."
“… Direct record... "
"After gossip police published a report refuting Jackson's dating with three women at the same time, national inquirer reported that Carla delaviny Ashley Benson and Caroline de amore also denied it and said they didn't know..."
“… How or why do they think of these things... "
"Absolutely not true." Jackson later echoed this on twitter, tweeting, "I've never met Miss bezo."
"Caroline is one of my best friends. She's both heterosexual and married, and she's my godmother."
"Carla and I have never been exclusive to the government. You made it up."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Justin spent the holiday playing hockey with some high school students in his home country of Canada, while Selena spent the day with family in her home state of Texas.”
“So, why did Jelena decide to spend the holidays apart?”
“Is there trouble in paradise already?”
“Nope.”
“There's that's definitely not what's happening here.”
““They are still doing really well together," a source close to the couple told E!”
“News.”
“"They agreed it was best for them to be with their families for the holiday.”Apparently, Sel decided having a joint Thanksgiving would be jumping the gun this early on in their rekindled relationship.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Justin played hockey with some high school students in his hometown of Canada, while Selena spent a day with her family in her hometown of Texas
"So why did jelina decide to take a separate holiday?"
"Is there any trouble in heaven?"
"No
"This is certainly not the case here."
A source close to the couple told e
"News."
"They agreed that it was best to spend the holiday with their families." Obviously, Searle's decision to spend Thanksgiving together started prematurely in their renewed relationship



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of 2018 for us...”
“She took to IG sharing a photo of them hitting the red carpet with the caption fbf girlfriends fbf girlfriends A post shared by Olivia Munn oliviamunn on Mar 9 2018 at 10 50pm PST Speaking of dating and relationships watch K Michelle to break down sex and dating slang...”
“Despite the drama surrounding the dating rumors, Munn proved that all is well with Jennifer Aniston.”
“Back in January, she shut down rumors that she was involved with Chris Pratt, the ex-husband of her close friend Anna Faris.”
“Instagram.com/oliviamunnThis isn’t the first time Olivia Munn’s been romantically linked to her friend’s exes.”
“Olivia Munn went on to upload a message for publications constantly including her in ridiculous relationship rumors.”
“Instagram.com/oliviamunnShe didn’t stop there.”
“Instagram.com/oliviamunnSetting the record straight, Munn flat out denied the rumors.”
“Posting a screenshot of a conversation with her publicist, Munn was stunned to find that a publication was preparing a story about her rumored relationship with Theroux.”
“By Jasmine WashingtonWhen it comes to Olivia Munn it’s “sisters before misters.” The model and actress took to Instagram shutting down rumors that she’s dating her friend Jennifer Aniston’s ex-husband, Justin Theroux.”


“… For us in 2018... "
"She shared a photo of them on the red carpet on Ig with the title of a post shared by Olivia Munn oliviamun at 10:50 p.m. PST on March 9, 2018 about dating and relationships. Watch K Michelle's breaking sex and dating slang..."
"Despite the drama surrounding the dating rumors, Munn proved that everything is fine with Jennifer Aniston."
"As early as January, she denied rumors that she was involved with Chris Pratt, the ex husband of her good friend Anna Faris."
“ Instagram.com/oliviamunthis This is not the first time Olivia moon has been in love with her friend's ex girlfriend
"Olivia Moon continues to upload information for publications, constantly including her in ridiculous love stories."
“ Instagram.com/oliviamunshe It doesn't stop there. "
“ Instagram.com/oliviamunnSetting The record is clear, and Munn flatly denies the rumor. "
After releasing a screenshot of her conversation with PR staff, Munn was surprised to find that a publication was preparing a report on her rumored relationship with seru
When it comes to Olivia Munn, it's "the sister in front of the gentleman.". The model and actress denied on instagram that she was dating her friend Jennifer Aniston's ex husband Justin serux



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Mellencamp was furious that she waited for Kemsley for over an hour.”
“The taping featured ‘non-stop fighting’ between two housewives, a source reveals.”
“The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills have laughed, cried, and traveled together all season long – but a source exclusively spilled to RadarOnline.com that Tuesday’s reunion taping featured an all-out war between the women!”
“In typical housewives’ fashion, the drama began before cameras even started rolling.”
“As Radar previously reported, the taping was originally scheduled for March 21 but was postponed due to a major snowstorm that left Andy Cohen and Kyle Richards stranded on the East Coast!”
“The episode was finally filmed in Los Angeles on March 27.”
“An insider told Radar that the drama was so intense that the taping lasted “all day.”According to the source, newcomer Teddi Mellencamp was at the center of the bloodbath as she duked it out with notorious hothead Dorit Kemsley.”
““Dorit and Teddi had major drama,” said the source.”
““They were pretty much non-stop fighting the entire time.”As Radar readers know, Mellencamp and Kemsley’s friendship have duked it out all season.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Merenkamp was angry because she had been waiting for Kemsley for more than an hour."
"A source revealed that the video is characterized by two housewives' constant fighting."
"The Real Housewives at Beverly Hills laugh and cry and travel together all season - but a source completely leaked to them RadarOnline.com There's an all-out war between two women in the reunion video on Tuesday
"In a typical housewife's way, the play started even before the camera started rolling."
"Radar previously reported that the recording was originally scheduled for March 21, but it was delayed because Andy Cohen and Kyle Richards were stranded on the east coast due to a heavy snowstorm!"
"This episode was finally filmed in Los Angeles on March 27."
An insider told radar that the play was so intense that the video "lasted all day.". According to sources, Teddi Mellencamp, the new comer, was at the center of the massacre when he confronted the notoriously hot woman dorit Kemsley
"Dorit and Teddy have an important play," the source said
"They've been fighting almost all the time." Readers on the radar know that the friendship between merenkamp and Kemsley has been ruined throughout the season



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They tied the knot in Italy in October 2012.”
“She began dating Timberlake in early 2007 and the pair got engaged while in Montana in 2011.”
“Since the show’s end, Biel has gone on to star in several films, including “The Rules of Attraction”, “The Texas Chainsaw Massacre”, “I Now Pronounce You Chuck and Larry”, “New Year’s Eve” and “Total Recall”.”
“Wife Jessica Biel is an actress best remembered for her regular role as Mary Camden on the popular TV series “7th Heaven”.”
“The singer also carved out a successful acting career with four Emmy Awards and parts in “Bad Teacher”, “Friends With Benefits”, “Trouble with the Curve” and “Saturday Night Live”.”
“Timberlake began his solo career with the launch of albums “Justified” and “FutureSex/LoveSounds” and would go on to win nine Grammy Awards.”
“The band released three albums that went multi-platinum before breaking up in 2002.”
“Timberlake got his start on “The Mickey Mouse Club,” where he met future ‘N Sync co-star JC Chasez.”
“Justin Timberlake is an American singer and actor who has been married to wife, actress Jessica Biel, since 2012.”


"They married in Italy in October 2012."
"She started dating Ting black in early 2007 and got engaged in Montana in 2011."
Since the end of the show, bell has starred in several films, including law of glamour, Texas Chainsaw Massacre, I now pronounce you chuck and Larry, new year's Eve and total memory
His wife, Jessica bell, is an actress known for her role as Mary Camden in the popular TV series seventh heaven
The singer also won four Emmy Awards and started a successful acting career by playing roles in "bad teacher," "good friend," "trouble on the curve," and "Saturday night live."
"Timberlake's personal career began with the release of his albums justice and the voice of future sex / love, and will receive nine Grammy Awards."
"Before its dissolution in 2002, the band released three albums and won multiple Platinum medals."
Timberlake started with Mickey Mouse Club, where he met JC Chasez, CO star of future's sync
Justin Timberlake, an American singer and actor, has been married to his wife and actress Jessica bell since 2012



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The mother-daughter duo made an amazing and beautiful pair!”
“She was also holding a tiny basket and seemed quite fond of it.”
“She was just 16 years old when she went to Canada for this tour.”
“Princess Charlotte moved around confidently around the garden lawn and engaged herself with the surroundings.”
“At a royal garden party, Princess Charlotte had mingled with other children and toddlers.”
“Last September, Princess Charlotte had accompanied her parents and brother to Canada.”
“Is Princess Charlotte advanced for her age?”
“And then to repeat what was said almost a century ago is very far-fetched.”
“It is quite unlikely that a kid as small as Princess Charlotte could put together the words to make such a complete and articulate sentence.”
“The source revealed that the story of the tabloid was completely untrue.”


"Mother and daughter are a beautiful couple!"
"She still has a small basket in her hand. She seems to like it."
"She was only 16 when she went to Canada for this trip."
"Princess Charlotte walked confidently on the lawn of the garden, integrated with her surroundings."
At a royal garden party, Princess Charlotte mingled with other children and toddlers
Last September, Princess Charlotte accompanied her parents and brother to Canada
"Is Princess Charlotte old?"
"It's far fetched to repeat what was said almost a century ago."
"A child as young as Princess Charlotte is unlikely to put these words together into such a complete and clear sentence."
"According to the source, the tabloid report is totally untrue."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She still says Ben was the love of her life.”From PEN: Christina El Moussa: I Leaned on My Kids and Friends Through the DivorceFor now, Garner is most content to be with her kids and looking forward to their life together.”
““She’s certainly not jumping up and down and screaming, ‘I’m single!’ and planning dates.”
““She will eventually, but it will be a while before she does,” says the insider.”
“...career Garner has three upcoming films Wakefield The Tribes of Palos Verdes which she stars in and executive produced and Simon vs the Homo Sapiens Agenda the actress hasn t begun to think about dating again just yet...”
“It s all in step with what they ve always said was the most important thing their children For more behind Jennifer Garner s decision to move on pick up this week s issue of PEOPLE on newsstands Friday Image zoom Credit David Fisher Rex USA Between her family and...”
““They want to be sure the kids are comfortable,” says a source close to both.”
“Image zoomWhile Affleck lived in the guest house on the couple’s L.A. property since he and Garner announced their split in June 2015 after 10 years of marriage, the actor has now moved to a nearby home to remain close to his family.”
“But it’s time to focus on the future.”Garner, 45, and Affleck, 44, who each asked for joint custody of their three kids, Violet, 11, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5, continue to effectively co-parent together, according to sources.”
““This has really been the most difficult decision for her.”
“The actress, who filed for divorce from Ben Affleck on April 13, is “doing okay,” an insider tells PEOPLE in this week’s cover story.”


"She still said Ben was the love of her life." From pen: Christina Moussa: after the divorce, I relied on my children and friends. Now Ghana is most content to be with her children and look forward to their common life. "
"Of course she won't jump up and down and scream," I'm single! "And the planned date."
"She will succeed in the end, but she will take a while," the person familiar with the matter said
“… Career Ghana has three upcoming films, Wakefield Palos Verdes tribe, where she stars and performs production and Simon vs Homo sapiens agenda. The actress has yet to start thinking about dating again... "
"It's all about what they've been saying the most important thing is that behind their children, Jennifer Garner's decision to continue to pick up this week's people at the newsstand Friday image zooming credit between David Fisher Rex's American family and..."
"They want to make sure the children are comfortable," said a source close to them
"Alfred has been staying in the couple's hotel in Los Angeles since they announced their separation in June 2015 after 10 years of marriage, and now he has moved to a nearby home to maintain a close relationship with his family."
Ghana, 45, and Affleck, 44, each asked to raise their three children together. Violet, 11, Serafina, 8, and Samuel, 5, continued to raise their children together effectively, according to sources
"It was really her hardest decision."
In this week's cover story, an insider told people that the actress filed for divorce from Ben Affleck on April 13 and now "everything is OK."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


“… With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Royal insider Dickie Arbiter revealed that the princess’s marriage to the 31-year-old would be even more star-studded than Markle’s — and the role that Sarah Ferguson would play at the nuptials.”
“100 000 140 000 The princess has dated the 31 year old party organizer for six years and her parents the Duke and Duchess of York said they were delighted with the news...”
“Padparadscha sapphires are amongst the rarest and most valuable depending on quality and a little bit of difference in quality can mean a big difference in price Papas admits that estimating such a valuable gem is difficult without full access but adds We estimate it to be in excess of...”
““With its carefully faceted cut and the set off with the whitest of white diamonds, this ring could easily be worth over £100,000 [$140,000].”
““This beautiful gem is considered amongst the rarest and most valuable of all the corundum varieties.”
““Padparadscha is the name given to the corundum gem that bears a mixture of red and yellow, a sort of cross between a ruby and yellow sapphire.”
““It is a padparadscha sapphire surrounded by 10 brilliant cut diamonds and two pear cut diamonds to give an edge to the standard classic cluster.”
“Gemologist Deborah Papas, from Prestige Pawnbrokers, told the Sun Online: “Like her mother, the Duchess of York and indeed Princess Diana, Eugenie’s ring has a center oval precious gemstone and this one certainly has not disappointed.”
“The three-diamond ring that Prince Harry’s fiancee wears is estimated to be worth around $70,000.”
“The gem expert from British TV show “Posh Pawn” has estimated the value of Eugenie’s ring at $140,000 — double the estimated value of Markle’s.”


"Dick Abbott, a royal insider, revealed that the princess's marriage to 31 year old Marcel will be more star like than Marcel's - and Sarah Ferguson will play a part in the wedding."
"One hundred and fourteen thousand princesses dated the 31 year old party organizer for six years, and her parents, the Duke and Duchess of York, said they were very happy with the news..."
"Padpadpadscha sapphire is one of the rarest and most valuable gemstones, which depends on the quality. A little difference in quality may mean a big difference in price. Papas admits that it is difficult to estimate such valuable gemstones without fully obtaining them, but we add that it is estimated to exceed..."
"The ring is exquisitely carved with the whitest white diamond and is easily worth more than 100000 pounds (140000 dollars),"
"This beautiful gem is considered to be the rarest and most valuable of all corundum varieties."
Padpaladsha is the name of corundum. Its color is a mixture of red and yellow. It is a hybrid between Ruby and yellow sapphire
"This is a padpadpadscha sapphire surrounded by 10 bright cut diamonds and two pear shaped cut diamonds, adding an advantage to the standard classic Diamond Cluster."
"Like her mother, Duchess of York and Princess Diana, Eugenie's ring has a precious oval stone in the middle, which is certainly not disappointing," Deborah papas, a gemologist at prestige pawnshop, told the Sun online
"The three diamond rings worn by Prince Harry's fiancee are estimated to be worth about $70000."
Gemstone experts from the British TV show "posh pawn" estimate that Eugenie's ring is worth $140000, twice as much as mark's



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In 2007, she was seen with Hugh Grant often and later with Spike Jonze.”
“She had a lesbian relationship with Heather Graham at some point in time.”
“It’s crazy… My other girlfriend said she’s going on a three-month no-swiping thing.”
“It’s like circus of the stars.”
“Drew had told Ellen:“My friend’s on a dating app.”
“Drew had also admitted that she is not aware of how to use the dating apps.”
“Last year on one of her appearance on Elle’s show, Drew had rejected all the proposals that Ellen had brought for Drew.”
“A close and reliable source has negated the story and its contents.”
“Gossip Cop decided to investigate it further and found that all that has been reported in the tabloid is sheer nonsense and untrue.”
“The truthThe report does sound ridiculous!”


"In 2007, she used to be with Hugh Grant and then spike jonz."
"She had a gay relationship with Heather Graham."
"It's crazy Another of my girlfriends said she was going to do a three-month non credit card thing
"It's like the star circus."
"My friend is using dating software," drew told Allen
"Drew also admitted that she didn't know how to use these dating apps."
"Last year, when drew appeared on Ellen's show, he rejected all of Ellen's suggestions for drew."
"A close and reliable source denied the story and its content."
"The gossip police decided to make a further investigation and found that all the reports in the tabloids were pure nonsense and untrue."
"The authenticity of the report really sounds ridiculous!"



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mirror Online has contacted Katie and Jamie's representatives for comment.”
“A source said Katie was allowed to date, but not publicly, and that she was so desperate to divorce the Mission Impossible star, with whom she shares daughter Suri, 12, that she agreed to the terms.”
“The pair had been rumoured to be dating since as far back as 2013, but didn't go public with their romance until 2017 when they were caught holding hands while taking a romantic stroll along a Malibu beach.”
“But now, it's said that they've split and cancelled the wedding off.”
“It's being reported that Katie ended things after struggling to get over her trust issues with Jamie .”
“(Image: Getty Images North America)(Image: Getty Images North America)After their relationship became public knowledge, Katie allegedly found out that Jamie had been cheating on her for years with another woman.”
“Then earlier this year, reports that their relationship was over began to swirl again after she was spotted with her ex and former Dawson's Creek co-star Joshua Jackson.”
“Jamie and Katie are yet to address rumours that they've split and called off their wedding, but a source told Radar Online: "Katie just couldn’t get over her trust issues."”
“They added that Katie was "humiliated" when he insisted on keeping their relationship a secret after they finally went public.”
“Image REX Shutterstock Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now They said She had hoped that she and Jamie s now infamous walk on the beach would be the first of many public outings but he still...”


"Mirror online has contacted representatives of Katie and Jamie for advice."
"A source said Katie was allowed to date, but not publicly, and she was so desperate that the divorce mission was impossible for the star that she and her 12-year-old daughter Suri agreed to the terms."
"As early as 2013, there were rumors that the two were dating, but it was not until 2017 that they were found holding hands when they were walking on Malibu beach romantically that they had an open relationship."
"But now, it's said that they broke up and cancelled the wedding."
"According to reports, Katie ended up trying to overcome the trust problem with Jamie."
(photo source: Getty Images North America) after their relationship became public, Katie is said to have discovered that Jamie has been unfaithful to another woman for years
Reports of the end of their relationship came out again earlier this year when she was found with former Dawson Creek co star Joshua Jackson
"Jamie and Katie haven't settled the rumors that they broke up and canceled the wedding, but a source told radar online:" Katie just can't overcome her trust problem. "
They also said he was "humiliated" by Katie's insistence on keeping their relationship secret after they finally made their relationship public
"Picture Rex shutterstock video loading video not available click play click play video will soon automatically play 8 cancel play now they say she had hoped her and Jamie's now infamous beach walk would be the first of many public outings, but he still..."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: AOL”
“The publication’s latest article suggesting Carey and Montana are more than just collaborators is equally bogus.”
“GC also corrected the magazine after it falsely claimed Carey gives money to boyfriend Bryan Tanaka so he can buy her gifts.”
“Gossip Cop previously busted the tabloid for making up a story about Carey hiring a speech therapist to teach her to speak with a British accent.”
“Naturally, Life & Style isn’t the best source when it comes to finding accurate news about the singer.”
“Our doubts were confirmed after checking in with a rep for Carey, who exclusively tells us the outlet’s report is entirely “false.” We’re assured the singer wasn’t flirting with her colleague, nor did the two go home together.”
“...trying to hide anything Of course it s common practice for the tabloids to romantically link musicians of the opposite sex who collaborate together so Gossip Cop was hesitant to believe this latest alleged fling...”
“The outlet s dubious insider goes on to say the rapper was loving all the attention from Mariah who allegedly jumped on French s back as he carried her around The seemingly phony source further alleges the pair left the studio together when they finished recording and definitely weren t...”


"Photo: AOL"
"The latest article in this publication suggests that Carey and Montana are not just collaborators, it's also fake."
"GC also corrected the magazine's false claim that Kelly gave her boyfriend Brian Tanaka money so that he could buy her gift."
"The gossip police arrested Kelly after the tabloid made up a story about her hiring a speech therapist to teach her English accent."
"Of course, life and style are not the best sources of accurate information about the singer."
"Our suspicions were confirmed after checking with a representative of Kelly, who told us exclusively that the report of the store was completely" false. ". We're sure the singer didn't flirt with her colleagues and they didn't go home together
“… Trying to hide anything. Of course, tabloids usually romantically associate musicians of the opposite sex with each other, so the police can't believe the recent so-called indulgence... "
"The media's suspicious insiders continue to say that the rapper is fond of all the attention from Maria who is said to have jumped on the French back as he carries around her seemingly false sources, further claiming that the two left the studio when they finished the recording, which is definitely not..."



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thankfully, she too quit smoking after visiting an alternative health practitioner 15 years ago and has since remained smoke-free.”
“According to the Daily Mail, Harry’s stepmother Camilla once had a 10 cigarette a day habit, which Prince Charles reportedly hated.”
“However, Harry wasn’t the only royal affected by the smoking ban and in need of a cigarette intervention.”
“As a royal staff member told the Daily Mail, “Royal Household sites have been smoke free premises since November 21, 2016.” This includes Kensington, Buckingham, Windsor Castle, St James’s Palace, and all other homes of the royal family.”
“And it’s a good thing she stepped in to help Harry quit, because smoking inside their home at Kensington Palace is actually banned.”
“Harry has quit for Meghan."”
“"So there's no more hanging out of the window for a quick puff.”
“It's not nice for Meghan as a non-smoker," a friend of the couple told the Daily Mail.”
“Image zoom Credit: Getty Images"Harry has promised no smoking at all at home.”
“According to Business Insider, just a few short years ago the popular royal could go through a pack of cigarettes a day, but now that he’s betrothed to Markle, who lives an exceptionally healthy lifestyle, he has reportedly kicked the nasty addiction.”


"Fortunately, she went to see an alternative health doctor 15 years ago and quit smoking. She has been smoke-free ever since."
Harry's stepmother, Camilla, once smoked 10 cigarettes a day, which Prince Charles hated, the Daily Mail reported
"Harry, however, is not the only member of the royal family affected by the ban and in need of cigarette intervention."
"As one royal staff member told the daily mail," since November 21, 2016, the royal home has become a smoke-free place. " This includes Kensington, Buckingham Palace, Windsor Castle, St James's palace and all the other royal houses. "
"It's a good thing that she helped Harry quit smoking because they were actually banned from smoking in their Kensington Palace home."
"Harry quit for Megan."
"So you don't have to hang out the window any more."
"Megan doesn't smoke, it's not good," a friend of the Megans told the daily mail
Harry promised not to smoke at home
"Just a few years ago, the popular member of the royal family was allowed to smoke a pack of cigarettes a day, according to business insider, but now he is engaged to Malcolm, who is living in a very healthy life, and it is reported that he has given up this bad habit."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the most liked Instagram post ever...”
“There were lots of weather jokes Fans thought they had guessed the kid s name and were disappointed they got it wrong While others shared some non weather related references for the name In other news Kylie Jenner now has...”
“Read our roundup of the funniest reactions below.”
“...hope...”
“Many were also disappointed that the elaborate fan theory that said Kylie would name her child Butterfly or Mariposa as a nod to Travis Scott turned out not to be true though obviously some Twitter users are still living in...”
“Of course, there were lots of weather jokes, with most of them tying in the rest of the Kardashian Jenner family's names that include "Reign," "North," and "Chicago."”
“After 9 months of relative silence from the star, fans were quick to share their opinions on the unconventional name.”
“Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott welcomed a baby girl on February 1, revealing yesterday on Instagram that they chose to give her the name "Stormi."”


“… The most popular instagram post in history... "
"There are a lot of jokes about the weather. Fans think they have guessed the child's name. They are disappointed that they have guessed wrong. Others have shared some references that have nothing to do with the weather in other news. Kelly Jenner has now..."
"Read the most interesting summary of reactions below."
“… Hope... "
"Many people are also disappointed that the well-designed fan theory that Kelly would name her child butterfly or Mariposa as a nod to Travis Scott doesn't prove true, although it's clear that some Twitter users still live in..."
"Of course, there are a lot of weather jokes, most of which are related to other names of the Kardashian Jenner family, including Ruijin, North and Chicago."
"After the star had been silent for nine months, fans quickly shared their views on the unconventional name."
Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott, who welcomed a baby girl on February 1, revealed on instagram yesterday that they had chosen to name her "Tommy"



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They started telling friends a few weeks ago,” said the source.”
““Kylie is very happy.”BABY ON BOARD — SEPTEMBER 2017In September, multiple sources told PEOPLE the Kylie Lip Kit creator was pregnant with her first child.”
““They also talked a lot.”
“Later, the couple headed to Boston’s Theater District where Scott made an appearance at Bijou nightclub“He was definitely looking for something intimate,” one club-goer told PEOPLE.”
“Located just outside Boston in the town of Waltham, Bentley was celebrating their annual Spring Day, which always included a big a concert on campus featuring Scott.”
“A SHOW OF SUPPORT — APRIL 2017Jenner headed to Bentley University outside Boston to support her beau.”
“Once he got back, they definitely looked like a couple, cuddled up next to each other among her friends,” said the onlooker, who attended the game and spotted Jenner kissing Scott’s neck.”
“...courtside club anxiously waiting for him to come back to her...”
“According to an onlooker at the Houston Rockets vs Oklahoma City Thunder game where Scott performed before tip off the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and the hip hop artist were spotted holding hands and definitely looked like a couple During his performance Kylie was hiding in the Rockets...”
“PACKING ON PDA — APRIL 2017Image zoom Credit: Bob Levey/GettyA few weeks after hanging out at Coachella together, the couple seemed to make their love official by getting cuddly at an NBA playoff game in Houston, Texas.”


"They started telling friends a few weeks ago," the source said
"Kelly is very happy." Baby on board, -2017, September, September, a number of sources told people that Kylie's Lipstick maker was pregnant with her first child.
"They talked a lot, too."
"Later, the couple went to the theater district of Boston, and Scott showed up at the bijo nightclub," a frequent nightclub guest told people. "He must be looking for something intimate."
Bentley, in Waltham, a suburb of Boston, is celebrating their annual spring day, when there is always a big campus concert attended by Scott
"Support - in April 2017, Jenna went to Bentley university outside Boston to support her boyfriend."
"When he came back, they looked absolutely like a couple, hugging each other among her friends," bystanders said. He took part in the competition and found Jenna kissing Scott on the neck
“… The stadium club is anxiously waiting for him to come back to her... "
"According to a bystander in the Houston Rockets Oklahoma thunder game, Scott performed" keep up with Kardashian "before receiving the report, and the hip-hop artist was found holding hands. During the performance, Kelly must be hiding in the Rockets like a couple..."
"Package on PDA - April 2017 photo zooming credit: after Bob Levi / gaitia played together in cochella for a few weeks, the couple seemed to express their love by embracing at the NBA playoffs in Houston, Texas."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“HollywoodLifers, how excited are you for George and Amal?”
“The sultry singer just dropped the epic news on Feb. 20, and fans are going nuts over who he’s bringing with him!”
“Could one of the guests be his girl, Selena Gomez?”
“You have to check this out…The Weeknd, 27, will not be alone on his Legend of the Fall tour that kicked off on Feb. 17 in Sweden.”
“The sultry singer took to Instagram, Feb. 20 to announce that the North American leg of his tour, which begins on April 25, will welcome Rae Sremmurd, 6lack, and Belly!”
“Sadly, his girl, Selena Gomez, 24, will not be joining him as a performer on the his world tour.”
“But, that doesn’t mean she won’t be there…It’s very likely that Sel will pop up at some point during her man’s huge world tour, since they’ve been inseparable ever since they were first caught kissing in Santa Monica, Jan. 10.”
“Not to mention, a source EXCLUSIVELY told us that she would definitely want to join him on tour, whether it was performing or just supporting him from the VIP section.”
“The Weeknd already released the news that Bryson Tiller, 24, and Lil Uzi Vert, 22, are his special guests for the first leg of his tour, which kicked off in Sweden on Feb. 17.”


"Tell us next!"
"Hollywood stars, how excited are you about George and Amar?"
"The sultry singer just released this epic news on February 20, and the fans are crazy about who he has brought!"
"Could one of the guests be his girlfriend Selena Gomez?"
"You have to look at this Zhou Ende, 27, will not be the only one to take part in the autumn legend tour that starts in Sweden on February 17
On February 20, the sultry singer announced on instagram that his North American tour, which starts on April 25, will usher in Rae sremmurd, 6lack and Belle
"Unfortunately, his daughter, 24-year-old Selena Gomez, will not join his world tour."
"But that doesn't mean she's gone It's very likely that Searle will pop up on her husband's big world tour because they've been together since they were found kissing in Santa Monica on January 10
"Not to mention that an exclusive source told us that she would definitely want to tour with him, whether it's performing or just supporting him in the VIP area."
"It's been announced this week that 24-year-old Bryson tiller and 22-year-old Lille uzz Witt are special guests on his first stop in Sweden on February 17."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s predictable and silly.””
“...with a response...”
“The paper reports that the A listers met up at 3 a m on Saturday morning in the festival s exclusive Rabbit Hole area before retiring to their VIP Winnebago When we asked Miller about the romance in April she told us I m not going to even dignify it...”
“...the Glastonbury music festival in the UK over the weekend...”
“But Miller told us soon after that news of their mutual attraction was silly Now The Sun reports that Miller and Pitt whose production company Plan B produced her latest movie The Lost City Of Z were seen holding hands and stroking each other during a late night party at...”
“Page Six reported in April that Miller and the soon-to-be-divorced Pitt were spotted doing some “serious flirting” at a Hollywood dinner.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)After denying that they’re romantically involved, Sienna Miller has once again been getting cozy with Brad Pitt, according to reports.”


"It's predictable and stupid."
“… There is a response... "
"The newspaper reported that the A-level players met at the exclusive rabbit hole area of the film festival at 3 a.m. on Saturday, and then retired to their VIP winnibago. When we asked Miller about her April romance, she told us that I didn't even intend to make it dignified..."
“… Glastonbury Music Festival in the UK at the weekend
"But Miller told us that the news that they were attracted to each other soon was stupid. Now the Sun reports that Miller and Pete's production company plan B to produce her latest film" lost city of Z "and were seen holding hands and touching each other at a late night party..."
In April, the sixth edition reported that Miller and Pete, who are about to divorce, were found "seriously flirting" at a dinner party in Hollywood
Sienna Miller is reported to be in close contact with Brad Pitt again after she denied having an affair with him



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prince Charles, whose 1996 split with Diana was drawn-out, cringemakingly public and highly acrimonious, stepped in at the bride’s request, on the eve of the wedding, to walk Markle down the aisle after her own father, Thomas Markle, bowed out.”
“Diana was indeed a ghostly presence at the wedding, but somewhat of an understated and wistful one, in light of child-of-divorce sensibilities that so often persist into adulthood.”
“Michael Bruce Curry, the first African American to lead the Church of England’s American cousin, the Episcopal Church, stepped up to the pulpit to deliver a stirring wedding address probably unlike any ever heard within the chapel’s venerable walls.”
“That realization took hold when the Most Rev.”
“...was perhaps not a staid standard issue royal ceremonial occasion...”
“In marrying into the House of Windsor Markle a divorcee who is 36 to Harry s 33 provided an invigorating jolt not only to the royal family but to a Twitterverse that suddenly sat up and took notice in what were the wee hours in much of America that this...”
“A royal wedding TV spectacle where the new world met the old and showed a rethinking of the monarchy »That was just one of the ways in which the couple signaled that theirs would be a more modern sort of royal union.”
“...as the license tag...”
“As the day s festivities shaded into twilight the vibe shifted distinctly in the direction of Hollywood mystique when a tuxedoed Harry squired Meghan now clad in a bare shouldered halter type gown to an evening reception in a classic Jaguar E type all electric convertible with their wedding date...”
“...ceremony progressed the iconic kiss on the sun dappled steps of the chapel with the bride s voluminous veil and long train draped just so...”


In 1996, Prince Charles and Diana's breakup was pulled out, which was daunting and mean in public. On the eve of the wedding, at the request of the bride, Prince Charles walked down the aisle after his father Thomas Marcel bowed
"Diana is really a ghost at the wedding, but considering that children's sensitivity to divorce often lasts into adulthood, she is a little low-key and eager."
Michael Bruce curry, the first American cousin to lead the Anglican Church, was an African American of the Anglican Church. He came to the pulpit and delivered an exciting wedding speech, which may be different from any speech he heard in the solemn walls of the church
"When the fastest speed
“… Maybe it's not a fixed standard issue, Royal ceremonial occasions... "
"In the house where he married Windsor markel, a 36-year-old divorcee gave Harry's 33 year old son an exciting blow, not only to the royal family, but also to a twitterverse who suddenly sat up and noticed it in the early hours of the morning in most parts of the United States..."
"A royal wedding TV event, the meeting of the new world and the old world, shows a rethinking of the monarchy. This is just one of the ways the couple said they would become a more modern Royal alliance."
“… As a license label... "
"As the celebration of the day gradually entered the twilight, the atmosphere obviously shifted to the mysterious direction of Hollywood. At that time, Harry squired in tuxedo, Megan in strapless dress and classic Jaguar E-type all electric convertible car attended the evening reception. Their wedding date was..."
“…… The ceremony was marked by a kiss on the sunny steps of the church. The bride's broad veil and long train were just right.... "



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt share six kids — Shiloh, Maddox, Vivienne, Pax, Zahara, and Knox.”
“Although the two celebrities will undoubtedly make a good pairing for a film, there were claims that “the whole thing is pretty fishy.” Apparently, Angelina Jolie is planning to use the opportunity to get close to Chris Hemsworth.”
“Angelina Jolie reportedly has her eyes set on a new man a year and a half after her divorce from Brad Pitt.”
“The Mr. And Mrs. Smith actress is apparently crushing hard on hunky actor Chris Hemsworth and is pushing a “secret plan” to get his attention.”
“In a recent report by Radar Online, it has been alleged that the 42-year-old A-list actress is keen on getting close to the 34-year-old Australian heartthrob.”
“Apparently, Jolie has devised a secret plan to woo Hemsworth and is hoping to make it happen soon.”
“According to the outlet, Angelina Jolie has been “begging” her team to cast her in a movie alongside Chris Hemsworth.”
“A source revealed that the Maleficent star is a big fan of the actor and his action-filled movies.”
“The same source added that Jolie is already gearing up to return to the big screen and would love to work on another action flick, with the Avengers star as her leading man.”
““It hasn’t gone unnoticed that Angie swoons whenever she’s in Chris’ presence, and there’s growing talk she’s using this as a way of getting closer to him,” the source claimed.”


Meanwhile, Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt have six children - Shiloh, Maddox, Vivian, parks, Zahara and Knox
Although the two celebrities will undoubtedly be a good partner, some people claim that "the whole thing is suspicious." Obviously, Angelina Jolie is planning to use this opportunity to get close to Chris Hemsworth
"It's reported that Angelina Jolie is looking at a new man after a year and a half of her divorce from Brad Pitt."
The Smiths' actress apparently put a lot of pressure on the handsome actor Chris Hemsworth and is working on a "secret plan" to get his attention
"According to a recent report from radar online, the 42 year old A-rated actress is keen to approach the 34 year old Australian sweetheart."
"Obviously, Julie has designed a secret plan to pursue hensworth and hopes to achieve it soon."
According to media reports, Angelina Jolie has been "pleading" with her team for a movie with Chris Hemsworth
"The evil star is a big fan of the actor and his action movies," a source said
The same source also said that Julie is ready to return to the big screen and would love to make another action movie starring in "the avenger."
"Angie faints in front of Chris, which has not been ignored. More and more people say she uses this to approach Chris," the source said



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Post The Shape of Water WINNER Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri...”
“...s Tale Hulu Stranger Things Netflix This Is Us NBC Best Performance by an Actor in a Supporting Role in a Series Limited Series or Motion Picture Made for Television David Harbour Stranger Things Alfred Molina Feud Bette and Joan Christian Slater Mr...”
“In the film categories, the big winner was Martin McDonagh’s Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri which took home four awards: Best Motion Picture — Drama, Best Screenplay, Best Actress in a Motion Picture — Drama (Frances McDormand), and Best Supporting Actor (Sam Rockwell).”
“Lady Bird, directed by Greta Gerwig, was also a notable winner; it took home two awards, for Best Motion Picture — Comedy and Best Actress in a Motion Picture — Comedy (Saoirse Ronan).”
“Related Golden Globes host Seth Meyers nailed his monologue by letting others tell his best jokes In the TV categories HBO s Big Little Lies came out on top winning four awards for Best Television Limited Series Best Actress in a Limited Series Nicole Kidman Best Supporting Actress in a...”
“Limited Series Laura Dern and Best Supporting Actor in a Limited Series Alexander Skarsgard...”
“It was joined on the victors’ list by The Handmaid’s Tale, which won Best Television Series: Drama and Best Actress in a Television Series — Drama (Elisabeth Moss) and The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel, which won Best Television Series — Comedy and Best Actress in Television Series: Comedy (Rachel Brosnahan).”
“The complete list of 2018 Golden Globes winners is below.”
“Best Performance by an Actress in a Limited Series or Motion Picture Made for Television Jessica Biel The Sinner WINNER Nicole Kidman Big Little Lies Jessica Lange Feud Bette and Joan Susan Sarandon Feud Bette and Joan Reese Witherspoon Big Little Lies Best Performance by an Actor in a Supporting...”
“Role in Any Motion Picture Willem DaFoe The Florida Project Armie Hammer Call Me by Your Name Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All The Money in the World WINNER Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Best Performance by an Actress in a Television Series Comedy Pamela...”


"Three billboards in the shape of posters of water winners are on the ebb and flow outskirts of Missouri..."
“… The story of Hulu stranger thing Netflix, which is NBC's best performance by an actor in a limited series or movie supporting role for TV port David stranger thing Alfred Molina feud Betty and Joan Christine Slater... "
In the film category, the biggest winners were Martin MacDonald's three billboards out of Missouri, which won four awards: best film and drama, best screenplay, best film and drama actress (Francis mcdorman) and best supporting actor (SAM Rockwell)
"Lady Bird" directed by Greta Gerwig is also a famous winner; it won two awards: best film comedy and best film comedian
"The relevant Golden Globe host Seth Meyers completed his monologue by asking others to tell his best jokes on TV. HBO's big lie topped the list with four awards, including best actress in TV series limited series and best supporting actress in limited series
"Limited series Laura Dean and limited series best supporting actor Alexander scarsgarde..."
"The maid's story" and "the great lady Messer" won the best TV series award, the best TV series actress award and the best TV series comedian award respectively
"Here is the full list of winners of the 2018 Golden Globe Awards."
"Best performance of actresses in limited series or movies for television. Best performance of Jessica bell sinner award winner Nicole Kidman big lie Jessica Lange fed Betty and Joan Susan Sarandon fed Betty and Joan Reese Witherspoon big lie actors in supporting roles..."
"The character in any movie William Dafoe Florida project Amy hammer calls me your name Richard Jenkins the shape of water Christopher Plummer all the money goes out of three billboards for world champion Sam Rockwell Missouri best performance by actress in TV series comedy Pamela..."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“As Page Six reports, the party was this past Saturday, and there was no shortage of celebs at the outdoor bash.”
“The singer and actress shared a bunch of photos from the party, and in one of the pictures, Lea thanked her close friends JoAnna García Swisher and Stephanie Levinson, who threw the party.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Lea also shared a photo with High School Musical alum Ashley Tisdale, who posted the same photo on her account, with the caption, "Last night was magical.”
“Celebrating my girl @leamichele and Z on their engagement.”
“I couldn’t be happier for this girl, she deserves the best because she is the best.”
“I’m so lucky to have you in my life."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"As reported on page 6, the party was last Saturday, and there were lots of celebrities at outdoor parties."
"The singer and actress shared a bunch of party photos. In one of them, Leah thanks her close friend Joanna Garcia Swisher and Stephanie Levinson for hosting the party."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Lea also shared a photo with high school music alumni Ashley Tisdale, who posted the same photo on his account with the title" amazing last night. "
"To celebrate my daughter @ leamichele's engagement to Z."
"I'm so happy for this girl. She deserves the best because she's the best."
"I'm so lucky to have you in my life."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...didn t feel great about with myself but she s since gained a new confidence about her body...”
“...shooting commitments for her upcoming Woody Allen film...”
“Justin Bieber after splitting from The Weeknd in October fans and even her loved ones wondered why she was giving the Sorry singer another chance and if there was any drama with the R B singer...”
“In a new cover interview with Billboard, the “Wolves” singer, 25, sets the record straight on all the rumors.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Something that I’m really proud of is that there’s such a true friendship [between me and The Weeknd],” she told the outlet.”
““I truly have never experienced anything like that in my life.”
“We ended it as best friends and it was genuinely about encouraging and caring for each other and that was pretty remarkable for me Image zoom Selena Gomez Credit Billboard Sources previously told PEOPLE the pair s relationship became difficult because of The Weeknd s touring schedule and Gomez s...”
“As for reuniting with Bieber, 23 — whom she’s had an on and off relationship with since 2010 — “I’m 25.”
“Image zoom Selena Gomez Credit Ruven Afanador RELATED VIDEO Selena Gomez Opens Up About Lupus Diagnosis And Her Commitment To Finding A Cure Image zoom Selena Gomez Credit Ruven Afanador The entertainer also reveals there used to be someone in her life who pointed out all the things that I”


“… It's not good to be with me, but she has a new confidence in her body... "
“… Making a promise for the upcoming Woody Allen movie
"After Justin Bieber broke up from the weekend in October, fans and even her lover wanted to know why she wanted to give the poor singer another chance, and whether there was anything dramatic with the RB singer..."
In a new billboard cover interview, the 25-year-old "wolf" singer broke the record for all rumors
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"What I'm really proud of is the sincere friendship [between me and the weekend]," she told the media
"I really have never experienced such a thing."
"We ended the game as our best friend and we sincerely encouraged and cared for each other, which was quite amazing to me. Picture zooming Serena Gomez's credit billboard the source told people that their relationship has become difficult due to the weekend tour schedule and Gomez... "
"As for reuniting with 23-year-old Bieber - she's been dating Bieber intermittently since 2010 - I'm 25 years old."
"Image zooming Selena Gomez credit Raven afanador Related videos Selena Gomez opens a video about the diagnosis of lupus and her commitment to finding a cure." the artist Selena Gomez credit Raven afanador also reveals that someone in her life has pointed out everything I know. "



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A Dulcet voice like no other — Billy Joe Kiessling (@buhbuhbilly) August 8, 2017HollywoodLifers, you can leave your thoughts for Barbara’s friends and family and share your favorite memories in the comments below.”
“Rest sweetly Barbara Cook.”
“Josh Groban and more stars have taken to Twitter to mourn the legend — see their heartfelt messages here.”
“Broadway legend Barbara Cook, who starred in The Music Man, She Loves Me, Candide and many more musicals, died today, Aug. 8, at her home in New York City.”
“The community has quickly offered their condolences, with Josh Groban, Lea Salonga and more stars tweeting.”
““A friend.”
“A mentor.”
“A master.”
“I will forever be grateful for the warmth she showed me on and off the stage.”
“Rest in peace,” Josh Groban wrote, sharing a photo of him and Barbara, who won a Tony Award for playing Marian the Librarian in the Broadway hit The Music Man.”


"Billy Joe Kiessling (@ buhbuhbaily) August 8, 2017august 8, Hollywood kids, you can leave your thoughts to Barbara's friends and family, and share your favorite memories in the comments below."
"Rest in peace, Barbara cook."
"Josh Groban and more stars are on Twitter to mourn the legend - here you can see their heartfelt message."
Broadway legend Barbara cook died at her home in New York on August 8, starring in "the musician, she loves me," candid and many other musicals
"The community quickly expressed its mourning, and Josh Groban, Leah saloga and more stars all expressed their mourning on Weibo."
"A friend."
"Mentor."
"Master."
"I will always appreciate the warmth she brings me on and off the stage."
"Rest in peace," wrote Josh Groban, who shared a photo with Barbara, who won a Tony Award for her role as librarian Marian in Broadway's the musician



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share your thoughts and responses in the comments section below!”
“HollywoodLifers, are you loving these details as much as us?!”
“If you’re anything like us, when reports first began circulating on Jan. 27 that Robert Pattinson, 31, and Katy Perry, 33, were spotted making out together you pretty much lost your mind!”
“And you’ve got a good reason to!”
“These 2 have been friends forever, they’re some of the hottest celebs in Hollywood and together they’d be the best couple ever!”
“And now we’re now hearing that this reported bit of PDA didn’t come out of nowhere!”
“According to our sources, Rob has been after Katy for a long time!”
“Head here to take a look back at Katy and Rob’s friendship!”
““Rob has been majorly crushing on Katy for ages, but she was insistent on them being just friends,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Rob wasn’t going to take no for an answer though, and he was determined to win her over.”


"Share your thoughts and responses in the comments section below!"
"Hollywood stars, do you like these details as much as we do?"
"If you're anything like us, when it was reported on January 27th that 31 year old Robert Pattinson and 33 year old Katie Perry were making out, you're crazy!"
"You have every reason to do so!"
"These two are forever friends. They are the hottest stars in Hollywood. Together, they will be the best couple ever!"
"Now we heard that the PDA of this report didn't come out of thin air!"
"According to our sources, rob has been following Katie for a long time!"
"Come and see the friendship between Katie and rob!"
"Rob has been secretly in love with Katie for years, but she insists they are just friends," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"But rob didn't want to refuse. He was determined to win her over."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...so much and that soon her dream is going to come true...”
“She tried forever to make it work with Lamar [Odom].”
“Image zoom Credit JAKE HOLLY startraksphoto com Khloe Kardashian and Lamar Odom Khloé spent so much time with Lamar just excusing away the obvious turning a blind eye to what was so clearly happening that it would be impossible for her not to feel like a fool if she made...”
“They wed on Sept. 27, 2009 — one month to the day after they met (and nine days after getting engaged) — but the marriage fell apart after the former basketball player’s cheating scandal and drug relapse, which led Kardashian to file for divorce in 2013.”
“That’s actually even worse.”Prior to meeting Thompson, Kardashian was in a nearly eight-year relationship with ex-husband Odom.”
“But being so indiscreet about it and letting it get splashed all over the place and having it humiliate her?”
“Adds the source: “Khloé could probably convince herself to get over the fact that he maybe, kind of, sort of, hooked up with some groupie while out on the road.”
“She’s having a child with Tristan, and she’s going to try to rebuild this,” the source says.”
““She’s a hopeless romantic and she’ll try to make this work.”
“That’s not the way a man deeply in love with the mother of his child behaves.”


“… Too much. Soon her dream will come true... "
"She's been trying to work with Lamar."
“JAKE HOLLY  startraksphoto.com  Khloe Kardashian and Lamar Odom khlo é spend too much time with Lamar just to forgive her for turning a blind eye to what happened if she did... "
"They got married on September 27, 2009 - the day after a month of meeting (the ninth day after engagement) - but the marriage broke down after the former basketball player's cheating scandal and drug relapse, leading Kardashian to divorce in 2013."
"Worse, in fact." Before meeting Thompson, Kardashian had been in love with her ex husband Odom for nearly eight years
"But so rash, let it splash everywhere, let it humiliate her?"
The source added: "khlo é may persuade himself to forget the fact that he may, to some extent, to some extent, hook up with some fans on the journey."
"She has a child with Tristan and she's going to try to rebuild it," the source said
"She's a hopeless romantic, and she'll try to make it work."
"A man who loves his mother is not like this."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But, being the private couple that they, we’re not sure we’ll ever know!”
“We’re hoping their long-term relationship, which blossomed back in 2011, isn’t cut short.”
“...help her brother fight his battle with cancer So sweetheart thank you Though reports surfaced of a possible secret wedding for the famous parents back in September of 2016 the duo has yet to make any announcement of nuptials...”
“I just would like to try to thank one person properly and say that while I was singing and dancing and playing piano and having one of the best experiences I ve ever had on a film my lady was raising our daughter pregnant with our second and trying to...”
““You don’t get to be up here without standing on the shoulders of a mountain of people and there’s no time to thank everyone,” the heartthrob said.”
“Amidst all the drama, Ryan did take the time to thank his long-time partner in his Golden Globe acceptance speech.”
““She feels like Ryan has turned her into a baby-making machine!”RELATED: See the Best Looks From the 2017 Golden Globe After Party!”
““He is hoping that another baby will make Eva see how committed he is to her.”Eva, who shares daughters Esmeralda, 2, and Amada, 9 months, with Ryan is reportedly “fed up” with their current situation.”
““Ryan keeps insisting that there’s nothing going on with Emma,” an insider told Radar.”
“The 36-year-old father has been denying all accusations of cheating, though.”


"But as their personal partners, we're not sure we'll know!"
"We hope that their long-term relationship will not be broken, and it will only begin to develop in 2011."
“… To help her brother fight cancer, so thank you sweetheart. Although it was reported in September 2016 that the famous parents may have a secret wedding, they have not announced any wedding yet... "
"I just want to thank one person appropriately and say that when I was singing, dancing and playing the piano, I had the best experience in a movie, my wife was raising our daughter with a second child and trying to..."
"You can't just stand on the shoulders of a bunch of people and have no time to thank everyone," said the sweetheart
"Of all the dramas, Ryan did take the time to thank his long-term partner in the Golden Globe Award speech."
"She felt that Ryan had turned her into a baby making machine! "Related: look at the best shape of 2017 Golden Globe Award!"
"He wants another child to show EVA his loyalty to her." EVA and Ryan have two daughters, Esmeralda, two months old, and Amada, nine months old, and are reported to be "tired" of their current situation
"Ryan has always insisted that Emma is OK," an insider told radar
"However, the 36 year old father has consistently denied all charges of cheating."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—With files from the Associated Press...”
“God is in the midst, no matter what is happening in the world, God is in the midst and he loves you and he is here for you,” he said on stage before performing acoustic versions of Love Yourself and Cold Water.”
“So I can be the man I want to be, the husband I eventually want to be and the father I want to be.”
“Bieber addressed the cancellations back in August, writing, “Me taking this time right now is me saying I want to be SUSTAINABLE..I want my career to be sustainable, but I also want my heart and soul to be sustainable.”
“...received after he cancelled the last leg of his Purpose tour last summer...”
“You have been a true example of what Following Jesus looks like and I m so grateful I get to walk through this life knowing you Story continues below advertisement READ MORE Justin Bieber cancels remainder of Purpose World Tour His message came in the wake of the backlash he...”
“I’m a better friend because of you.”
““I’m a better man because of you.”
““I have learned so much from you,” Bieber wrote at the time.”
“In October, he posted a tribute to his church leader Josh Mehl for the impact he has had on the singer’s life.”


"- file from the Associated Press..."
"God is in the middle, no matter what happens in the world, God is in the middle, he loves you, he's here waiting for you," he said before performing the acoustic versions of "love yourself" and "cold water" on stage
"So I can be the man I want to be, the husband I eventually want to be, the father I want to be."
Bieber talked about the issue of cancellation as early as August. He wrote: "I'm taking this time to say that I want sustainable development I want my career to be sustainable, but I also want my heart and soul to be sustainable. "
“… Last summer he canceled his last tour and received
"You're a real example of following Jesus. I'm grateful that I've been able to go through this life and know your story. Read more on the following ads. Justin Bieber canceled the rest of the world tour. His message is that after strong opposition, he..."
"Because of you, I became a better friend."
"I'm better because of you."
"I learned a lot from you," Bieber wrote at the time
"In October, he published a memorial letter praising his church leader, Josh Meyer, for his influence on the singer's life."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MKHRELATED STORIES:Coldplay in Manila 17 years worth the waitAnti-apartheid activist Winnie Madikizela-Mandela dies...”
“The English rockers’ tour became the third highest grossing in music history.”
“Coldplay both launched and ended its last world tour in Argentina.”
“Reports earlier indicated that Global Citizen is also planning a large event in South Africa in December to mark this year’s centennial of the birth of anti-apartheid hero Nelson Mandela.”
“Global Citizen does not sell tickets for its festivals but instead admits fans who commit to taking actions such as writing to their governments to support development aid as part of the UN-backed goal of eradicating the planet’s most extreme poverty by 2030.”
“Macri, who will host a summit in November of the Group of 20 major economies, said at the time that the festival sent a strong message of support for fighting poverty including by investing in education and women’s empowerment.”
“Macri and Argentine first lady Juliana Awada took to the stage last year at the Global Citizen festival in Hamburg to join Colombian superstar Shakira.”
“Details are being worked out but the sources said that Global Citizen’s CEO, Hugh Evans, met Thursday with President Mauricio Macri in Buenos Aires.”
“ADVERTISEMENTSources close to the organizers told AFP that Martin, who holds the title of festival curator, is planning a concert later this year in Buenos Aires as part of Global Citizen.”
“The advocacy movement, which rallies support for development assistance through music and other events, holds festivals in New York’s Central Park each year when world leaders are gathering for the United Nations (UN) General Assembly and has previously expanded to Canada, Germany and India.”


"I swear the story: Coldplay Manila is worth waiting for the death of anti apartheid activist Winnie madikizela Mandela for 17 years..."
"The British rock concert tour has become the third highest box office in music history."
"Coldplay's last World Tour in Argentina starts and ends at the same time."
"According to earlier reports, citizens of the world also plans to hold a large-scale event in South Africa in December to commemorate the centenary of this year's anti apartheid hero Nelson Mandela."
Instead of selling holiday tickets, global citizens accepts fans who are committed to taking action, such as writing to their governments and supporting development assistance as part of the UN supported goal of eliminating the most extreme poverty on earth by 2030. "
"Mcchry, who will host the G20 summit in November, said at the time that the festival sent a strong message of support for poverty eradication, including investment in education and women's empowerment."
"Marcori and Argentina's first lady, Juliana Avada, made their debut last year at the global citizen's day in Hamburg to join Columbia superstar Shakira."
"Details are being worked out, but sources say global citizenship chief executive Hugh Evans met with President Mauricio makeri in Buenos Aires on Thursday."
"An advertising source close to the organizers told AFP that Martin, who holds the title of festival curator, plans to concert in Buenos Aires later this year as part of a global citizen."
"The advocacy movement strives for support for development aid through music and other activities. Every year when world leaders gather at the United Nations General Assembly, festivals are held in New York's Central Park, which has been extended to Canada, Germany and India."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what’s your favorite project that Rihanna’s worked on?”
“Case closed.”
“A new report claims the couple have been putting their realtor to work in the French capital!”
“We love Rihanna, 29, and Hassan Jameel together, so we’d be so excited if the couple decided to take their relationship to the next level in the City of Love — which is what Star reported.”
“The magazine’s sources tell them that the pair are currently house hunting in Paris — but don’t get your hopes up for the “Wild Thoughts” singer to make the move.”
“A source close to Rihanna tells HollywoodLife.com that the report is completely not true.”
“The magazine s source pointed out that Paris is the perfect home base because it s the heart of the fashion world so Rihanna can work on her Puma collection But that doesn t take into consideration that the Work singer has a lot of work she could be doing...”
“...in the US”
“Her makeup company Fenty Beauty is about to outsell Kylie Jenner‘s and Kim Kardashian‘s makeup lines, Kylie Cosmetics and KKW Beauty, our sister site WWD reported.”
“It’s an impressive feat considering the makeup company only launched in Sept. 2017 — while Kylie’s brand is approaching its 2-year anniversary.”


"Hollywood, what's Rihanna's favorite project?"
"The case is closed."
"A new report says the couple have put their real estate agent to work in the French capital!"
"We love Rihanna, 29, and Hassan Jamil together, so if the couple decide to take their relationship to a new level in the city of love, we'll be very excited - that's what starry sky reports."
The magazine's source told them they were looking for a house in Paris, but don't expect the "Crazy" singer to move
A source close to Rihanna told reporters that the Hollywood Life report is not true at all
"The magazine source pointed out that Paris is a perfect base, because it is the heart of the fashion industry, so Rihanna can work in her puma collection, but this does not take into account that working singer has a lot of work that she can do..."
“… In America
According to our sister website WWD, her cosmetics company Fenty beauty will sell more than Kylie Jenner and Kim Kardashian's cosmetics line, Kylie cosmetics and kkw beauty
"It's an impressive feat, given that cosmetics companies only launched in September 2017 - and Kelly's brand is close to its 2nd anniversary."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'””
““I’m like, ‘Baby, what time you think you’re going to be home?’ He goes, ‘Well, right now I’m kind of in the seventh inning of the meeting.’ He’s like, ‘Keep your head in the game!”
““It is baseball day and night, night and day,” she said.”
“We understand each other’s lives in a way that most other people couldn’t.”Lopez also revealed Rodriguez, the face of ESPN’s “Sunday Night Baseball,” regularly sprinkles America’s pastime into their daily exchanges.”
““It’s good, it’s healthy; we communicate well.”
“But I’m not forcing anything right now,” the mother of two revealed in the April 2018 issue of Harper’s Bazaar.”
““I would love to grow old with somebody in a committed relationship.”
“Hello,” Fallon joked, to which Lopez replied, “No pressure.”Together since last spring, Lopez hasn’t ruled out a fourth trip down the aisle, despite failed marriages to Ojani Noa, Cris Judd and Marc Anthony.”
““Alex, are you watching?”
“Am I staying or am I [going]?”Before Lopez explained the tune, host Jimmy Fallon held up a photo of the couple from Monday’s Met Gala, with a special message for Rodriguez, 42.”


“'””
"I just thought," baby, when do you want to go home? "He said, 'well, now I'm in the seventh inning,' he said, 'keep your head in the game!"
"Baseball day and night," she said
"We understand each other's lives in a way that most people don't understand." Lopez also revealed that Rodriguez, ESPN's "Sunday night baseball" spokesperson, often joins American entertainment activities in their daily communication
"Very good, very healthy; we communicate very well."
"But I'm not forcing anything right now," the mother of two revealed at Harper fair in April 2018
"I really want to grow old with someone who has strong feelings."
"Hello," Fallon joked, and Lopez replied, "there's no pressure." Since last spring, Lopez has not ruled out the possibility of a fourth marriage, although his marriages with Ojani Noah, Chris Judd and Mark Anthony have all failed
"Alex, are you looking?"
"Shall I stay or go? "Before Lopez explains the song, host Jimmy Fallon holds a picture of the couple at Monday's blind date party and leaves a special message for Rodriguez, 42



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The magazine also made a video where Jenner asks Scott 23 questions about herself, and tests how many he gets right (he doesn't know her dogs' names, for example, but he can identify her exact pizza order).”
“The couple posed for sweet photos together for the GQ cover story — one of which Jenner posted on her own Instagram with the caption "home."”
“And he just starts pulling me, and the sun was just coming up, and he had flowers all the way down his house and violin players everywhere," she said.”
“What do you mean?'”
“He was like, 'We gotta go,' and I'm just like half asleep, like, 'What do you mean?”
“"On my birthday, he woke me up out of bed at like six in the morning.”
“Jenner admitted that the two go "the extra mile" to keep their relationship private and oftentimes just "do [their] own thing" — but also revealed "the most romantic thing" he has ever done for her.”
“Kylie is different," Scott told the magazine when asked if he was worried about the "Kardashian Curse."”
“I'm over here.”
“I'm not into all the other s--t. I don't get involved.”


"The magazine also produced a video in which Jenner asked Scott 23 questions about herself and tested how many he answered correctly (for example, he didn't know the name of her dog, but he could determine the exact order of the pizzas she ordered)
"The couple took a group photo of GQ's cover story - one of which Jenna posted a photo titled" home "on his instagram."
"He started playing me, the sun had just risen, and his house was full of flowers and violinists," she said
"What do you mean?"
"He said, 'we have to go,'" and I was half asleep, like, 'what do you mean
"On my birthday, he woke me up at about six in the morning."
Jenner admitted that the two had "gone a long way" to maintain a private relationship, and often just "do their own thing" - but also revealed "the most romantic thing he has ever done for her"
Asked if he was worried about the "Curse of Kardashian," Scott told the magazine: "Kelly is different."
"Here I am."
"I don't like all the other s-ts. I'm not involved. "



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Now is the time, more than any other, when, in fact, children of the world are more vulnerable and deserve all our support.””
“He also thanked the actor for his Unicef work.”
“Everybody says: ‘Oh, you’re an actor, you should be good at that.’ It’s just not true,” he said.”
“He was speaking at Áras an Uachtaráin, yesterday, where he received a special award for Irish people doing outstanding work abroad in sport, science, and the arts.”
““I’m very, very humbled and I’m very, very proud to be Irish, especially today.”
“I shall continue to fly the flag for Irish drama,” he said, on receiving the Presidential Distinguished Service Award, from President Michael D Higgins.”
“President Higgins said the actor had not only contributed to the arts, but also to humanity, through his 20 years as a Unicef Goodwill Ambassador.”
““Last November, when I was presenting the Presidential Distinguished Service Award for contribution for the Irish abroad, Liam wasn’t able to be with us, but he more than deserves a special occasion himself.”
“We started the awards in 2012 to give recognition to the Irish people living abroad who had made a distinguished contribution not just to Ireland but to humanity in general and indeed that is the case with Liam Neeson Mr...”
“Higgins said...”


"Now is the time. In fact, children in the world are more vulnerable and deserve all our support."
"He also thanks the actor for his work with the United Nations Children's Fund."
"Everyone says," Oh, you're an actor. You should be good at that. " It's not true, "he said
Yesterday, he spoke in uahtarain, where he received a special award for outstanding Irish work in sports, science and art abroad
"I'm very, very humble, and I'm very, very proud to be Irish, especially today."
"I will continue to raise the flag for Irish drama," he said when accepting the Presidential Award for outstanding service from president Michael Higgins
President Higgins said that in his 20 years as a goodwill ambassador to the United Nations Children's fund, the actor has made contributions not only to art, but also to humanity
"Last November, when I presented the president's Award for outstanding service to the Irishmen abroad, Liam was not with us, but he deserves a special opportunity himself."
"We started to set up this award in 2012 to honor the Irish people living abroad who have made outstanding contributions not only to Ireland but also to humanity as a whole. In fact, this is the case with Mr. Liam Nissen."
"Higgins said



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We were married before we ever even met each other!””
“The personal side of my life has been chaotic at times over the last few years but it s kinda settled down now and just feels good Though the God Gave Me You singer is the first one to admit he and the glam pop singer are an interesting couple...”
“Blake Shelton really can’t complain.”
“On June 6, the country crooner celebrated the opening of his new restaurant and bar Ole Red Nashville, which joins his existing location in Tishomingo, Oklahoma.”
“And though girlfriend Gwen Stefani wasn’t able to make it out to the festivities, she’s yet another reason he’s pinching himself these days.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I wouldn’t change one thing about my life right now,” he tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue, on newsstands Friday.”
““I’m happy,” he adds.”
““Sometimes happiness can seem like fleeting moments, but this one has been staying in the same lane for a long time.”
“It’s just amazing.”Image zoom Blake Shelton poses for a photo behind the bar at Ole Red Nashville on June 6, 2018 in Nashville, Tennessee.”


"We got married before we met!"
"In the past few years, my personal life has been chaotic at times, but now I've settled down. I just feel good. Although God has given me your singer is the first to admit that he and this dazzling pop singer are an interesting couple..."
"Black Sheldon really can't complain."
On June 6, the country singer celebrated the opening of his new restaurant and bar, Ole red Nashville, which combines with his existing restaurant and bar in Tishomingo, Oklahoma
"Although his girlfriend Gwen Stephanie didn't attend the celebration, she was another reason why he pinched himself recently."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm not going to change anything in my life right now," he said in people magazine this Friday
"I'm happy," he added
"Sometimes happiness is like a fleeting moment, but this moment has been in the same lane for a long time."
"It's amazing." Blake Sheldon takes a picture behind a bar in Nashville, Tennessee on June 6, 2018



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“USA's bombshell report.”
“Neither Jen or Brad have responded to OK!”
“USA's insider reportedly discovered that Pitt, 54, reached out to Aniston, 49, following her separation from Justin Theroux.”
“'It was Brad's idea to get together and talk about a potential project,' a source outrageously tells.”
“RELATED: Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston: 'Yes, we're in love!'”
“RELATED: Angelina Jolie's fury at Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston reunion'He invited her over to his house and she saw that old charm she loved so well.”
“She realised how much she had actually missed him.'”
“The source adds the pair have been regularly getting together in LA, splitting time between each other's homes.”
“'Jen always imagined they would have a family together, and it finally seemed like the time was right to make that dream a reality,' an insider adds.”
“According to sources close to the couple, it was during one of their romantic get-togethers that Jen surprised Brad with a proposal - to have a baby with her.”


"Explosive reports from the United States."
"Neither Jane nor Brad answered well!"
According to reports, the US insider found that Pitt, 54, and Aniston, 49, contacted her after they separated from Justin Cyrus
"Brad's idea is to get together to discuss a potential project," one source said angrily
Related story: Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston: "yes, we are in love!"
"Related story: Angelina Jolie's anger at Brad Pitt's reunion with Jennifer Aniston." he invited her to his home and she saw the old charm she loved
"She realized how much she missed him."
"The source added that the two often get together in Los Angeles and live apart in each other's homes."
A person familiar with the matter added: "Zhan always thought they would have a family together, and finally it seemed that it was time to realize this dream."
"According to sources close to the couple, it was at one of their romantic parties that Jan proposed to Brad, which surprised him - to have a baby with her."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below.”
“Do you think he’s really “traumatized”?”
“His thoughts and prayers are with Mr. Mosher’s family.”HollywoodLifers, how do YOU feel about Chris Soules’ statement?”
“He was devastated to learn that Kenneth Mosher, the other person in the accident, passed away.”
“Before Chris broke his silence, his rep released the following statement, “Chris Soules was involved in an accident Monday evening (April 24) in a rural part of Iowa near his home.”
“He was also ordered to wear an ankle bracelet and hand over his passport.”
“Chris, who was set to appear on the upcoming season of Bachelor In Paradise, is scheduled to appear in court on May 2.”
“Police also reportedly found alcohol in his truck after the crash.”
“Chris was charged with leaving the scene of an accident with a death (a class D felony), but he was released after posting $10,000 bond.”
“Chris allegedly checked the 66-year-old man’s pulse and called 911 after the disastrous impact, but he later fled the scene by foot and was arrested at his home just five hours later.”


"Tell us below."
"Do you think he is really" traumatized "
"His thoughts and prayers are with Mr. Mosher's family." Hollywood stars, what do you think of Chris sules' statement? "
"He was very sad to learn that another person in the accident, Kenneth Mosher, had died."
Before Chris broke the silence, his representative made the following statement: "Chris sules had an accident Monday night in a rural area near his home in Iowa."
"He was also ordered to wear an ankle bracelet and hand in his passport."
"Chris was scheduled to appear in court on May 2 and will appear in the upcoming singles in heaven season."
"It is reported that after the accident, the police also found alcohol in his truck."
Chris was charged with leaving the scene of the accident for death (a level D felony), but he was released after paying a $10000 deposit
"It is said that Chris checked the pulse of the 66 year old man and called 911 after the catastrophic impact, but he later fled the scene on foot and was arrested at home only five hours later."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's so hard.… I just don't want to hurt her."”
“It's really hard to fix wounds like that.”
“News), but the attraction was growing.”
“By the time a pal was characterizing their coupling as "more than just a fling" in early 2016, Bieber was reaching for the right words to define it as well.”
“You see, he'd learned a bit from his rollercoaster romance with Gomez.”
“He wasn't going to recklessly dive into this union, hands in the air.”
“Though he described the Drop the Mic host as "someone I really love" in his February 2016 GQ profile, he was careful not to label the connection they shared.”
“"I don't want to put anyone in a position where they feel like I'm only theirs, only to be hurt in the end," he shared.”
“"Right now in my life, I don't want to be held down by anything.”
“I already have a lot that I have to commit to.”


"It's hard I just don't want to hurt her. "
"It's really hard to repair a wound like this."
"News"), but the appeal is growing. "
"In early 2016, when a friend described their relationship as" more than just an indulgence, "Bieber was also looking for the right words to define their relationship."
"You see, he learned something from his roller coaster relationship with Gomez."
"He didn't want to jump into the league with his hands up in the air."
"Although he described the drop the mic host as" someone I really love "in his February 2016 GQ profile, he was careful not to mark the connection they shared."
"I don't want anyone to feel like I'm just theirs and get hurt," he said
"Now in my life, I don't want to be bound by anything."
"I've got a lot to do."



**Something goes wrong**
“Opening "The Heart Wants What It Wants," a emotional voiceover from Gomez said, "I know him though, and I know that I know his heart, and I know what he wouldn't do to hurt me.”
“Early November 2014: The Power of 'The Heart Wants What It Wants' Likely inspired by her relationship with Bieber, Gomez dropped a personal new song along with a music video.”
“May 2011: Smooching at the Billboard Music Awards At the 2011 Billboard Music Awards, Gomez and Bieber were seen sharing some PDA yet again, this time with a kiss.”
“"He's gonna make me sleep with this every night," she admitted.”
“In fact, she even accepted a very special gift from the daytime talk show host: a pillow with her boyfriend's face.”
“AP Photo/Carlo Allegri March 2011: Thanks to Ellen, Selena Will Never Spend a Night Alone There was no denying she was dating Bieber by now, so Gomez was a good sport when Ellen DeGeneres teased the singer about their relationship.”
“...on Feb 27 2011”
“George Pimentel WireImage Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber arrive at the Vanity Fair Oscar party hosted by Graydon Carter held at Sunset Tower on Feb 27 2011 in West Hollywood Calif Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber arrives at the Vanity Fair Oscar Party at the Sunset Tower in Los Angeles...”
“Bieber looked sharp in a black suit, while Gomez turned heads in a stunning red gown -- but more importantly, they arrived arm in arm on the party's red carpet.”
“February 2011: Holding Hands & Going Red Carpet Official After being photographed together again, this time hand in hand in Santa Monica, Calif., the new teen idol couple made their first real appearance together at a Vanity Fair after-party for the 2011 Oscars in Hollywood.”


"Turn on 'want what it wants'," says Gomez's emotional voice over. "Although I know him, I know I know his heart, and I know he won't do anything to hurt me."
"In early November 2014," the power of "want what it wants" is probably inspired by her relationship with Bieber. Gomez played a new personal song in the music video. "
"May 2011: at the Billboard Music Awards ceremony of the 2011 Billboard Music Awards, Gomez and Bieber once again kiss some handheld computers."
"He'll make me sleep with this every night," she admits
"In fact, she even accepted a very special gift from the daytime talk show host: a pillow with a boyfriend's face."
"Associated Press Photo / Carlo Allegri March 2011: thanks to Ellen, Selena will never spend the night alone again. There's no denying that she's dating Bieber now, so when Ellen DeGeneres teases the singer about their relationship, Gomez is a great sport. "
"February 27, 2011"
"George Pimentel, Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber arrive at the vanity fair Oscar party hosted by Glenn Carter at Sunset Tower, California, West Hollywood on February 27, 2011. Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber arrive at the vanity fair Oscar party hosted by Sunset Tower, Los Angeles on February 27, 2011..."
"Bieber looked sharp in a black suit, while Gomez turned around in a stunning red dress - but more importantly, they walked up the red carpet of the party hand in hand."
"February 2011: walking the red carpet hand in hand" the young idol couple made their first real appearance on the vanity fair after the 2011 Oscars in Hollywood after taking a group photo again in Santa Monica, California



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are set to exchange their vows in May next year.”
“"Kate, as a result, has vowed to take Meghan under her wing and shelter her through it all.”
“Things did not change, or rather took a disgusting turn, when the couple announced their engagement.”
“Numerous people expressed their unhappiness over the royal marrying the Suits star, prime among them being Harry's stepmother Camilla.”
“However, the soon-to-be-royal has maintained her composure, not reacting to the negativity.”
“While the royal family has also chosen to ignore this, apparently Kate Middleton has taken it upon herself to protect Markle.”
“According to Australian magazine New Idea, the Duchess of Cambridge has vowed to shield Markle through the whole thing.”
“"Kate's been there and done that and knows how hard those first few weeks of royal life can be.”
“Kate learnt very early on that you have to have thick skin to handle Camilla and all the critics that come out of the woodwork to have a swipe at you," claimed a palace insider.”
“Knowing how bad the situation could get, Kate has apparently swooped in to rescue Markle.”


"Prince Harry and Megan Marcel are scheduled to exchange vows in May next year."
"So Kate vowed to protect Megan and get her through."
"When the couple announced their engagement, things didn't change, or something disgusting happened."
"Many people are dissatisfied with the royal family's marriage to a suit star, the most important of which is Harry's stepmother, Camilla."
"However, soon to be a member of the royal family, she remained calm and did not respond to negative emotions."
"Although the royal family has chosen to ignore this, it is clear that Kate Middleton has taken the responsibility to protect Marcel."
The Duchess of Cambridge has vowed to protect markel throughout the incident, according to Australian new ideas magazine
"Kate has done it there and knows how hard the first few weeks of royal life are."
"Kate has known for a long time that you have to be cheeky to deal with Camilla and all those who criticize you," claimed one palace insider
"Knowing how bad things are going to get, Kate obviously rushed to rescue mark."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whatever the reason and regardless of scientific facts, history has taught us that the world of Goop will keep on spinning.”
“Or Goop was just really tired of all those F-bombs.”
“With almost 10 years of Web site experience under her belt and decades more as a Hollywood actress Paltrow typically seems unbothered by her opponents who have lambasted her for everything from publishing outrageous gift guides to using pseudo science...”
“...to promote products...”
“That is until ob gyn Jen Gunter a longtime critic of the lifestyle Web site published a blog post in January about Goop selling its much discussed 66 vaginal jade eggs writing The only thing your post got right is...”
“...to check with your doctor before using one...”
“So let me give you some free advice don t use vaginal jade eggs In a rare move Goop responded on Thursday with Paltrow tweeting out a link to the statement along with Michelle Obama s famed Democratic convention quote...”
“When they go low we go high which it should be noted was not in reference to vaginas...”
““As goop has grown, so has the attention we receive.”
“We consistently find ourselves to be of interest to many and for that we are grateful but we also find that there are third parties who critique goop to leverage that interest and bring attention to themselves the post began...”


"Whatever the reason, whatever the scientific facts, history tells us that Google's world will continue to rotate."
"Or is gupp really tired of those F-bombs?"
"Paltrow has nearly 10 years of website experience. As a Hollywood actress, she has decades of working experience, but her opponents are not stingy with her. Everything she has done, from publishing outrageous gift guides to using pseudoscience, is denouncing her..."
“… Promote the product... "
"That's until ob GYN Jen Gunter, a longtime critic of lifestyle websites, published a blog post in January about goop's sale of 66 highly discussed vaginal eggs. The only right thing about your post is that..."
“… Check with your doctor before use... "
"So let me give you some free advice not to use vaginal eggs, which is a rare move. Google responded on Thursday that Paltrow posted a link on twitter, along with a statement quoted by Michelle Obama's famous Democratic Convention..."
"When they go down and we go up, it should be noted that there is no mention of vagina..."
"With the development of goop, we get more and more attention."
"We've always found ourselves interested in a lot of people, and we appreciate that, but we've also found that there are third parties criticizing goop to take advantage of this interest and draw attention to the beginning of their posts..."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Rich Fury/Getty Images]”
“All The Wrong Reasons, Says HalperinHas Brad Pitt Found New Love After Angelina Jolie Divorce?”
“That’s the alarming claim being made in a recent article in The National Inquirer.”
“According to the Enquirer, Brad has been living the “hippy” lifestyle, refusing to take showers and change his clothes as he continues to get over his divorce from Angelina Jolie and the separation from his children.”
“He has also allegedly been sleeping on friends’ couches because he’s afraid that if he remains home alone, he will relapse into addiction.”
“But Gossip Cop, a site that’s become known for debunking celebrity rumors has said the report smells just as fishy as they claim Brad Pitt smells.”
““Brad’s gone days, if not weeks, at a time without taking a shower, so of course he stinks of body odor a lot of the time,” an alleged close friend of the War Machine actor reportedly told The National Enquirer, as reported by Gossip Cop.”
“But Gossip Cop has a different story that they claim they received from someone who is actually in Pitt’s inner circle.”
““We’re told Pitt isn’t living the lifestyle of a smelly drifter, and the claim otherwise is completely bogus,” Gossip Cop states.”
“The latest report in the ongoing Brad Pitt Angelina Jolie saga is that Brad Pitt was “allowed” to see his children to celebrate Father’s Day.”


"Rich fury / Getty Images"
"For all the wrong reasons, did Brad Pitt find a new love after Angelina Jolie's divorce?"
"This is a shocking statement in a recent article in the national inquirer."
According to the inquirer, Brad has been living a "hippie" life, refusing to take a bath and change clothes because he has been overcoming his divorce from Angelina Jolie and separation from his children
"It is said that he has been sleeping on a friend's sofa because he is worried that if he stays at home alone, he will become addicted again."
"But the gossip police website, known for debunking celebrity rumors, said the report smelled as suspicious as Brad Pitt they claimed."
"Brad hasn't bathed every time for days, even weeks, so of course he stinks a lot," a close friend of Brad, who is said to be a war machine actor, told the national inquirer, gossip police reported
"But gossip police has a different story, and they claim that they got it from someone who is actually Peter's inner circle."
"We were told Pete wasn't a stinking tramp, otherwise it was totally false," the gossip police said
The latest report on the ongoing legend of Brad Pitt Angelina Jolie is that Brad Pitt is allowed to see his children celebrate father's day



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but have been known to escape to their second home in Ireland and another house they own in The Hamptons.”
“She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and they welcomed a set of twins, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge, via a surrogate seven years later.”
“The couple married in a synagogue in Manhattan in 1997 after they were set up by one of Parker’s brothers.”
“Husband Matthew Broderick is the winner of two Tony Awards and is well-known for playing the lead character in the 1986 success “Ferris Bueller’s Day Off” and for voicing Simba in the Disney classic “The Lion King” (1994).”
“She is a four-time Golden Globe winner and two-time Emmy Award winner for her work on the show.”
“Parker is best known for her portrayal of Carrie Bradshaw on the HBO hit series “Sex and the City”.”
“Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick Net Worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick.”


Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but they are known to have fled to their second home in Ireland and another house in Hampton
"She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and seven years later they had twins through surrogate mothers, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge."
"In 1997, a brother of Parker founded the couple and they got married in a synagogue in Manhattan."
Husband Matthew Brodrick, two Tony Award winners, is famous for his leading role in the 1986 success film "the holiday of Ferris Buller" and his voice dubbing for Simba in the Disney classic "the lion king" (1994)
"She's a four time Golden Globe winner and two time Emmy winner because of her performance on the show."
Parker is best known for her role as Kelly Bradshaw in the HBO hit sex and the city
"Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick net worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


“… With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But if we know Johnny -- and we don't -- he'll be shambling across the stage like the reanimated cadaver of his idol Keith Richards long after everyone has stopped caring or paying attention.”
“Basically, just think of everything Donald Trump has said about the mainstream media in the past two years and know that all of those things are actually true of the Aussie tabloids.”
“If you haven't seen the image in question, just imagine what Johnny would look like if he had spent the past few months preparing for a live-action sequel to the Corpse Bride.”
“Or ya know you can just see for yourself in the pic below Look Depp superfans are a real and terrifying bunch and we know better than to needlessly provoke them so before you scroll down to the comments to...”
“...excoriate us for cracking jokes about a dying man let us make one thing clear Johnny Depp is probably not dying...”
“In fact, he's probably just fine.”
“In fact, his reps have already issued a statement claiming that he's losing weight on purpose and is healthier than he's been in years.”
“But none of that will stop the Australian tabloids from working their readers up into a lather with claims that Depp is on his deathbed.”
“In case you re not familiar Aussie tabloids make British tabloids look like freakin New York Times in terms of journalistic integrity which is really saying something as British tabloids have been putting US tabloids to shame in terms of...”
“...well shamelessness for the past couple decades...”


"But if we knew Johnny - and we didn't know him - he would stagger across the stage like the resurrected body of his idol Keith Richards, and people would no longer care or pay attention to him."
"Basically, just think about what Donald Trump has said to the mainstream media in the past two years, and you know that all these words actually apply to Australian tabloids."
"If you haven't seen this picture yet, imagine what Johnny would be like if he had been preparing for a live action sequel to the corpse bride for the past few months."
"Or you know that you can see with your own eyes in the picture below that Depp super fans are a real and terrible group. We know not to irritate them unnecessarily, so before you scroll to the comments..."
“… Denounce us for making fun of a dying man. Let's find out one thing. Johnny Depp may not die... "
"In fact, he could be fine."
"In fact, his representatives have issued a statement claiming that he deliberately lost weight and was healthier than in the past few years."
"But none of these can stop Australian tabloids from pushing their readers into a bubble, claiming that Depp is dying."
"If you are not familiar with Australian tabloids, British tabloids are just like the geeks in the New York Times in terms of news integrity, which really shows something, because British tabloids have been making American tabloids It's a shame on me. "
"Well, the shamelessness of the past few decades..."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow Be on Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, Tumblr and Instagram...”
“"It was always 'their place'."”
“This time around it is set to take place in Mexico reports Woman's Day, just days after Jennifer confirmed her split with Justin Theroux.”
“"Jen's in her element organising it all," a source told the magazine.”
“Nearly 18 years after their first wedding, Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston reportedly are planning their second wedding to each other.”
“They are pictured here together in 2004.”
“Source: GettyThe ceremony is reportedly set to take place in Cabo San Lucas in Mexico, a place where Jen regularly holidays.”
“As for the chosen venue, the publication reports it is the One & Only Palmilla resort where the starting rate for a room is $651 per night.”
“Source: One & OnlyBrad and Jen want to 'book out the whole place' for privacy reasons, according to the mag's source.”


"Follow Facebook, twitter, pinterest, Tumblr and instagram..."
"It's always their place."
"This time will be held on Mexican women's day, just a few days after Jennifer confirmed her break-up with Justin seru."
A source told the magazine: "Jennifer is her master at organizing everything."
It is reported that nearly 18 years after Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston's first wedding, they are planning their second wedding
"They took pictures here in 2004."
Source: it is reported that the ceremony will be held in Cabo San Lucas, Mexico, where Jennifer often takes a holiday
"As for the selected location, the publication reports that this is the only resort in Palmyra where rooms start at $651 a night."
"Source: according to a magazine source, only one & onlybrad and Jen wanted to 'book the whole place' for privacy reasons."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just an amazing job by her of setting the boundary."”
“I always tell her, like, she saved my life because she was the first person to really tell me that, like, the party's over.”
“"I didn't know what my plan was," he said.”
“After some thinking, Zac decided to try to convince a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get prescription pills.”
“ABC via Getty ImagesHis partying, though, got more intense, and he desperately wanted more pills.”
“So, I had a lot of the outsides going on."”
“And, you know, I started dating a girl my sophomore year that I would eventually marry.”
“I mean, I was playing baseball, and I was trying to get out of there in four years, which I was able to do.”
“"I would not tell you that my drug use was so rampant during college.”
“And the Adderall eventually turned into some cocaine use here and there," he said.”


"She's great at setting boundaries."
"I always told her that she saved my life because she was the first to really tell me that the party was over."
"I don't know what my plan is," he said
After careful consideration, Zach decided to persuade a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get the prescription medicine
"ABC via Getty Images although his party is getting more and more intense, he is eager for more pills."
"So, I have a lot to do."
"And, you know, I started dating a girl in my sophomore year, and I'll eventually marry her."
"I mean, I was playing baseball and I wanted to get out of it in four years, but I did it."
"I'm not going to tell you how rampant I was when I was in college."
"Snakes eventually turned into cocaine abuse," he said



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She quipped: “I actually legally changed it to Fergie Duhamel, so we’ll see how we’re going to go forward.””
“...ask him The songstress who was born Stacy Ann Ferguson also revealed that she legally took her ex husband s last name prior to their split and that the future of her name remains unclear...”
“Fergie was overcome with emotion while talking about her split from husband Josh Duhamel during an appearance on The Wendy Williams Show.”
“The “Hungry” singer opened up about how she and the Transformers actor are dealing with their divorce while raising their 4-year-old son, Axl.”
““Yeah.”
“It wasn’t my plan, I wanted to stay married forever,” she admitted during the Thursday, October 26 episode.”
““He is [good looking], always will be.”
“I love Josh, he’s the father of my child.”
“We forever have that project together, and we’re doing the best we can,” she said.”
“Fergie, 42, added: “You made me cry!”


"In fact, I legally changed it to fajituhammer, so we're going to see how we're going to move forward," she quipped
“…… Asked him, the singer, who was born in Stacy Ann Ferguson, also revealed that before their breakup, she legally took her ex husband's surname, and the future of her name is still unclear.... "
"On Wendy Williams, when it comes to her breaking up with her husband, Josh Duhamel, Ferguson is very emotional."
The "hungry" singer spoke out about how she and the transformers actor handled their divorce while raising their 4-year-old son axel
"Yes."
"It's not my plan, I want to stay married forever," she admitted on Thursday, October 26
"He's very handsome, and he'll be like that in the future."
"I love Josh. He's the father of my child."
"We are always working together to complete this project and we are doing our best," she said
Ferguson, 42, added: "you made me cry!"



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“Separately they d each jump at it but working together isn t an easy yes for them given the fan hysteria that surrounded their split years ago If it helps the unknown movie is described by the source as an edgy project that has absolutely nothing in common with the...”
“Professionally, at least!”
“Will the exes agree to take roles in the same movie?”
“Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart, together again?”
“Buckle up for this one, Twihards.”
“Rob and Kristen have reportedly both been approached to star in the same movie, which would be their first joint project since their Twilight days.”
“At lot has happened since then — blossoming careers, other romances, and a very messy, very public breakup.”
“It’s pretty understandable that the actors are both reportedly thinking it over before ever working together again.”
““Kristen is more hesitant than Rob right now, but they’ve agreed to discuss it,” an insider told OK!”


"Let us know!"
"They're all dancing, but it's not easy for them to cooperate. Considering the hysteria of the fans who broke up with them many years ago, if it helps, this unknown movie is described by the source as a relationship with Avant garde projects that have nothing in common. "
"At least professionally!"
"Will ex wives agree to play roles in the same movie?"
"Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart, together again?"
"Fasten your seat belt, tweehard."
"It is reported that rob and Christine have been invited to play in the same film, which will be their first cooperation project after twilight."
"Since then, a lot of things have happened - a thriving career, other romances, and a very chaotic, very public breakup."
"It is reported that both actors are considering this matter before they cooperate again, which is understandable."
"Christine is more hesitant now than rob, but they have agreed to discuss it," an insider told OK



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She kind of gives me a lot of, like, maternal advice," Gomez added.”
“"She's very cool and very sweet.”
“Culinary fun aside, Justin Bieber’s ex-girlfriend can also lean on Aniston.”
““Like, we've made pizzas at her house."”
““She has a pizza oven,” Gomez recalled.”
“They manage her as well, so it was kind of like a friendly meeting and instantly she's, like, inviting me to her house.”So what exactly do Gomez and Aniston do when they hang?”
“"We met through my management.”
““Honestly, she’s amazing,” Gomez gushed of Justin Theroux’s fiancee.”
“The “Good for You” songstress, 22, has gushed about the Cake actress, 46, on Instagram before, but she went into detail during a recent interview with KTU’s Cubby and Carolina, and let’s just say there is pizza involved.”
“J-E-A-L-O-U-S. Selena Gomez is BFFs with Taylor Swift and a bevy of other amazing gals, but her friendship with Jennifer Aniston is what we want to know about ASAP.”


"She gave me a lot of advice, for example, from my mother," Gomez added
"She's cool, she's cute."
"In addition to cooking fun, Justin Bieber's ex girlfriend can also rely on Aniston."
"For example, we made pizza at her house."
"She had a pizza oven," Gomez recalled
"They run her, too, so it's like a friendly meeting and she invited me to her house right away." So what did Gomez and Aniston do when they hanged? "
"We met through my management."
"To tell you the truth, she's wonderful," Gomez gushed about Justin Cyrus's fiancee
"The 22-year-old singer has talked a lot about the 46 year old cake actress on instagram before, but in recent interviews with ktu cubby and Carolina, she talked about the details. We can only say that it involves pizza."
"J-e-a-l-o-u-s. Selena Gomez is a good friend of Taylor swift and a group of other amazing girls, but her friendship with Jennifer Aniston is something we want to get to know as soon as possible."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There were issues they couldn’t resolve and they realized they were better as friends than together.””
“After appearing on an episode of Late Night with Seth Meyers, where Miller is now a supervising producer, Garner sought him out for a conversation.”
“Garner was on a work trip to New York City when she approached Shookus about the fling.”
““Lindsay refused to back down or quit the affair,” says a source.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Responds a source close to Shookus: “Jennifer and Lindsay do not have any relationship.”Multiple sources have told PEOPLE that Affleck and Shookus started having an affair in 2013, two years before the actor and Garner announced their separation.”
“Shookus was also still with her husband Kevin Miller, then a fellow SNL producer.”
“The two split in 2014.”
“However, other sources close to Affleck and Shookus maintain that the two were just friends and didn’t date before their respective separations.”
“Sources also say Garner spoke to Shookus’ ex about the affair.”


"There are problems they can't solve, and they realize that it's better to be friends than together."
"After starring in an episode of late at night, Miller is now the producer of the episode, and Ghana talks to him."
"When Ghana was on a business trip to New York, she talked to shawkes about something."
"Lindsay refuses to give up or withdraw from extramarital affairs," a source said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
A source close to shokus responded: "Jennifer has nothing to do with Lindsay." A number of sources told people that Affleck and shokus had an affair since 2013, when the actor and Ghana announced their separation two years ago
"Shookus was also with her husband, Kevin Miller, who was a producer at SNL at the time."
"The two broke up in 2014."
"However, other sources close to Affleck and shokus believe that they are just friends and did not date before they separated."
"The source also said Ghana had talked to shokus's predecessor about it."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think Selena is going to get Justin for his birthday?”
“Justin and Selena’s relationship “is very important to them,” a source EXCLUSIVELY tell HollywoodLife.com, and that means they won’t do something big – like move in together or have kids – until they’re ready.”
“Ahead of his big bash, we’ve learned that Selena Gomez has been hard at work planning something ‘romantic’ for his big day!”
“Justin Bieber turns 24 on March 1, and it might be his best birthday ever, thanks to Selena Gomez, 25.”
“This will be the first time Justin and Selena will celebrate his birthday since getting back together in 2017, and the “Wolves” singer is “excited to make Justin’s day special and incredibly romantic,” a source close to Ms. Gomez EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
“She has been busy plotting and planning with Justin s friends to surprise him with a party full of those closest to him Selena according to the insider has reached out to Justin s manager Scooter Braun 36 and his parents to put together a party that he ll never...”
“...forget...”
“Of course, Justin’s favorite part might be the after-party, as the source tells HollywoodLife.com that Selena has been “arranging for some romance” for Justin’s birthday.”
““After all the gifts have been opened, and the party ends, Selena is looking forward to some private, intimate time for just the two of them,” the source adds.”
““She is doing her best to make Justin’s birthday as romantic and unforgettable as possible.”These two have been getting pretty “romantic” and “intimate” lately.”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think Serena will give Justin for his birthday?"
"The relationship between Justin and Serena" is very important to them, "a source told Hollywood life. Com, which means they won't do anything big before they are ready, such as cohabiting or having children
"Before his big party, we learned that Selena Gomez had been trying to plan something romantic for his big day!"
"Justin Bieber turns 24 on March 1, which may be his best birthday ever, thanks to Serena Gomez, 25."
A source close to Ms. Gomez told reporters exclusively: "this will be Justin and Selena's first birthday celebration since their reunion in 2017. The" wolf "singer" is very excited to make Justin's birthday special and romantic. " Hollywood life. "
"She has been busy plotting and planning with Justin's friends to surprise him with a party. According to people familiar with the matter, Selena has contacted Justin's agent Scott Braun 36 and his parents to hold a party that he will never attend... "
“… Forget... "
"Of course, according to sources, Justin's favorite part may be that after the party, Hollywood life.com.selena has been" arranging some romance "for Justin's birthday
"After all the gifts have been opened and the party is over, Selena looks forward to their separate, intimate time," the source added
"She's doing her best to make Justin's birthday as romantic and memorable as possible." The two have recently become quite "romantic" and "intimate"



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It seems we might have to wait a while before hearing any Jenner-Scott wedding bells.”
“"It's not just Khloe, all of Kylie's sisters are encouraging her to take her time as much as she can," the source explained.”
“And added that the rest of Kylie's older sisters echo Khloe's feelings.”
“The source also revealed that Kylie's decision to say no was highly influenced by sister Khloe Kardashian's advice, "She gets lots of guidance from Khloe who is encouraging her to wait on the whole wedding thing."”
“She knows she rushed into this relationship, so she's trying to slow it all down and enjoy every single stage."”
“A source told the publication, "Kylie definitely wants to marry Travis, but she also really loves how things are the way they are.”
“However, the 20-year-old reportedly turned him down.”


"It seems that we may have to wait a while to hear Jenna Scott's wedding bell."
"It's not just Khloe, all Kylie's sisters are encouraging her to spend as much time as possible," the source explained
"And added that the rest of Kelly's sisters responded to helo's feelings."
"The source also revealed that Kelly's decision to say no was largely influenced by the advice of sister Khloe Kardashian," who received a lot of guidance from Khloe and encouraged her to wait for the whole wedding. "
"She knows she's coming for this relationship, so she's trying to slow down and enjoy every stage."
"Kelly definitely wants to marry Travis, but she also likes the status quo," a source told the media
"However, it is reported that the 20-year-old man refused him."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“He used to surprise her with gifts and grand romantic gestures, but he hasn’t done that in so long.”Source: BACKGRIDWhat are your thoughts on Kanye ignoring Kim?”
“Source: BACKGRID“It’s that kind of behavior that drives her crazy and makes her wonder if he just doesn’t care anymore.”
“Kim’s sick of tiptoeing around their problems.”Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDTo add insult to injury, Kanye abandoned Kim just weeks after Chicago was born, and headed to Berlin!”
“Source: BACKGRIDBut “there’s still some distance between them and friends worry they may have stuck a band-aid over their troubles, rather than dealing with them head-on.”
“An insider said “he’s been withdrawn lately.”Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDIf anything, the two should be closer than ever these days, considering they recently welcomed their third child.”
“Article continues below advertisementA source tells Heat that Kim is not concerned about the millions of likes she’s gotten from the photos – she’s concerned about her husband, Kanye West, paying attention to her.”
“While fans assumed it was another tactic to stay in the spotlight (not like that’ll ever change anyway), it turns out the truth is a lot more depressing than we could imagine!”
“There’s a reason after all behind the numerous nearly naked photos Kim Kardashian has been posting lately on Instagram!”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"He used to surprise her with gifts and romantic gestures, but he hasn't done that for a long time." Source: BACKGROUND: what do you think of Kanye ignoring Kim? "
"Source: backgrid" it's this kind of behavior that drives her crazy and makes her wonder if he doesn't care anymore
"Kim is tired of keeping his mouth shut about their problems." To make matters worse, Kanye abandoned Kim a few weeks after he was born in Chicago and went to Berlin! "
Source: backgridbut "there is still a distance between them. My friends worry that they may be in trouble and put on band aids instead of facing them face to face."
"He was recently dismissed," said one person familiar with the matter The article continues with the following ad source: backgrid. If there is any difference, considering that they recently have a third child, the two should be closer than ever
"The following article goes on, and a source told heat that Kim doesn't care about the millions of likes she gets from the photos - she cares about her husband Kanye West, who cares about her."
"Although fans think it's another way to stay in the spotlight (which won't change anyway), it turns out that the truth is much more frustrating than we think!"
"After all, there's a reason behind Kim Kardashian's recent spate of almost nude photos on instagram!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Image zoom Credit: Ben Simmons/InstagramDetailing the experience, Simmons’ half-brother Sean Tribe told The Undefeated the pair ended up saying goodbye to the felines after “four or five months.””
“76ers...”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Simmons is also signed to LeBron James‘ management company, Klutch Sports Group, alongside Tristan Thompson, who is currently dating and shares a child with Jenner’s sister Khloé Kardashian.”
“The winner will be announced later this month.”
“Following his successful debut season, Simmons was named as one of the three finalists of the NBA’s Rookie of the Year award.”
“This year, the 76ers made it to the second round of the NBA finals before being knocked out by the Boston Celtics.”
“Although Simmons ended up sitting out the 2016-2017 season after injuring his ankle during training, he made his NBA debut in October 2017.”
“Image zoom Kendall Jenner and Ben Simmons Credit Getty 2 He s Up for the NBA s Top Rookie Prize Following a successful stint playing college basketball for Louisiana State University Simmons became the NBA s number one draft pick in 2016 signing a contract to play with the Philadelphia...”


Photo zooming credit: Ben Simmons / instagram tells the story. Simons' half brother Sean Tribu told unbeaten magazine that they finally bid farewell to cats "four or five months later."
"76 people..."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Simmons has also signed with klutch sports group, LeBron James' management company, and Tristan Thompson, who is currently dating Jenna's sister khlo é Kardashian and sharing a child with her."
"The winner will be announced later this month."
"After a successful first season, Simmons was named one of the three finalists for the NBA rookie of the year award."
"This year, the 76ers entered the second round of the NBA Finals and were eliminated by the Boston Celtics."
"Simmons made his NBA debut in October 2017, even though he injured his ankle in training and eventually missed the 2016-2017 season."
"After playing college basketball at Louisiana State University, Kendall Jenner and Ben Simmons won the NBA rookie of the year award. Simmons signed with Philadelphia in 2016 to become the number one draft candidate in NBA... "



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Michael Jackson's nephew Tito Jackson, who shares legal guardianship of Paris along with Katherine, told TMZ on Thursday that the family is 'coping very well'.”
“There was no sign of Paris' younger brother Blanket, 13, nor other members of the Jackson clan.”
“Prince was perhaps picking out a get well soon gift at Barney s while his mother grandmother and aunt were at his sister s bedside he is also said to have visited Sources told US Weekly that Prince didn t approve when his sister began spending time with the pair...”
“Life of privilege: Paris and his girlfriend, who is believed to be a Kuwait princess, were escorted to their waiting car by bodyguardsShopping for Paris?”
“And new pictures released today showed Debbie Rowe, grandmother Katherine Jackson and aunt La Toya Jackson leaving the facility on Wednesday night where Paris is currently under a 72-hour psychiatric hold.”
“'Prince stepped up, as he always does and told Paris how much he loves her in a phone call and vowed to help her in the aftermath of the suicide attempt,' the source said.”
“A source said Prince put their differences aside after the suicide attempt.”
“The siblings reportedly had 'feuded' recently over Paris spending time with her biological mother Debbie Rowe, with Prince disapproving of their recent reconciliation.”
“...at the hospital...”
“Family break Prince took a break from the family drama by spending time with his girlfriend Shopping break Prince and Remi got away from it all by going to upscale retailer Barney s Prince cancelled his TV engagements for the day and according to RadarOnline com visited Paris on Thursday...”


"Michael Jackson's nephew Tito Jackson, who shares legal custody of Paris with Katherine, told TMZ on Thursday that the Michael Jackson family" coped well. "
"Paris' 13-year-old brother, blank, and other members of the Jackson family were not found."
"Prince may be in Barney's house to choose a gift of" early recovery ", while his mother, grandmother and aunt are beside his sister's bed. It is said that he has also visited some sources. According to the weekly news, Prince disagrees with his sister's starting to be with the couple..."
"Privileged life: Paris and his girlfriend, believed to be a princess of Kuwait, were escorted by bodyguards to their waiting car for Paris?"
According to the latest photos released today, Debbie Rowe, grandmother Catherine Jackson and aunt La Toya Jackson left the hospital on Wednesday night and are currently undergoing 72 hours of psychiatric treatment in Paris
Prince stepped forward as usual, told Paris in a phone call how much he loved her and vowed to help her after the attempted suicide, the source said
"A source said the prince put their differences aside after the attempted suicide."
"It is reported that the brothers and sisters have recently been" at odds "because Paris spent time with her biological mother, Debbie law, and Prince disagrees with their recent reconciliation."
“… In the hospital... "
"The prince of broken family is free from the family drama. He spends time shopping with his girlfriend to break up the prince. In order to avoid all this, Remy goes to Barney's Prince, an upscale retailer, and cancels the TV program of the day. According to radaronline, he visited Paris on Thursday..."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...tell us in the comments!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Selena should stay with The Weeknd, or go back to Orlando?”
“Is it rumored fling Selena Gomez?”
“Find out, right here!”
“Someone’s not sick of that same old love!”
“Orlando Bloom, 40, has allegedly been pursuing his one-time alleged fling Selena Gomez, 24, according to a source who spoke to Star magazine.”
“After breaking up with girlfriend Katy Perry, 32, at the end of February 2017, Orlando isn’t wasting any time being single; he’s apparently determined to get Selena!”
“[interaction “Orlando began blowing up Selena’s phone the day he and Katy broke up,” the friend told Star magazine.”
““Orlando doesn’t take Selena’s relationship with The Weeknd seriously.”
“If anything, that makes it more of a challenge.”Wow!”


“… Tell us in the comments
"Holly bugs, do you think Serena should stay together at the weekend or go back to Orlando?"
"Is there a rumor that it was a break-up with Selena Gomez?"
"Find it out, right here!"
"Some people are not tired of that old love!"
Orlando Bloom, 40, is said to have been tracking down his alleged one-time relationship with Selena Gomez, 24, according to a source interviewed by star magazine
"Orlando didn't waste his single time after breaking up with his 32 year old girlfriend Katie Perry at the end of February 2017; he was obviously determined to get Selena!"
"Orlando and Katie started blowing up Selena's phone the day they broke up," the friend told Star Magazine
"Orlando doesn't take Serena's relationship with the weekend seriously."
"If anything, it's more like a challenge." WOW



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He often attends dinner parties, socializes with friends and attends events.”Image zoom Credit: Getty (2)”
“When filming starts on his next movie, Quentin Tarantino’s Once Upon a Time in Hollywood, later this summer, Pitt will balance his time between London and Los Angeles, where he maintains a “very busy schedule,” the insider says.”
“K since last week when he was seen on Wednesday riding his bike across the Coworth Park hotel property only a few miles from where Jolie and the kids stay in England...”
“He doesn t talk badly about Angie but he feels it s her fault that the kids don t want to spend more time with him RELATED VIDEO Angelina Jolie Could Lose Primary Custody of Kids If Brad Pitt Isn t Allowed Access Report Pitt has been in the U”
“| Credit: Gregg DeGuire/WireImage“He is a great dad and always loved being with his kids,” a Pitt source says.”
“Image zoom Pitt with Pax, Shiloh and Maddox (from left) in 2014.”
“That’s because according to the court, Maddox is old enough to decide for himself how much time he wants to spend with his father.”
“Maddox, 16, his oldest son isn’t included in the timetable.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“"He is a great dad and always loved being with his kids," a Brad Pitt source tells PEOPLEIt’s Father’s Day on the other side of the pond and Brad Pitt is celebrating with his children.”


"He often attends dinners, socializes with friends and takes part in activities."
"When Quentin Tarantino's next film," once in Hollywood, "starts shooting later this summer, Pitt will balance his time between London and Los Angeles, where he maintains a" very busy schedule, "the person familiar with the matter said
"Since last Wednesday he was seen riding his bike through cowers Park Hotel, only a few miles from where Julie and the children lived in England..."
"He didn't say anything bad about Angie, but he felt it was her fault that the children didn't want to spend more time with him. Related video Angelina Jolie may lose primary custody of the child if Brad Pitt is not allowed to visit and report Pitt in the United States."
Credit: Gregg deguire / WireImage: "he's a great father who always likes to be with his children," said a Peter source
"In 2014, Pitt posed with parks, Shiloh and Maddox (from left)
"That's because, according to the court, Maddox has grown up and can decide on his own time with his father."
"Maddox, 16, his eldest son is not on the schedule."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He is a great father and always likes to be with his children," a source for Brad Pitt told people. On the other side of the pond is father's day, and Brad Pitt is celebrating with his children



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Rihanna and Hassan Jameel | Credit: Getty; Abdul Latif Jameel...”
“However, a source confirmed to PEOPLE that the Doyle & Doyle antique brown diamond cluster ring is not linked to an engagement.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Rihanna Wears Pope Hat, Robe and Intricately Bejeweled Dress to Catholic-Themed 2018 Met GalaIn December, Rihanna also sparked rumors of an engagement when she rocked a sizable diamond on that finger to Chris Rock’s show at Madison Square Garden in New York City.”
“Since then, the two have been photographed together a few times — including in October, when a source told PEOPLE they were “canoodling all night” while grabbing dinner and bowling with a group of friends in Cambridge, Massachusetts.”
“Back in June 2017, the Ocean’s 8 star and Jameel were spotted kissing and grabbing coffee together.”
““I used to feel guilty about taking personal time, but I also think I never met someone who was worth it before,” she explained.”
“The “Wild Thoughts” hitmaker remained coy while talking about her current relationship in Vogue‘s June cover story.”
“What is clear is that Rihanna is a super fan of the tournament — she was even cheering from the stands when Germany bested Argentina 1-0 to win the 2014 World Cup.”
“Of course, it’s unknown if the duo were really feuding over soccer or the star was just trying to break the tension before gossip ran wild.”
““when u think u know more bout soccer  #worldcup2018,” Rihanna captioned the image of a male lion timidly backing away from the growling female feline, which somewhat resembled her passionately pointing fingers at Jameel while in Puerto Vallarta, Mexico.”


"Image zooming Rihanna and Hassan Jamil | image source: Getty; Abdel Latif Jamil..."
"However, sources have confirmed that the Doyle & Doyle antique brown diamond ring has nothing to do with the engagement."
"Related video: Rihanna is wearing the Pope's hat, robe and exquisite jewelry dress to attend the Catholic theme meeting in 2018. In December, Rihanna shakes a large diamond on her finger on the Chris Locke show in Madison Square Garden in New York City, which also leads to engagement rumors."
"Since then, the two have been photographed together several times - including in October, when a source told people they were 'canoeing all night' at dinner and bowling with a group of friends in Cambridge, Massachusetts."
"As early as June 2017, ocean eight and Jamie were photographed kissing and grabbing coffee together."
"I used to feel guilty about taking up personal time, but I also think I've never met anyone worth it before," she explained
In vogue's June cover story, the "crazy idea" hero is still shy about her current relationship
"Obviously, Rihanna is a big fan of this world cup - she even cheered in the stands when Germany beat Argentina 1-0 to win the 2014 World Cup."
"Of course, it's not known whether the two are really at loggerheads because of football, or whether the star is just trying to break the tension before the rumors run rampant."
"When you think you know more about football, World Cup 2018," Rihanna uses subtitles to describe a lion timidly retreating from a roaring female feline, a bit like her passionate finger pointing at Jamil in port bayarta, Mexico



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Santa Monica restaurant Giorgio Baldi this past Sunday...”
“It s not something she would divorce him over the source said adding He had a breakdown but it does not pertain to them not getting along Kim and Kanye have rarely been photographed together since October though they did step out for a casual dinner for two at the...”
“...rumors...”
“The Wests marriage has been the topic of conversation since 36 year old Kim s October robbery and Kanye s recent hospitalization for exhaustion but a source close to the couple revealed to PEOPLE last week that splitting is not even a point of discussion Truly no truth behind divorce...”
““They might be thinking about couples therapy, but so far it seems they haven’t had any sessions together,” the source adds.”
“Kanye is receiving help for depression and learning how to cope with stress better.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kim is dealing with the trauma from the robbery.”
““They are still both receiving individual therapy,” a source tells PEOPLE of the couple.”
“...are seeking help just not together...”
“They are still both receiving individual therapy a source tells PEOPLE of Kim Kardashian and Kanye West Kim Kardashian Kanye West Are in Counseling After a Trying Year Says Source Amid reports of couples therapy for Kim Kardashian and Kanye West PEOPLE has learned the reality star and the rapper...”


"Giorgio Baldi, Santa Monica restaurant last Sunday..."
"It's not that she will divorce him because of his mental breakdown, she added. It has nothing to do with their not getting along. Kim and Kanye have rarely been photographed together since October, even though they do go out in I had a light meal for two
“… Rumors... "
"Since Kim, 36, was robbed in October last year and recently hospitalized for exhaustion, the marriage of the West couple has been a topic of discussion. However, a source close to the couple told people last week that breaking up is not even a topic of discussion. There is really no truth behind the divorce..."
"They may be considering couple therapy, but so far they don't seem to have any treatment together," the source added
"Kanye is getting help with depression treatment and learning how to deal with stress better." Get news, feature, etc
"Kim is dealing with the trauma of the robbery."
"They are still receiving individual treatment," a source told people
“… Just not together for help... "
"Both of them are still undergoing individual therapy. A source told people that Kim Kardashian and Kanye West are undergoing psychological counseling after a difficult year. A source said that there are reports that Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have received couple therapy and they have learned to be reality TV stars and rap singers..."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Kate Samuelson at kate.samuelson@time.com.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“The Mean Girls actress, 30, said she was stopped by a woman who asked her to take her headscarf off.”
““She opened my passport and saw Lindsay Lohan and started immediately apologizing, but then said ‘But please take off your headscarf,'” Lohan told U.K. television show Good Morning Britain.”
“She added: “And I did, it’s okay.”
“But what scared me was in that moment how would another woman who doesn t feel comfortable taking off her headscarf feel Lohan who has been photographed carrying a Koran and says she finds solace studying the Muslim holy book said she didn t know why she was asked to...”
“...take her headscarf off but found the experience really jarring She told hosts Piers Morgan and Susanna Reid I m from New York I m born and raised there but I was a little intimidated When Reid asked the Parent Trap star why she was wearing the headscarf she said...”
“...it was out of respect for the Turkish women she had met with on her trip...”
““I was… leaving Turkey and… when I see certain people I feel more comfortable acting the same way as the other women — that’s just a personal respect issue for me that I have,” she said.”
“When Morgan asked Lohan about her views on President Donald Trump, Lohan said she thought he should be given a fair chance.”


"To Kate Samuelson. Kate Samuelson @ time.com."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
The 30-year-old "bad girl" actress said she was stopped by a woman and asked to take off her headscarf
"She opened my passport, saw Lindsay Lohan and immediately apologized, but then said: 'but please take off your headscarf,'" Lohan told British TV show good morning Britain.
She added: "I did it, it doesn't matter."
"But what scares me is that at that moment, another woman who took off her turban uncomfortably felt that Rohan was photographed with the Koran on her back, and said that she found comfort in studying the Muslim holy book. She said that she didn't know why she was asked to..."
“… She told the hosts pierce Morgan and Susannah reed that I was from New York, where I was born and grew up, but I was a little scared. When reed asked the parents why she was wearing a headscarf, she said
“…… This is out of respect for the Turkish women she met during her journey... "
"I was about to Leaving Turkey When I see someone, I feel more comfortable behaving like other women - it's just a matter of my personal respect, "she said
"When Morgan asked Rohan what she thought of President trump, she said she thought he should be given a fair chance."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch: Model Myla Dalbesio's Body-Positive Poem...”
“Unfortunately for them, once something is on the internet, it’s there forever — and it’s unlikely people are going to forget about this anytime soon.”
“A little background: On Tuesday, plus-size model and activist Tess Holliday took to Twitter to call out the film’s marketing team for a horrifying advertisement that blatantly implies Snow White would no longer be beautiful if she weren’t tall and thin.”
“The model wrote,“How did this get approved by an entire marketing team?”
“Why is okay to tell young kids being fat = ugly?”Holliday also tagged the film’s star, Chloë Grace Moretz, asking her to comment on the advertisement.”
“Dozens of Twitter users did the same, understandably disgusted by the body-shaming poster.”
“Now, Moretz has finally chimed in on the controversy.”
“In a series of tweets, the 20-year-old actress said she was “appalled” by the ad, and it hadn’t been approved by her or her team.”
“The actress wrote,“I have now fully reviewed the [marketing] for Red Shoes, I am just as appalled and angry as everyone else, this wasn’t approved by me or my team.”
“Pls know I have let the producers of the film know.”


"Look: model Myra darbesio's body front poem..."
"Unfortunately for them, once something appears on the Internet, it will always be there - it's unlikely that people will forget that soon."
"A little background: on Tuesday, Tess Holliday, a big model and activist, called on the film marketing team to post a terrible advertisement on twitter, blatantly suggesting that snow white is no longer beautiful if she is not tall or thin."
The model says, "how did this get the approval of the whole marketing team?"
"Why can we tell children that fat is ugly?"? "Holliday also tagged the film's star, clograce Moretz, and asked her to comment on the advertisement."
"Dozens of Twitter users have done the same, understandably disgusted by this physical humiliating poster."
"Now, at last, Moritz has stepped in."
"In a series of microblogs, the 20-year-old actress said she was" shocked "by the ad and had not yet been approved by her or her team."
"I've now had a comprehensive review of red shoes [marketing], and I'm as shocked and angry as anyone else, and it's not recognized by me or my team," the actress wrote
"Please know I've let the filmmakers know."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So fatherhood hasn't altered George Clooney's sense of humor one bit...”
“...poop...”
“We had a little email exchange George s ER co star Julianna Margulies said on Good Morning America Monday and I was just asking how he s doing and he said I just can t believe there s so much...”
“Society may try to insist otherwise, what with the international renown they had before becoming parents, but the couple are fully aware that this is as good as it gets.”
“...attorney mom...”
“The twin son and daughter of George Clooney and his wife of almost four years Amal Clooney are turning 1 Wednesday and at their tender age they already represent the crowning achievements of their Oscar winner dad and human rights...”
“Alexander and Ella Clooney may not know it just yet, but life is pretty darn sweet for those two.”


"So being a father doesn't change George Clooney's sense of humor at all..."
“… Stool... "
"We have a little email exchange, George s Er co star Juliana Margulis said good morning, USA Monday, I just asked him how he was, he said I can't believe there are so many..."
"Society may try to hold the opposite view because they have international reputation before they become parents, but the couple is fully aware that this is the best."
“… Lawyer, mom... "
"The twin sons and daughters of George Clooney and his wife Amar Clooney, who have been married for nearly four years, will turn one year old on Wednesday. When they were very young, they represented the highest achievement of their Oscar winning father and human rights..."
"Alexander and Ella Clooney may not know, but their lives are so sweet."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She makes everything fun."”
“"One of my favorite times is to see her around Gwen...it's fun for me to see that fan, freak-out side of Kelly.”
“"It's fun to be around Kelly because there's that part of Kelly that I love about her—she's still such a fan of artists," he shared with Sibley Scoles.”
“The reason he enjoyed it so much may surprise you.”
“News exclusively before the "Battle Rounds" began, Blake recalled the double date he and Gwen went on with Kelly and her husband Brandon Blackstock.”
“While chatting with E!”
“At the same time, the Grammy winner has become closer with an idol she grew up listening to.”
“In her first season serving as a coach on The Voice, the "Since U Been Gone" singer has developed stronger friendships with Adam Levine, Alicia Keys and Blake Shelton.”
“Watch : Blake Shelton Dishes on Friendship With Kelly ClarksonThere's no doubt about it: Kelly Clarkson totally digs Gwen Stefani.”


"She makes everything interesting."
"My favorite time was to see her by Gwen's side It's fun to see Kelly's crazy face. "
"It's fun to be with Kelly because there's something I like about Kelly and she's still a fan of artists," he shared with Sibley Scholes
"The reason why he enjoys it so much may surprise you."
Before the exclusive "fight round" began, Blake recalled his double date with Gwen, Kelly and her husband Brandon Blackstock
"While chatting with E!"
"At the same time, the Grammy winner is getting closer to the idols she's heard of since she was a child."
"In her first season as a vocal coach, the 'since you left' singer has forged stronger friendships with Adam Levin, Alicia case and Blake Sheldon."
"Observation: the friendship between black Sheldon and Kelly Clarkson: there is no doubt that Kelly Clarkson likes Gwen Stephanie completely."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...or a zealous waiter takes my plate at a restaurant I wasn t done with that...”
“And all I can say is that the heart wants what the heart wants.”
“Her performance as a junkie in “The Town” features the “Bride Wars” of Boston accents.”
“Her performance in “The Age of Adaline” — as a woman “cursed” to stay 30 forever — was like watching a mermaid ride a bike.”
“She tries.”
“But her acting hasn’t yet caught up to her algorithm-generated beauty.”
“Alas, there may be no algorithmic solution for that.”
“So I was less than psyched at the prospect of seeing her shiver on a buoy, stitch her own wounds, talk to animals or play a Nancy.”
“And, as refreshing as it is watching her stand on a surfboard, it’s refreshment that provides some perspective.”
“While some actors make sense on movie screens, there are others who might make better sense on a can of something — beer, beans, air.”


“… Or a warm-hearted waiter in a restaurant to pick up my plate, I haven't finished eating... "
"All I can say is that what the heart wants is what the heart wants."
"She plays a drug addict in small town and performs the Boston accent of" the bride fight. "
"Her performance in the age of adalin - a woman" curses "forever at 30 - is like watching a mermaid ride a bicycle."
"She tried."
"But her acting is not as good as her beauty."
"Well, there may not be an algorithm to solve this problem."
"So when I see her shaking on the buoy, sewing her own wounds, talking to animals, or playing Nancy, I'm not so excited."
"What's more, it's refreshing to see her on the surfboard, but it also brings some perspective."
"While some actors make sense on the screen, others make sense on cans of beer, beans, air, etc."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We forever have that project together, and we’re doing the best we can.”[Featured Images by Frazer Harrison, Frederick M. Brown/Getty Images]”
“It can be recalled that Fergie secretly split with Josh Duhamel after years of being together.”
“If rumors are to be believed, the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star is allegedly the new girl crush of The Black Eyed Peas vocalist, Fergie.”
“In an exclusive report by Radar Online, it has been alleged that the 42-year-old singer has her eyes set on the La Perla model.”
“The webloid claimed that Fergie finds Kendall really attractive and is keen on getting close to her.”
““Fergie thinks Kendall’s so hot and she wants to get close.”Apparently, Kendall and Fergie first met behind the scenes of a fashion show.”
“The mother-of-one allegedly thinks that she had an instant connection with the Victoria’s Secret model.”
“The gossip site also noted that the “Big Girls Don’t Cry” singer has already worked with the supermodel.”
“Just recently, Kendall appeared in Fergie’s new music video for “Enchanté (Carine).”Aside from that, Fergie is reportedly close to Kendall’s step-sister, Kim Kardashian West, who also starred in her “MILF, Money” music video in 2016.”
“The webloid added that the singer is looking forward to work with Kendall again, this time, as a model for her shoe designs.”


"We will always finish this project together and we will try our best."
"It can be recalled that after many years together, Ferguson and Josh Duhamel broke up secretly
"If the rumors are true, the new favorite of Kardashian is said to be the new favorite of black eyed singer Fergie."
"In an exclusive report on radar online, the 42 year old singer is said to be looking at La Perla models."
"Networm claims that Fergie finds Kendall really attractive and is keen to approach her."
"Fergie thinks Kendall is sexy. She wants to get close to her." Obviously, Kendall and Fergie first met behind the scenes of the fashion show
"It is said that the mother of one child thought she had instant contact with Victoria's Secret model."
Gossip website also noticed that the singer who "big girl doesn't cry" has worked with the supermodel
"Just recently, Kendall appeared in Fergie's new music video, Carine." In addition, Fergie is reported to have a close relationship with Kendall's stepsister, Kim Kardashian West, who also starred in her "milf, money" music video in 2016
"The online version also said that the singer is looking forward to working with Kendall again. This time, she will become a model for her own shoe design."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I knew my baby would feel every stress and every emotion so I chose to do it this way for my little life and our happiness.””
“There was no gotcha moment, no big paid reveal I had planned.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Despite being new parents, Kylie and Travis are still in a new relationship too.”
“Kylie is happy with their living situation,” a source close to Jenner, 20, tells PEOPLE.”
““Travis is a great dad.”
“When he wants to work, Kylie is supportive.”The source adds that the Kylie Lip Kit creator “has everything she needs right now and seems very happy.”“For being so young, she is very chilled out about her relationship with Travis,” adds the source.”
“She isn t making any huge plans for the future Days after the birth of their daughter an insider said that the couple is not in rush to get married and are just enjoying their little family The pair has been dating since April 2017 after Jenner split from heron...”
“...again off again boyfriend of nearly three years Tyga and another source recently told PEOPLE that her relationship with Scott 25 is very different saying He s very protective of Kylie and his family embraced her too Although Jenner was initially looking to family and close friends to help out...”
“...with caring for Stormi she has since hired some help She knows she can t rely on mom Kris Jenner every day and hired some help for the baby said a second source...”


"I know my baby will feel every kind of pressure and emotion, so I choose to do it for my little life and our happiness."
"I didn't seize the opportunity, and I didn't plan to reveal it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Despite the new parents, Kelly and Travis still have a new relationship."
"Kelly is very happy with their living conditions," a source close to 20-year-old Jenner told people
"Travis is a good dad."
"When he wants to work, Kelly is for him." The source added that the creator of Kylie's Lipstick "now has everything she needs and looks very happy." "At such a young age, she feels very cold about her relationship with Travis," the source added
"In the days after her daughter was born, she didn't make any big plans. The couple are not in a hurry to get married, just enjoying their small family, a person familiar with the matter said. After Jenna and Heron broke up, they started dating in April 2017... "
“…… Another boyfriend, TEGA, who has been dating intermittently for nearly three years, and another source recently told people that her relationship with Scott, 25, is very different, saying that he is very protective of Kelly and that his family hugs her, even though Jenna initially wanted family and close friends to help... "
“…… After taking care of Tommy, she hired some helpers. She knew she couldn't rely on her mother Chris Jenner every day, and hired some helpers for her children. The second source said... "



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I hired the head of supply chain from the Gap.” He also called himself this generation’s “Ford Hughes Jobs Disney.”Let’s hope Kim wins this godfather battle.”
““Yeezy will become the biggest apparel company in human history by working with the most genius level talents and creating product at an affordable price.”
““There’s been a lot of fake news so I just wanted to give you the facts,” he wrote.”
“On Twitter, Kanye has denied the allegations.”
“Earlier this week, it was reported that friends were worried the “Faded” rapper are worried about his current mental health after he spoke with radio host Ebro and allegedly said he loved Trump — along with claim he had an opioid addiction.”
“However, their godfathers have never been revealed.”
““Trump is a huge no no for Kim but Kanye’s really a huge fan and supporter of his and that’s a bone of contention in their marriage.”In case you were wondering, North and Saint West‘s godmothers are Khloé and Kourtney Kardashian, respectively.”
“Kanye’s adamant that he wants to ask Trump and it’s resulted in them having a huge blowout argument,” the source added.”
““She despises Trump and doesn’t like what he stands for and is telling Kanye that he needs to choose somebody else.”
““He loves, respects, and admires Trump and feels a man of his prestige and power would be a perfect influence in children’s lives.”However, his wife Kim Kardashian is completely opposed to the idea.”


"I hired the head of the supply chain from gap." He also calls himself the "Ford Hughes jobs Disney" of this generation. Let's hope king wins the godfather battle
"Yeezy will become the largest clothing company in human history by working with the most talented people to create products at affordable prices."
"There's a lot of fake news, so I just want to tell you the truth," he wrote
"On twitter, Kanye denied the charges."
"Earlier this week, it was reported that friends were worried about the fading rapper's current mental health after talking to radio host Ebro, who said he loved Trump - and claimed he was addicted to opioids."
"However, their Godfather has never been revealed."
"Trump is an absolute opponent of king, but Kanye is really a super fan and supporter of king, which is the focus of debate in their marriage." If you want to know, the godmothers of North and St. West are Heroe and Courtney Kardashian, respectively
The source added: "Kanye firmly said that he wanted to ask trump, which led to a huge quarrel between them."
"She looked down on trump, didn't like what he represented, and told Kanye that he needed to choose someone else."
"He loves, respects and admires trump, and feels that a person with prestige and power will have a perfect impact on children's lives." However, his wife, Kim Kardashian, is totally against the idea



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pneumonia is so scary.””
““Kanye had been sick for a few days and didn’t get better,” the source explained.”
“The rapper, 41, has been battling the flu and was taken by wife Kim Kardashian West to a hospital in the San Fernando Valley for a “short time” on Sunday, TMZ reported.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Reps for the star did not respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment, but a source close to the couple tells PEOPLE that Kanye is recovering well.”
““They ran some tests at the hospital and Kanye got some medications,” the insider said.”
““He is doing better now.”
“He just needs to rest for a few days and he should be good to go.”So what prompted the trip to the hospital?”
“Apparently, Kim insisted because the couple’s 2-year-old son Saint was hospitalized for pneumonia in January.”
“They wanted to make sure that he didn t have something serious like pneumonia since they had that scare with Saint before Image zoom Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West Credit Back Grid Though he apparently wasn t feeling well Kanye 41 attended rapper Pusha T s wedding to longtime...”


"Pneumonia is terrible."
"Kanye has been ill for several days and has not improved," the source explained
The 41 year old rapper, who has been fighting the flu, was rushed to a hospital in San Fernando Valley on Sunday by his wife Kim Kardashian West, TMZ reported
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The star's spokesperson didn't respond to requests for comment, but a source close to the couple told people Kanye is recovering well."
"They did some tests in the hospital and Kanye got some drugs," the person familiar with the matter said
"He's much better now."
"He just needs to rest for a few days and should be able to go." So what prompted him to go to the hospital? "
"It's clear that Kim Jong Un insisted on this because the couple's two-year-old son, Sheng, was hospitalized with pneumonia in January this year."
"They want to make sure he doesn't have a serious illness like pneumonia, because they had this fear in front of the saints. The photos of Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West have been enlarged. Although he is obviously unwell, Kanye attended the wedding of rapper pusha t at the age of 41, and the wedding lasted a long time..."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"... She can tell me to f*** off all she wants.”
“You jumped that ship as soon as you did Diane Sawyer and attacked my mum', and instead, [she] tells me to 'get a life' and 'shut up' and I'm like, 'you shut up and you get a f***ing life.”
“I mean, just f*** you, Bruce."”
“"I honestly wish I never met this man.”
“"He can go f*** himself," she cries down the phone to a deadpan Kim.”
“October 2015: Season 10 of Keeping up with the Kardashians shows Kris' reaction to the Vanity Fair interview and she is, shall we say, more explicit with her wording.”
“Let's focus on the actual cause here and not drag my mum through the mud."”
“In our opinion you don't even need to mention my mum.”
“Caitlyn tells Khloe sent her "tough" text messages, to which Khloe responds: "I said we don't care what you're doing... we want to be there and support you but we don't think that entails you speaking negatively about my mum.”
“...show, I Am Cait, Khloe is seen visiting Caitlyn where she takes issue with her comments about Kris.”


"... she can tell me what she wants to do."
"As soon as you killed Diane Sawyer, you jumped out of the boat and attacked my mother." instead, (she) told me to "live" and "shut up." I said, "shut up and you'll live."
"I mean, it's just you, Bruce."
"I wish I had never met this man."
"He can go on his own," she called to the expressionless Kim on the phone
"October 2015: Season 10" follow the kardashians "shows Chris's reaction to the vanity fair interview, and we can say that her wording is more explicit."
"Let's focus on the practical reasons and don't drag my mother down."
"In our opinion, you don't even have to mention my mother."
Caitlin told Chloe to send her a "tough" text message, and Chloe responded, "I said we don't care what you're doing... We want to be there to support you, but we don't think that means you have to say negative things to my mom. "
“… Show, I'm Kate, Chloe was seen interviewing Caitlin and she commented on her Chris questions



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Now: The U.S. had the highest number of Most Wanted properties, dominating the Hotels.com Loved By Guests Awards 2018”
“She knew that the royal couple met with her during a Nets game with her husband Jay Z. Kardashian feels that Beyonce has an edge over her.”
“But the rumors of them snubbing Kim Kardashian and Kanye West was debunked.”
“(Photo: Chris Jackson/Getty Images)Kate Middleton and Prince William despite their stature in the world are not spared from rumors and unfounded reports that put the royal couple in a bad light.”
“One of them is the report that they snubbed the power couple Kim Kardashian and Kanye West.”
“The report said that Kardashian feels that Middleton and Prince William are snubbing or disinterested in meeting her and her husband.”
“The royal couple allegedly turned down the invitation to attend West's concert a couple of times.”
“The "Keeping up with the Kardashians" star feels that it is snobbery towards her.”
“The mother of two was not in good terms with Beyonce.”
“Kim Kardashian was allegedly hurt especially that Middleton is her idol.”


"Now look: the United States has the most wanted real estate and dominates in the United States. Hotel website" guest favorite award 2018 "
"She knew that the royal couple met her in a tennis match with her husband, Jay Z. Kardashian. Kardashian thinks Beyonce has an advantage over her
"But the rumor that they ignored Kim Kardashian and Kanye West was exposed."
(information photo: Chris Jackson / Getty Images) Kate Middleton and Prince William, despite their great status in the world, are not immune to rumors and groundless reports, which put the royal couple in a bad situation. "
"One of them is the report that they have snubbed power couples Kim Kardashian and Kanye West."
"Kardashian felt that Middleton and Prince William were dismissive of meeting her and her husband," the report said
"It's said that the royal couple refused to attend the West concert several times."
"The follow Kardashian star felt snobbish to her."
"The mother of two has a bad relationship with Beyonce."
"Kim Kardashian is said to have been hurt, especially when Middleton is her idol."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— AlecBaldwin (@AlecBaldwin) November 4, 2017”
“...fully aware that those settlements were AlecBaldwin AlecBaldwin November 4 2017 4 entered into w the understanding that settlement is wise intimidated into believing so...”
“Alec Baldwin announced Saturday morning that he will be suspending posting on his personal Twitter account following strong backlash to previous comments he made about Harvey Weinstein's harassment allegations and the culture of paying women for silence.”
“Baldwin came under fire for speaking about the culture of payoffs in the context of Weinstein's numerous settlements with women over the decades in an interview with PBS.”
“"When you talked about Harvey Weinstein in the business, you knew that he was highly intrusive in the process of making films … you knew that he was a very intense guy … and last but not least, you heard the rumor that he raped Rose McGowan.”
“You heard that over and over — we heard that for decades.”
“And nothing was done," the actor said.”
“When asked why no one had come forward if they were aware of the alleged incident, Baldwin replied, "Rose McGowan took a payment of $100,000 and settled her case with him.”
“And it was for Rose McGowan to prosecute that case."”
“The actor referenced a New York Times article on the subject of paying off sexual assault victims and posed the question, "Do the settlement of these cases hurt the cause of exposing and bringing us to a place of real change?"”


"- alecbaldwin (@ alecbaldwin) November 4, 2017"
“…… Fully aware that these settlements were signed by Alec Baldwin on November 4, 2017, it is understood that the settlements are wise and believed under duress... "
"Alec Baldwin announced on Saturday morning that he would suspend posting on his personal twitter account after his comments on Harvey Weinstein's harassment charges and women's culture of paying for silence were strongly rebounded."
"In an interview with PBS, Baldwin said that in Weinstein's countless settlements with women over the decades, he was criticized for talking about the culture of pay."
"When you talk about Harvey Weinstein, you know he's very interfering in the process of making movies You know he is a very warm person Last but not least, you heard rumors that he raped rose McGovern. "
"You've heard it over and over - we've heard it for decades."
"Nothing," said the actor
"Asked why no one came forward if he knew about the incident, Baldwin replied," Ross McGovern was paid $100000 and closed the case with him. "
"It's Ross McGovern."
The actor cites an article in the New York Times about paying back victims of sexual assault and asks the question: "does the resolution of these cases undermine disclosure and lead us to a place of real change?"



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If she wants a happy ending with Justin, she needs to make it happen now.”HollywoodLifers, when do you think Justin and Selena will confirm they’re back together?”
“They were just teenagers when Jelena made things official way back in 2011.”
“Within a week of reconnecting with Justin Bieber, Selena Gomez and The Weeknd are OVER!”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she believes the Biebs is her true soulmate.”
“Jelena fans that hung in there for years after Justin Bieber, 23, and Selena Gomez, 25, many splits are finally getting their dream come true in the former couple reuniting.”
“While the two are supposedly just in the stages of reconnecting their friendship, they just haven’t been able to stay away from each other in the past week.”
“Sel even broke up with her boyfriend of 10 months, The Weeknd, 27.”
“That’s because Selena feels she and Justin were always destined to be together.”
““No matter what happens, and where life goes, Selena’s heart always ends up coming back to Justin.”
“They truly do love each other deeply, but despite multiple tries they’ve never been able to make it work, and they’ve always ended up splitting,” a source close to Selena tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"If she wants to have a happy ending with Justin, she needs to do it now." Hollywood stars, when do you think Justin and Serena will be able to confirm that they are together again? "
"In 2011, when Jenna made it public, they were still teenagers."
"Within a week of reconnecting with Justin Bieber, Serena Gomez and the weekend are over!"
"We had an exclusive report on how she believed that the biebers were her real soul mates."
"After Justin Bieber, 23, and Serena Gomez, 25, broke up, Jenna's fans stayed there for several years, and their dream finally came true in the reunion of the former couple."
"Although the two are said to be in the stage of re establishing friendship, they have only been unable to stay away from each other for the past week."
"Searle even broke up with her boyfriend of 10 months, who was 27 that week."
"That's because Selena thinks she and Justin are meant to be together."
"No matter what happens, no matter where life goes, Serena's heart will always come back to Justin."
A source close to Serena told reporters: "they really love each other, but despite their repeated attempts, they never succeed. In the end, they always break up." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The Batman portrayer was on hand for a Q&A session at the San Diego convention last month, along with other […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Did Ben Affleck really ignore questions during a Justice League panel at Comic-Con and spend the entire event texting?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
At the San Diego Convention last month, Batman's actor joined others in the Q & a session IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police has the truth."
"Is Ben Affleck really ignoring the problem at the comics conference's justice alliance panel discussion, texting the whole event?"



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jen and Justin have not responded to Life & Style’s report.”
“'One thing is certain: She’s done being put through hell by Justin.'”
“'Jen complained he never said ‘I love you'.'”
“And in a heartbreaking confession, the insider reveals it was obvious Justin’s heart was never really in their relationship.”
“Furthermore, the source goes on to reveal that the former couple shared 'harsh words' over the years about their differing lifestyles – with Justin refusing to leave his bachelor pad in New York and live with Jen on the West Coast.”
“All her celeb friends were charmed by him at one point or another.'”
“'Women are very drawn to Justin.”
“Justin and Selena were spotted flirting at a recent awards show Getty'One of the worst moments for Jen was when she started seeing Justin flirt with her friends.”
“'Justin is a classic ladies’ man and flirt, and it always drove Jen up the wall,' spills the friend.”
“However eagle-eyed fans were quick to notice that the star hashtagged Selena Gomez, a former friend of Jen’s and one of many females who Justin was rumoured to have got a little too close to during their relationship.”


"Jane and Justin haven't responded to the lifestyle reports yet."
"One thing is for sure: she has been put to hell by Justin."
"Jane complains that he never said 'I love you.'
"In a heartbreaking confession, the insider revealed that it was clear that Justin's heart had never really been involved in their relationship."
"In addition, the source also revealed that the former couple had" harsh words "about their different lifestyles over the years - Justin refused to leave his bachelor's apartment in New York and live with Jan on the west coast."
"All her celebrity friends are fascinated by him."
"Women are very attractive to Justin."
"Justin and Serena were found flirting at a recent awards ceremony. One of Jennifer's worst moments was when she began to see Justin flirting with her friends
"Justin is a typical woman, man and flirt, it always pushes Jane to the wall," the friend said
"However, sharp eyed fans soon noticed that the star had labeled Serena Gomez, an ex friend of Jennifer's and one of many women, who was rumored to have been a little too close to Justin during her love."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He is the James Taylor to my Carole King and I can’t imagine a time when he wouldn’t be.””
“I think it’s actually like, I think it’s time.”
““I don’t think she needs [to be defended] at all,” he told People magazine at the 2017 Songwriters Hall of Fame 48th Annual Induction and Awards Gala.”
““I don’t think feud songs are a hot thing – there’s always been beef songs.” Sheeran specifically cited Carly Simon’s “You’re So Vain” as an example of a classic “diss track”; Simon revealed in 2015 that she penned the 1972 hit with Warren Beatty in mind.”
“Earlier this year, Perry incurred the wrath of many Swift fans after the release of her hit “Swish Swish,” which many interpreted as a direct attack on the “Wildest Dreams” singer.”
““Don’t you come for me / No, not today / You’re calculated / I got your number / ‘Cause you’re a joker / And I’m a courtside killer queen,” one verse partly reads.”
“(As though confirming that the song was indeed about Swift, Perry changed the lyrics to hold a more conciliatory tone during a live-streamed concert: “God bless you on your journey, baby girl.” Days earlier, Perry had delivered that same line when chatting with Arianna Huffington about Swift.)”
““I am ready to let it go,” she said at the time.”
““I forgive her and I’m sorry for anything I ever did, and I hope the same from here.”
“There are bigger fish to fry, and there are real problems in the world.”


"He's my Carol King's James Taylor. I can't imagine if he will one day."
"I think actually, I think it's time."
"I don't think she needs (to be defended)," he told people at the 48th annual awards ceremony of the songwriter Hall of fame in 2017
"I don't think revenge is a hit song - there's always been a beef song." Sheeran specifically cited Carly Simon's "you're too vain" as an example of the classic "dis track"; Simon revealed in 2015 that she had Warren Beatty in mind when she wrote the hit song in 1972
"When Perry's hit song" whoosh whoosh "was released earlier this year, many swift fans were angry. Many people interpreted it as a direct attack on the" wildest dream "singer."
"Don't come to me / no, not today / you've figured it out / I know your number / because you're a clown / and I'm a killer queen by the court," one of the stanzas says
"As if to confirm that the song was really about swift, Perry changed the lyrics at a live concert to maintain a softer tone:" God bless your journey, baby girl. " A few days ago, Perry said the same thing when talking about swift with Arianna Huffington
"I'm ready to let go," she said at the time
"I forgive her, I'm sorry for what I've done, and I hope from now on."
"There are bigger fish to fry, and there are real problems in the world."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Alyssa Milano (@Alyssa_Milano) December 16, 2017”
“But it’s still cancer.”
“The Oscar-nominated actress recently took to Twitter to slam her Good Will Hunting co-star about his recent comments about sexual assault.”
“In the wake of the deluge of sexual misconduct accusations involving Harvey Weinstein and Ben Affleck, two men who Damon has worked closely with, the Downsizing actor spoke to Peter Travers on ABC on Thursday about the cloud of allegations hovering over Hollywood.”
“He pointed out that the men being accused are being put into “one big bucket” and then said that there is a “spectrum of behavior.”“You know, there’s a difference between, you know, patting someone on the butt and rape or child molestation, right?” he said in the interview.”
“Both of those behaviors need to be confronted and eradicated without question but they shouldn t be conflated right Related Story Commission On Sexual Harassment Formed By Hollywood Heavyweights Anita Hill Will Chair When Driver received word of his comments she took to Twitter saying God God SERIOUSLY From there...”
“...she did not hold back and continued to drag Damon and other men who share the same opinions...”
““Gosh it’s so interesting how men with all these opinions about women’s differentiation between sexual misconduct, assault and rape reveal themselves to be utterly tone deaf and as a result, systemically part of the problem (profoundly unsurprising),” she tweeted.”
“Gosh it s so interesting how men with all these opinions about women s differentiation between sexual misconduct assault and rape reveal themselves to be utterly tone deaf and as a result systemically part of the problem profoundly unsurprising Minnie Driver driverminnie December 15 2017 This was followed by an...”
“...enormous amount of support from other women...”


“-Alyssa Milano（@Alyssa_ Milano) 16 December 2017 "
"But it's still cancer."
"The Oscar nominated actress recently lashed out on twitter at her recent comments about sexual assault, CO starring in" good will hunting. "
Damon, who worked closely with Harvey Weinstein and Ben Affleck and was accused of rampant sexual misconduct, spoke to Peter Travers on ABC on Thursday about the charges that pervade Hollywood
He pointed out that the accused person was put into "a big bucket" and then said that there was "a spectrum of behavior". "You know, there's a difference between spanking someone and raping or molesting a child, right? "He said in an interview."
"There is no doubt that both of these behaviors need to be addressed and eradicated, but they should not be confused. The right related story Commission on sexual harassment, which is composed of Hollywood heavyweight Anita Hill, should not be confused Sexcurrence, who will be chairing when the driver receives his comments on twitter, tweets that God takes God seriously from there... "
“…… She didn't flinch, and continued to drag Damon and other people who held the same view... "
"My God, how can men who have different views on women's sexual misconduct, sexual assault and sexual rape find themselves totally deaf and, as a result, become part of the problem systematically (not surprisingly)," she tweeted
"My God, how can men who have so many views on how women can distinguish sexual misconduct, sexual assault and sexual rape find themselves completely tone blind and become a part of the problem systematically? This makes Minnie Driver Minnie deeply surprised. On December 15, 2017, there was a..."
“… Great support from other women... "



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kanye will step up as a dad?”
“You were made to be a mom!”Meanwhile, Khloe Kardashian is currently pregnant with her first child, and is due at the end of March/beginning of April — so there’ll be another little one added to the mix in just a couple of months!”
“I am so proud that you do what you want to do and live your life the way you want you will pass down all of those amazing qualities to your baby girl.”
““Our girls are two weeks apart and I can’t wait for them to be besties!”
““I’m so incredibly proud of the woman you have grown up to be and I know that you are going to be the best mom to your new baby girl!” she gushed.”
“That means Kim and Kylie’s daughters are less than one month apart, and Kim wrote the sweetest message to her little sis about it.”
“On Feb. 1, Kylie Jenner, 20, gave birth to her first child — a baby girl named Stormi Webster.”
“She made it clear that he petter start pulling his weight — or else.”Chicago was born via surrogate on Jan. 15, and is just one of the newest additions to the Kardashian family.”
““Kim was furious when Kanye told her to just hire another nanny.”
““Kim let it slide the first time, but she was counting on counting on Kanye to help out around the house because she already has her hands full,” the mag’s insider claims.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Kanye will become a father?"
"You were born to be a mother! "Meanwhile, Carol Kardashian is pregnant with her first child and is due to give birth in late March and early April - so in just a few months, another baby will join the group!"
"I'm very proud that you can do what you want to do, live the life you want to do, and you will pass on all these amazing qualities to your baby daughter."
"Our girls are two weeks apart. I can't wait for them to be friends!"
"I'm very proud of the woman you will be when you grow up. I know you will be the best mother for your new baby girl! "She gushed on and on."
"It means Kim and Kelly's daughter are less than a month apart, and Kim wrote the sweetest message to her little sister."
On February 1, 20-year-old Kelly Jenner gave birth to her first child, a baby girl named Tommy Webster
"She made it very clear that he had started to lose weight - otherwise," Chicago was born on January 15 through surrogacy, just one of the new members of the Kardashian family
"When Kanye told Kim to hire another nanny, Kim was angry."
"Kim let it slip away the first time, but she's counting on kenye to help because she's so busy," said an insider at the magazine



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We finally got a peak at North and Saint‘s little sister when Kylie Jenner, 20, released a video about her pregnancy journey that featured a clip of her holding Chicago.”
““We are so excited to finally welcome home our baby girl.” Aww!”
“A wild new report claims she asked Kim Kardashian’s surrogate to carry a baby for her.”
“What?!”
“Is Caitlyn Jenner, 68, looking to have another child?”
“A surprising new report from Star claims she reached out to Kim Kardashian‘s gestational carrier to bear a child for her using sperm she froze during her marriage to Kris Jenner, 62.”
“Excuse me, what?!”
“If that sounds incredibly farfetched to you, that’s because it is.”
“Caitlyn’s rep Alan Nierob told Hollywoodlife.com that this report isn’t true.”
“Phew!”


"When Kylie Jenner, 20, released a video of her pregnancy journey, including a video of her holding Chicago, we finally reached the summit in North and Saint's little sister."
"We are so excited to finally welcome our baby girl home." Ah
"A crazy new report says she got Kim Kardashian's surrogate mother to have a baby for her."
"What?"
"Does 68 year old Caitlin Jenner want to have another child?"
"A surprising new report from starry sky said she reached out to Kim Kardashian's pregnant carrier and gave birth to a baby with frozen sperm from her marriage to 62 year old Chris Jenner."
"Sorry, what?"
"If you think it sounds incredibly far fetched, it's because it does."
Caitlin's representative, Alan nileb, told reporters that the story is not true
"Bah!"



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, her dress at the royal wedding a few weeks ago did have some strategic pleating in the midsection.”
“Last fall, Amal, told the Hollywood Reporter that she doesn’t want to have any more children.”
“A new picture of Amal Clooney set Instagram afire with speculation that the mother of two might be pregnant again.”
“PopSugar posted the image on its Instagram account, and it featured actor George Clooney and his wife, Amal, a professor at Columbia, out and about in Sardinia, Italy.”
“The pair had a date night on Monday at Il Marino di Puntaldia just two days before the first birthday of their twins, Alexander and Ella.”
“He’s clutching her hand, and she’s wearing a beautiful dragon print dress, while he wore a stylish blue polo shirt with striped pants.”
“While the lovely couple always garners plenty of attention, one thing, in particular, stood out to fans in this picture.”
“Followers quickly pointed out that Amal sported what might be a tiny baby bump in the image.”
“Instagram user andreal_pez asked, “Is she pregnant again??”
“?” Of course, another fan had another possible explanation.”


"But she did have some strategic folds in the middle of her royal wedding dress a few weeks ago."
"Last fall, Amar told a Hollywood Reporter that she didn't want to have any more children."
"A new picture of Amar Clooney has sparked instagram's speculation that the mother of two may be pregnant again."
"Popsugar posted this photo on instagram, featuring actor George Clooney and his wife, Columbia University Professor Amal, who are walking around Sardinia, Italy."
"Just two days before their twins Alexander and Ella's first birthday, they dated for one night on Monday in elmino di pontardia."
"He's holding her hand, she's wearing a beautiful dragon dress, and he's wearing a stylish blue polo shirt and striped pants."
"Although this lovely couple can always attract a lot of attention, there is one thing that stands out in this picture."
"Fans quickly pointed out that what Amar showed in the picture might be a small baby lump."
Instagram user andreal è PEZ asked, "is she pregnant again?"
"?" of course, another fan has another possible explanation. "



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They have developed into close confidantes and are sharing intimate details of their lives.” We can only imagine how Gwen would feel about that.”
“They’ve become close friends and allies over the past month or so.”
“Blake Shelton left his girlfriend of two years Gwen Stefani high and dry when he dumped her before heading off on tour in February, In Touch has exclusively learned, and she’s not taking it well.”
““Gwen doesn’t know what hit her,” said the insider.”
““She’s heartbroken.”But wait, Gwen just posted a photo with Blake three days ago, so what gives?”
“Apparently, it’s a desperate attempt to ignore the truth.”
““She continues to send him loving social media support from LA while he’s been out on the road,” said another insider.”
““But Blake has drastically slowed regular communication with her.” He certainly hasn’t reciprocated her online affection.”
““Blake’s through with Gwen’s neediness and all the drama: her demanding, critical ex-husband and her jealousy of him and other women,” explained the source.”
“Apparently, Gwen was jealous over his closeness with The Voice winner Chloe Kohanski, and Blake got sick of trying to make her trust him.”


"They have developed into intimate confidants and shared intimate details of their lives." We can only imagine how Gwen felt about it
"In the past month or so, they have become close friends and allies."
"Blake Sheldon abandoned his girlfriend Gwen Stefanie for two years and dumped her before going on tour in February. She didn't accept the exclusive report of contact magazine."
"Gwen doesn't know what hit her," the person familiar with the matter said
"She was very sad." But wait a minute. Gwen just posted a picture of Blake three days ago. What does that matter? "
"Obviously, this is a desperate attempt to ignore the truth."
"She continued to provide him with loving social media support from Los Angeles while he was away," another person familiar with the matter said
"But Blake has greatly slowed down his regular communication with her." Of course, he didn't repay her online feelings
"Blake saw Gwen's needs and all the drama: her harsh, picky ex husband and her jealousy of him and other women," the source explained
"It's clear Gwen envies his close relationship with dubbing champion Chloe kohanski, and black is tired of trying to convince her of him."



**Something goes wrong**
“"I can't tell if it's menopause or if it's just been the year I've had," she had told the magazine referring to her drier skin and grey strands.”
“"I'm being smart about my choices, and I'm putting my family first, and I'm in charge of my life and my health," the actress told Vanity Fair.”
“The actress has lost a drastic amount of weight following her split from Brad Pitt and now, a new rumour claims that the actress is also stopped eating and sleeping properly.”
“There are rumours doing the rounds claiming that Jolie is undergoing 'health crisis' and is "on the verge of passing out."”
“The claims published by National Enquirer say that the actress is surviving on steamed vegetables and fruits.”
“However, Gossip Cop sources say otherwise.”
“Also Read: Brad Pitt feels 'better off without' Angelina Jolie as she delays divorce?”
“National Enquirer's grapevine claims that the actress is on the "edge of a total collapse" as she barely eats.”
“"There are times she feels light-headed and is on the verge of passing out," the insider claims.”
“The outlet's source adds that Jolie's "food intake is mostly morsels of steamed veggies and fruit, very little protein, and water.”


"I can't tell if it's menopause or just the past year," she told the magazine, referring to her dry skin and gray hair
"I'm smart about my choices, I put my family first, I'm responsible for my life and health," the actress told Vanity Fair
"The actress lost a lot of weight after breaking up with Brad Pitt, and now there is a new rumor that the actress has stopped eating and sleeping as well."
"There is a rumor that Julie is experiencing a" health crisis "and is" on the verge of coma. "
"According to a statement in the national inquiry, the actress lives by steaming vegetables and fruits."
"However, the source of the gossip police said otherwise."
"Also read: does Brad Pitt think 'no' Angelina Jolie is better because she delays the divorce?"
The actress is "on the verge of total collapse" because she hardly eats, according to the national inquirer grapevine
"Sometimes she feels dizzy and almost fainting," the person said
The media source added that Julie's food intake was mainly steamed vegetables and fruits, with little protein and water



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, are you worried about Rihanna’s new relationship?”
“Our insiders say the pop star and her new flame are not seeing eye to eye!”
“Here’s the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“It’s been a while since we’ve heard about Rihanna‘s, 29, blossoming romance with the insanely rich Hassan Jameel, also 29.”
“In fact, it’s been way too long!”
“And, according to our source, their relationship is stagnating due to their conflicting schedules.”
“However, that might not be the only thing that this new relationship is facing!”
“Head here for all the RiRi pics you can handle!”
“Rihanna and Hassan struggle to see each other,” a source close to Rihanna shares with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, are you worried about Rihanna's new relationship?"
"Our insiders say the pop star and her new lover don't agree!"
"Here are the exclusive details!"
"We haven't heard of the romance between Rihanna, 29, and Hassan Jamil, the same crazy 29 year old tycoon, for some time."
"In fact, it's been too long!"
"Moreover, according to our sources, their relationship has stalled due to schedule conflicts."
"However, this may not be the only problem facing this new relationship!"
"Come here and see all the pictures you can handle in the library!"
"It's hard for Rihanna and Hassan to see each other," a source close to Rihanna shared with reporters



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's divorcedBut racism isn't the only thing that Meghan deals with.”
“2.”
“Her mother Doria is African-American.”
“Meghan is bi-racial, and identifies herself as such.”
“She's bi-racialThe first, and unmistakable overtone in every conversation about her is racism.”
“1.”
“In watching the Royal drama for the better part of 18 months, I've come up with a list of six objections to her marriage, led by the big one they never had to address.”
“In retrospect, those women had it much, much easier than Meghan.”
“Meghan readily brings to mind the uproar over Wallis Simpson, the twice-divorced American for whom Edward VIII gave up the throne.”
“She is already the most controversial British Royal bride since Camilla, the Duchess of Cornwall, who many people will never embrace because she succeeded Diana, Princess of Wales.”


"She's divorced, but racial discrimination is not the only thing Megan has to face."
“2.”
"Her mother, Doria, is African American."
"Megan is a bi racial person, and she thinks she is."
"She's the first bisexual, and every time she talks about her, it's obviously racist."
“1.”
"I spent most of my 18 months watching the Royal TV series, and I listed six reasons against her marriage, one of which was a big problem they never solved."
"In retrospect, those women are much easier than Megan."
Megan quickly remembered the commotion caused by Wallis Simpson, a twice divorced American who had given up the throne because of Edward VIII
"She has become the most controversial British royal bride after Camilla, Duchess of Cornwall, because she inherited the throne of Diana, Princess of Wales, and many people will never embrace her."



Number  204
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(mirror.co.uk)DailyEdge is on Instagram!”
“(eonline.com)Ashley Graham corrected a troll who said she looked pregnant by telling her she wasn’t pregnant, but ‘fat’.”
“About last night ♏️ #americanidolfinale A post shared by KATY PERRY (@katyperry) on May 22, 2018 at 1:22pm PDTThe 33-year-old admitted that she was left heartbroken by the response to the album, which saw the release of Chained to the Rhythm and Swish Swish.”
“I have had bouts of situational depression and my heart was broken last year because, unknowingly, I put so much validity in the reaction of the public.”
“Source: Ian WestKaty Perry says she was heartbroken over public reaction to her last albumIn a candid interview with Vogue Australia, Katy Perry revealed that she suffered bouts of situational depression due to public reaction to the release of her latest album, Witness.”
“Sorry to hear that, Tyga.”
“He doesn’t like seeing her with Travis’s arms wrapped around her and he does not want to read the interview either.”
“According to sources, the rapper couldn’t even bring himself to open the pages of the publication.”
“Last week’s Forbes cover was like a punch in the gut and now this GQ cover with Travis is only making missing Kylie worse and more painful.”
“Tyga misses Kylie and feels like that should have been him making gorgeous babies with Kylie, doing interviews and posing with her for photo shoots and magazine covers.”


"Mirror image co.uk ）Dailyedge is on instagram! "
“( eonline.com Ashley Graham corrects a villain who says she looks pregnant, telling her she's not pregnant but 'fat.'
"About last night ♏ Katie Perry (@ katyperry) shared a post at 1:22 p.m. on May 22, 2018. Perry, 33, admitted that she was heartbroken by her response to the album, which released "connect to rhythm" and "whoosh whoosh."
"I've had several episodes of situational depression, and last year my heart broke because, unconsciously, I put too much effectiveness into the public response."
"Source: Ian westkatie Perry said she was heartbroken by the public reaction to her last album. In a frank interview with vogue Australia, Katie Perry revealed that she suffered from a series of situational depression due to the public reaction to the release of her latest album witness
"I'm sorry to hear that, TEGA."
"He didn't like to see Travis around her, and he didn't want to see interviews."
"According to the source, the rapper can't even open the page of the publication."
"Last week's Forbes cover was like a punch, and now the Gq and Travis cover will only make the missing Kelly worse and more painful."
"TEGA Miss Kelly, think it should be he and Kelly have a beautiful baby together, do interviews, take photos with Kelly, take magazine cover."



Number  205
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Bringing my fave singer to my fave show to guest judge @Seal @nbcagt #SealAtAGT #LookOutAmerica#DontMissIt.””
“!” she wrote alongside the Monday, May 1, video.”
““Back in step!”
“In the quick clip, the former spouses, who divorced in 2012 after seven years of marriage, walked together on the NBC show’s red carpet as a smiling Klum, who is a judge on the show, held onto his arm.”
“Klum recently shared a video with the singer on the set of America’s Got Talent, where he served as a guest judge.”
“Although she often publicly professes her love for Schnabel, Klum has also remained friendly with Seal, 54.”
“Schnabel, who is the eldest son of director Julian Schnabel, has previously been linked to Demi Moore, Elle Macpherson and Liv Tyler.”
“...following her split from her former bodyguard Martin Kirsten...”
“There is nothing more to this than I was simply saying goodnight to a family friend and we went our separate ways Klum who is mom of Leni 13 Henry 11 Johan 10 and Lou 7 with ex husband Seal and the art dealer 30 have been dating since 2014”
““The claims that have been made are a misinterpretation of an entirely innocent situation,” Schnabel said in a statement obtained by Us Weekly.”


"Bring my favorite singer to my favorite show and give it to the guest judges@ Seal@nbcagt ţSealAtAGTţLookOutAmericaţDontMissIt。”
"!" she wrote next to the video on Monday, May 1. "
"Step back
"In this short film, the former couple, who divorced in 2012 after seven years of marriage, walk together on the red carpet of NBC, and Krum, as a judge of the show, smiles and takes his arm."
"Krum recently shared a video with the singer on the set of" America's got talent, "where he was a guest judge
"Although Klum often publicly expresses her love for Schnabel, she has always maintained a friendly relationship with the 54 year old seal."
"Schnabel is the eldest son of director Julian Schnabel and has previously been associated with Demi Moore, Al McPherson and liv Taylor."
“… After she broke up with former bodyguard Martin Kirsten... "
"There's nothing more important than that. I just said good night to a family friend and we parted ways with cram, the mother of Lenny 13, Henry 11, John 10 and Lu 7, ex husband seal and art dealer 30, who has been dating since 2014."
"These statements are misunderstandings of total innocence," Schnabel said in a statement obtained by us weekly



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you want him to do another movie with Quentin?”
“Plan to see this Brad Putt for a long time.”HollywoodLifers, do you think Angelina should be worried about Brad?”
“Why is she not sure about the reunion?”
“Brad Pitt‘s name has entered in the mix for Quentin Taratino‘s next movie, according to The Hollywood Reporter.”
“Angelina Jolie reportedly heard about her ex’s potential next role and wasn’t thrilled.”
““Angelina has heard the buzz about Quentin wanting Brad for his new movie and she is not pleased,” a source close to the actress EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““She’s worried about what kind of influence Quentin will be on Brad.”
“He’s a bit of a partier in her opinion and not someone Brad should be spending time with, period.”You might remember Brad, 53, worked with Quentin before on Inglourious Basterds in 2009.”
“The director has been rumored to be circling A-listers like Brad and Jennifer Lawrence for a movie about the Manson family murders.”
“Angelina’s reportedly afraid Quentin, 54, might lead Brad back down a partying path after he’s made so much progress.”


"Do you want him and Quentin to make another movie?"
"Plan to watch Brad putt for a long time." Hollywood stars, do you think Angelina should worry about Brad? "
"Why isn't she sure about the reunion?"
Brad Pitt has been shortlisted for Quentin taratino's next film, the Hollywood Reporter reported
"It's reported that Angelina Jolie was not excited to hear that her ex-wife might be the next character."
A source close to Quentin told reporters exclusively: "Angelina is not happy to hear that Quentin wants Brad to play in his new film." Hollywood life. "
"She was worried about how Quentin would affect Brad."
"In her opinion, he's a bit of a partisan, not someone Brad should spend time with," you may remember Brad, 53, who worked with Quentin in 2009's shameless bastard
"It is rumored that the director is working with Brad, Jennifer Lawrence and other first-line stars to make a film about Manson family murder."
"Angelina is reported to be worried that Quentin, 54, may take Brad back to the party after he has made so much progress."



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She wants to get the divorce done quickly now because she wants to share a place with Colin,” said a source, “and begin a trial marriage!””
“Scarlett Johansson: Bizarre Case Of Mistaken Identity32-year-old Scarlett filed for divorce from husband Romain Dauriac in March and is in the midst of a brutal custody battle with him over their 2-year-old daughter Rose Dorothy.”
“Over the Fourth of July weekend, the lovebirds enjoyed a romantic dinner in the Hamptons — a day after celebrating Colin’s 35th birthday.”
“Snitches said they’ve been hot and heavy since the “Avengers” star guest-hosted “SNL” on March 11!”
“The pair was first spotted “making out” at the NBC show’s season finale party in May, but that lip-lock wasn’t their first!”
“Scarlett Johansson wants her divorce done already — so she can shack up with “Saturday Night Live” squeeze Colin Jost!”


"She wants to get divorced as soon as possible now because she wants to share a place with Colin," a source said
"Scarlett Johnson: a strange case of identity error. Scarlett, 32, filed for divorce from her husband, Romain dauriac, in March, and is now engaged in a brutal custody battle for her 2-year-old daughter, rose Dorothy, with her husband."
On the weekend of July 4, the couple had a romantic dinner in Hampton - the day after Colin's 35th birthday
"The informer said that since the avenger star guest hosted SNL on March 11, they have been hot and heavy!"
The couple were found to be "intimate" for the first time at the NBC end of season party in May, but that lip lock is not their first time
Scarlett Johnson wants her divorce done - so she can live with Colin Jost, the Saturday night live



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"There are no projects that Jennifer is considering with Brad," Jennifer's spokesperson revealed.”
“Back in March 2017, there were multiple reports that We Are The Millers star was considering to work with the Once Upon a Time in Hollywood actor.”
“However, their personal and professional lives constantly create sensational headlines.”
“Most recently, it was absurdly claimed that Jennifer and her ex-husband Brad could have a sensational reunion on the sets of a new rom-com movie.”
“The latest report from Heat Magazine asserted that the newly single Jennifer and Brad are said to be "seriously considering" featuring in a feature film together for the first time.”
“Prior to this, they shared screen space in FRIENDS TV series when Brad made a memorable cameo.”
“An alleged source told the magazine that since Brad and Jennifer both are friends again, it would be a tremendous opportunity to make a feature-length film.”
“However, the new characters will not be seen as ardent lovers, but they would typically have to interact in front of the camera.”
“"It's not like they would be playing lovers or anything, but the project is in the romantic comedy genre and their characters would cross paths.”
“The movie producers are really excited and feel this would be dynamite casting," added the insider.”


"Jennifer is not considering a project with Brad," said a spokesman for her
"As early as March 2017, there were many reports that we were Miller's star and he was considering working with the former Hollywood actor."
"However, their personal and professional lives continue to create sensational headlines."
"Recently, it has been absurdly claimed that Jennifer and her ex husband Brad may reunite on the set of a new film."
New single Jennifer and Brad are said to be "seriously considering" their debut in a feature film, according to a new report in heat magazine
Before that, Brad made an unforgettable cameo role in the friends TV series, in which they shared screen space
"An alleged source told the magazine that now that Brad and Jennifer are friends again, it would be a great opportunity to make feature films."
"However, new characters are not seen as passionate lovers, but they usually have to interact in front of the camera."
"They won't play lovers or anything, but this project belongs to the type of romantic comedy, and their roles will intersect."
"The filmmakers are really excited that it's going to be dynamite casting," the insider added



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She finished, "That's what I was trying to allude to, but thank you for thinking of my womb."”
“In a video shared to Instagram on Thursday, Schumer sips on a cocktail and explains that she and designer Leesa Evans are actually collaborating on a clothing line "for all sizes and shapes and at a chill price point."”
“Amy, however, was quick to pump the brakes on the speculation by clarifying, "I am not pregnant."”
“After posting some photos to Instagram with the caption, "@leesaevansstyle and I are cookin' somethin' up," fans started to speculate that the comedian is expecting her first child with her husband Chris Fischer.”
“Amy Schumer is setting the record straight on those baby bump rumors.”


She said, "that's what I want to imply, but thank you for thinking about my uterus."
In a video shared with instagram on Thursday, Schumer sips a cocktail and explains that she and designer Leesa Evans are actually working on a clothing line, "all sizes and shapes, very low prices."
However, Amy quickly clarified, "I'm not pregnant."
"Fans posted photos on instagram that said," what are @ leesaevansstyle and I doing? "Fans began to speculate that the comedian was looking forward to her first child with her husband Chris Fischer
"Amy Schumer is clearing up rumors about baby lumps."



**Something goes wrong**
“Also Read: Cannes' Female Troubles: Women Directors Have Always Been ScarceThis year along with Husson, the women in competition include Nadine Labaki with “Capharnaum” and Alice Rohrwacher with “Happy as Lazzaro.””
“The stairs of our industry MUST be accessible to all.”
“The number of women participating in the protest was selected to match this figure.”
“Only 82 films in official selection in the history of the Cannes Film Festival have been directed by women.”
“Also Read: Women in Cannes: A Short History of Small Victories and Decades of Male Dominance (Photos)That is an improvement over Cannes’ historical record.”
“The protests, part of the rising 5050×2020 movement was planned ahead of the premiere of “Girls of the Sun,” a film in competition by director Eva Husson, one of only three female filmmakers in the running.”
“The group stood on the steps of the Palais des Festival silently to protest how hard it still is to climb the ladder as a woman in Hollywood.”
“Let’s climb.”Varda is one of only two women in Cannes Film Festival’s history to receive the Palme d’Or — the highest prize awarded — along with New Zealand filmmaker Jane Champion.”
“82 Femmes du cinéma réunies sur les marches #Cannes2018 #Féminisme pic.twitter.com/aTO6sjekp2 - Citizen Cannes TV (@CITIZENCANNES) May 12, 2018“We acknowledge all of the women and men who are standing for change.”
“DuVernay and Stewart are on the jury.”


You can also read: Women's problems in Cannes: female directors have been rare this year, and the women competing with Hussein include Nadine rabbagi and Alice rowacher
"The stairs of our industry have to reach everyone."
"The number of women who took part in the protest was chosen, which is in line with this figure."
"In the history of Cannes Film Festival, only 82 officially selected films were directed by women."
"Read at the same time:" women in Cannes: little victories and a short history of decades of male domination "(photo), which is an improvement on Cannes' historical record."
"The protest is part of the rising 5050 x 2020 movement, which was planned before the premiere of" the girl of the sun, "which was contested by director EVA Husson, one of the only three female producers."
"This group of people stood silently on the steps of the festival palace, protesting how difficult it is to climb the steps as a woman in Hollywood."
"Let's climb." Walda is one of the only two women in the history of Cannes Film Festival to win the Palme d'Or (the highest award), and New Zealand filmmaker Jane chapn is one of them
"82 women in Cannes Film Festival 2018" pic.twitter.com/aTO6sjekp2 -Citizen Cannes (@ citizen Cannes) May 12, 2018 "we thank all the men and women who support change."
"Duvernay and Stewart are members of the jury."



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It still burns her.””
“The singers the performed the song which fans are calling now Blake’s way of subtly shading his ex who is a proud Texas native.”
“The country music superstar just clapped back at his ex-wife with a little help from fellow country music singer, Luke Bryan.”
“Buddies Blake and Luke performed a seemingly innocent rendition of George Strait’s “All My Exes Live In Texas” — but considering the fact that Miranda was recently called out for shading her husband, this choice of song hardly seems coincidental.”
“Luke’s wife, Caroline, posted a photo of her hubby dressed up like Blake for the performance.”
““Blake Bryan.”
“Luke really wanted to capture the vintage Blake look….but he actually looks like Luke from our college days.”
“#1998 #bluke #crashmyplaya,” she wrote.”
“Recently, during Miranda’s Livin’ Like Hippies tour, she performed her fan-favorite hit, “Little Red Wagon,” which references the years she spent married to Blake.”
““The cold-blooded way Blake blindsided her with divorce, drove her out of his life, and then shoved his romance with Gwen [Stefani] in her face is something that will scar her forever,” an insider exclusively told Life & Style.”


"It still burns her."
"The singers sang the song, and fans called it black, cleverly concealing the proud Texan natives of his ex girlfriend."
The country music superstar fought back against his ex-wife with the help of fellow countryman Luke Bryan
"Brothers black and Luke performed the seemingly innocent song" all my ex girlfriends live in Texas "by George strett - but considering that Miranda was recently named for casting a shadow over her husband, the choice of this song does not seem to be a coincidence."
Luke's wife Caroline posted a picture of her husband dressed as black
"Blake Blaine."
"Luke really wants to take a picture of black's retro look But in fact, he looks like Luke in our college days. "
"In 1998, Brooke, clarimepraia," she wrote
"Recently, on Miranda's journey to Hippie life, she performed her fans' favorite song" little red carriage ", which mentioned the years when she and black got married
"Blake's cold-blooded divorce cheated her, drove her out of her life, and then pushed his love affair with Gwen (Stephanie) to her face, which will leave her permanent scars," an insider told life and fashion exclusively



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Cirque and Peter Pan have been in the air for years!”Source: GettyWhat do you think of Pink and Lady Gaga’s unlikely friendship?”
“According to an OK!”
“...insider the singers are fighting back against the famous pop star after her feud with Lady G Previously Madonna accused Gaga of ripping off her song Express Yourself to create Born This Way But now Pink is coming to G s defense and helping her write an anthem against the...”
“...queen of pop...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: Getty“Pink feels sorry for Gaga and is taking her side in her Madonna feud,” the insider told OK!”
“...exclusively.”
“She thinks Gaga s been treated rotten and is really talented and vulnerable right now Source Getty Pink s a tough girl and she doesn t like the way Madonna s been trashing her friend all over town saying that Gaga s music is a bad rip off of hers...”
“...the source continued...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyIn an interview with Rolling Stone, Madonna admitted she believed Gaga “blatantly ripped off one of my songs.” Then, Madonna’s single “Two Steps Behind Me” was widely considered a dig at Gaga, with lyrics like, “You're a copycat, Where is my royalty?”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"The circus and Peter Pan have been flying in the air for many years! "Source: Getty, what do you think of the unlikely friendship between pink and Lady Gaga?"
"According to an OK!"
“…… The singers are fighting back against the famous pop star because of her discord with Mrs. g. Madonna used to accuse Gaga of tearing up her song "express yourself" to create "born like this", but now pink has come to defend g and helped her write a song against... "
“… The queen of pop
The article goes on to the following advertising source: Getty "pink is sorry, Gaga and her Madonna are on her side," people familiar with the matter told OK! "
“…… Exclusive. "
"She thinks Gaga has been treated badly. Now she is really talented and vulnerable. Getty Pinker is a strong girl. She doesn't like Madonna to slander her friends everywhere in the town, saying that Gaga's music is her poor plagiarism..."
“… Source continues... "
Madonna admitted in an interview with rolling stone that she believed Gaga had "blatantly plagiarized one of my songs.". Then, Madonna's single "two steps behind me" is widely regarded as a sarcasm against Gaga, with the words "you're a plagiarist, where's my royal family?"



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The boys wanted to make progress with Camilla but still felt shadowed by how she had split up their mother and father.”
“However, it’s been reported that their relationship was still very tentative at the time.”
“In 1998, William finally agreed to set up a meeting with Camilla so he could learn a little more about her.”
“William eventually set up a meeting with Camilla to clear the airAfter taking a break from pushing the boys to meet Camilla, Charles tried once more.”
“2.”
“Next: William took the initiative.”
“Charles did not push the relationship on the boys because he wanted them to warm up to her and knew they were aware of the trouble Camilla had caused Charles and Diana.”
“William was especially resistant to meeting her.”
“He explained their relationship from his point of view, but Diana had already tainted the mere thought of Camilla for the boys.”
“William was resistant to meeting CamillaIn the summer of 1997, two months before Diana’s death, Charles sat his kids down to talk to them about Camilla.”


"The children want to progress with Camilla, but they are still blinded by how she separated their parents."
"However, it was reported that their relationship was very tentative at that time."
"In 1998, William finally agreed to meet with Camilla to get to know her better."
"William finally arranged a meeting with Camilla to clarify the issue. Charles didn't let the children see Camilla for the time being, so he tried again. "
“2.”
"Next: William took the initiative."
"Charles didn't put the relationship on the two boys because he wanted them to have a good feeling for her and knew that they knew the trouble Camilla had brought to Charles and Diana."
"William was particularly reluctant to see her."
"He explained their relationship from his own point of view, but Diana has tarnished Camilla's idea of the two boys."
In the summer of 1997, two months before Diana's death, William refused to meet Camilla. Charles sat the children down to talk about Camilla



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below!”
“Ariel’s excited to start trying ASAP and wants to fall pregnant before her 20th birthday!”The curvy actress turns 20 in January 28 – can fans expect a baby bump by then?”
“Added the source: “He is worried they’re too young, but he loves her so he’ll probably give in to her plan.”
““She took Levi out for dinner last week to tell him of her intentions, and even had a pacifier-shaped sucker as a cute gift for him!”The pair has been going strong since November of 2016, when they were first caught kissing!”
““Ariel feels she’s done a lot of living in her young years, and she wants to start a family while she’s still in her prime,” a source told Radar.”
“The busty Modern Family star, 19, was seen buying baby gifts and visiting the Escape Hotel in Hollywood with 30-year-old boyfriend Levi Meaden earlier this week!”
“Ariel Winter is telling friends she wants to become a mom, days after she was spotted shopping at a baby store, RadarOnline.com can reveal!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Ariel is happy to try as soon as possible. She wants to get pregnant before her 20th birthday! "The curvy actress will turn 20 on January 28, when fans can expect a small lump?"
"He is worried that they are too young, but he loves her, so he may give in to her plan," the source added
"Last week, she took Livy out to dinner, told him his intention, and even gave him a pacifier shaped straw as a lovely gift!"! "The two have been strong since they were caught kissing for the first time in November 2016!"
"Ariel thinks she did a lot of things when she was young, and she wants to get married when she is young," a source told radar
The 19-year-old modern family superstar was seen earlier this week buying baby presents with her 30-year-old boyfriend levy midden and visiting Hollywood escape hotels
"Ariel winter told a friend that she wanted to be a mother. A few days ago, she was found shopping in a baby shop, RadarOnline.com Website I can reveal! "



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“J.Lo has reportedly also been giving the "Justice League" actor "the green light by speaking nostalgically about their relationship in the press."”
“"It was like they'd never split up," an insider said of their alleged reunion.”
“But her supposed reunion with ex-fiance Ben Affleck was reportedly real.”
“The news outlet further pointed out that J.Lo was once rumored to have dumped her former flame Drake, 30, for soccer player Cristiano Ronaldo.”
“"She's the queen of fake romance items," claimed the insider, who's said to have been working closely with the "Ain't Your Mama" hitmaker.”
“The insider went on alleging that J.Lo's known for her fake romances.”
“The source claimed that it's just "another PR stunt like when she was dating Drake!"”
“"It's fake," a source revealed to the publication, after news broke saying that the 47-year-old singer and the retired baseball star had been in a secret relationship for weeks.”
“According to the publication, the "On the Floor" hitmaker's romance with the 41-year-old former MLB star is just a PR stunt.”
“That's what Radar Online has reported.”


"It is reported that Luo Guancong also gave the green light to the hero of justice alliance by nostalgically talking about their relationship in the media."
"It's as if they've never been apart," one person familiar with the matter said of their so-called reunion
"But her reunion with ex fiance Ben Affleck is reported to be real."
The news media further pointed out that there are rumors that Luo Guancong abandoned 30-year-old former fram Drake for the sake of football player Ronaldo
"She's the queen of fake romantic objects," the source claimed, saying she had been working closely with killers who were "not your mother."
"The insider continues to claim that Luo Zhiling is known for her fake relationship."
The source said it was just "another PR stunt when she dated Drake!"
"It's fake," a source told the media after it was said that the 47 year old singer and the retired baseball star had been secretly dating for weeks
According to reports, the "on court" killer's relationship with the 41 year old former Major League star is just a public relations stunt
"That's what radar reports online."



Number  217
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Viral Headlines Entertainment Tech Lifestyle See All Videos Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“Perú español Philippines English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל”
“...español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch...”
“...msn back to msn home video powered by Microsoft News web search Skip to Navigation Skip to Content Sign in Change language and content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, from each 1506 each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each each Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective All the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way all the way Each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road, each road Entertainment Technology feedback lifestyle view all videos send MSN feedback we thank you for your comments... "
"Philippine English polskapolski Portuguese Schweitzer German Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ξ e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English American English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng ViΕδαελληνικάРоССииPиССкииישראל”
“… Espa? Ol Denmark Denmark Germany Espa? A Espa? Ol France France India English India India India India India India India India India India Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italian Italian Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysia English m é xico Espa? Ol Netherlands New Zealand English Norwegian Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch “
“… MSN return to MSN home video by Microsoft News Web search provides support jump to navigation jump to content login change language and content African French French French Latin American Spanish Argentina Spanish Australian English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazilian Portuguese Canadian English Canadian French French French Canadian Republic of sestina "Chile Spain Colombia..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Whoever said “you can’t put a price on beauty” was clearly misinformed.”
“If all of these numbers seem shocking, it makes a lot more sense when you consider the entire beauty industry is worth an astounding $382 billion globally.”
“That’s a lot of lipsticks… or the cash for a used car!”
“What really gave us a shock, though, was discovering that a woman spends $15,000 on beauty products in her lifetime.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“(Our bank accounts may not thank us, but our vanities sure do.)”
“According to a new video by Money (above), the average woman will spend $43 on a shopping trip for makeup.”
“If you’re guilty too, it’s actually not all that unusual.”
“So we can freely admit that whenever we take a trip to Sephora or Ulta we inevitably leave with a few more products than we anticipated buying.”
“...and snoop inside celebrities’ medicine cabinets whenever possible.”


"Who said 'you can't price beauty' is obviously a misinformation."
"If all of these numbers look shocking, it makes more sense when you consider that the entire beauty industry is worth $382 billion globally."
"Too much lipstick Or used car money! "
"But what really shocked us was that a woman spent $15000 on beauty products in her lifetime."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"(our bank accounts may not thank us, but our vanity will certainly thank us.)
"According to a recent video" money "(see above), the average woman spends $43 on make-up on a shopping trip."
"If you're guilty, it's not that unusual."
"Therefore, we are free to admit that whenever we travel to Sephora or ulta, we inevitably leave with products that exceed our expectations."
“… Pry into celebrity medicine cabinets as much as you can. "



Number  219
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But for now, as the wedding date nears, the close pal says Markle’s trying to relax and avoid “paying attention” to any of the family drama.”
“Grant also exclusively told Us Weekly a month before his comments that her regal romance has “created rifts between” the family.”
“After Prince Harry commented that the royals are the “family she never had,” Markle’s clan hit back at his remarks.”
“...relationship with the prince...”
“It s the one thing she s struggled with most since meeting Harry especially after the engagement The insider adds that she s finding it really hard to trust people she meets now This is not the first time that the Suits star s estranged relatives have commented on her...”
““She’s lost sleep over relatives who’ve screwed her over,” the source says.”
““She hasn’t spoken to them in years.”To make matters more difficult, since the actress and 33-year-old Captain General of the Royal Marines announced their engagement, Markle’s family have been speaking to the press about her.”
““Meghan is really worried about some these members of her family,” the insider says.”
“A source reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly now her half-sister Samantha Grant as well as nephew Tyler Dooley (her half-brother Thomas Markle Jr.’s son) and his mother (her ex-sister-in-law), Tracy, will be flying down to London to be TV wedding correspondents.”
“After estranged family members of the future princess, 36, revealed that they weren’t invited to the upcoming royal wedding, they are still making it their business to catch a glimpse of her special day.”


"But at the moment, as the wedding date approaches, the close friend says, markel is trying to relax and avoid" focusing "on any family drama."
Grant's comments came a month after she told us weekly exclusively that her royal relationship "created a rift between" families. "
After Prince Harry commented that the royal family was "a family she had never had", markel's tribe hit back
“… The relationship with the prince... "
"It's one of the most difficult things she's had since she met Harry, especially after her engagement. The person familiar with the matter added that she found it hard to believe the people she met now. This is not the first time that distant relatives of a suit star have commented on her... "
"She lost sleep for the relatives who screwed her up," the source said
"She hasn't spoken to them for years." To make things more difficult, the actress's family has been talking to the media about her since she announced her engagement to the 33 year old head of the Royal Marine Corps
"Megan is really worried about some of her family members," the person familiar with the matter said
Her half sister Samantha grant, her nephew Tyler Dooley, the son of her half brother Thomas markel, and her mother Tracy, her former sister-in-law, will fly to London to work as TV wedding reporters, a source said in the new issue of us weekly
"After the divorced family members of the 36 year old future Princess revealed that they were not invited to the upcoming royal wedding, they still made it their duty to see her special day."



Number  220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And then we danced the night away under the stars with the best firework display I have ever seen timed to perfection with the music of their first dance.”Image zoom...”
““When she and her new husband rolled up to the dock in that one of a kind boat, we all cheered.”
“Subscribe now for exclusive photos inside the gorgeous celebration — only in PEOPLE!”
“DWTS star Derek Hough thought he knew what to expect when it came to his sister Julianne‘s wedding to NHL star Brooks Laich.”
““I was with Julianne on tour while she was planning everything, and it truly exceeded my expectations,” Derek tells PEOPLE exclusively for this week’s cover story.”
““It was beyond anything I could have imagined.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: © Julianne and Brooks Laich.”
“All rights reserved.”
“Photographed by Sarah FalugoThe intimate, outdoor wedding on July 8 on Lake Coeur d’Alene, Idaho, where the Houghs spent summer holidays growing up, was “a timeless, magical, romantic experience that was truly perfect in every way,” Derek says.”
“There is so much sentimental history on that lake that having an experience which celebrates love created an electric and palpable energy that was felt every minute of every day we were there For all the intimate details inside Hough and Laich s gorgeous Idaho nuptials including exclusive wedding photos...”


"Then we danced all night under the stars, and with the music of their first dance, our fireworks show reached the best state I have ever seen."
"We all cheered when she and her new husband arrived at the dock in that unique boat."
"Now subscribe to exclusive photos of gorgeous Celebrations - people only!"
"DWTS star Derek Hough thinks he knows what will happen when his sister Julianne marries NHL star Brooks LAICH."
"I'm touring with Julian and she's planning everything, which is really beyond my expectations," Derek told people in this week's cover story interview
"It's beyond my imagination." Get push notification of news, functions, etc
"Image scaling credit:? Julianne and Brooks LAICH."
"All rights reserved."
"A close outdoor wedding on July 8 in Lake Cowell Darren, Idaho, was filmed by Sarah farugos, where the hogs spent their summer growing up, and it was" an eternal, magical, romantic experience, perfect in every way, "Derek said
"There's a lot of sentimental history on the lake. There was an experience celebrating love, which created a kind of electric and touchable energy. We can feel it every minute of every day there, including all the intimate details in the gorgeous Idaho wedding of Hoff and rich..."



Number  221
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Going forwardPerhaps our biggest question about this whole story is: doesn’t Laura deserve better?”
“Fix the Netflix when the SCART lead comes unplugged?”
“Damp, open flames and general roughhousing have not been kind to Henry and he’s not even a cutout that’s allowed outside.”
“SustainabilityBeing the proud owners of a Henry VIII cutout (not even joking), myself and my housemates are basically experts in the lifecycle of such a product, and let me tell you right now, cardboard is not the most substantial of materials.”
“Or does she pour it down a little hole she’s made in Edward’s mouth, drying his soggy lips off under the handdryer afterwards?”
“Is Laura forced to drink it herself, therefore getting doubly drunk?”
“Which is cool and all, but what happens to the beer?”
“For instance:Going outAccording to Laura, she regularly takes Edward out to bars where she orders him a beer, and her a gin and tonic.”
“While we’re totally on board with doing whatever makes you happy – even if that something is marrying a cardboard version of a fictional character – there’s a few questions that this story’s left us asking.”
“‘I had to carry him, and we had to do it at night because he can’t be in the sun, but everyone makes sacrifices for the man they love, right?’ Right.”


"Looking ahead, perhaps our biggest question about the whole story is: shouldn't Laura get a better one?"
"Fix Netflix when Scott's wire is pulled out?"
"The humidity, open fire and rough environment were not good for Henry. He was not even allowed to go out."
"Sustainability as the proud owner of Henry VIII's paper cutting (not even joking), my roommate and I are basically experts in the life cycle of this product. Now let me tell you, cardboard is not the most essential material."
"Or did she pour it into a small hole in Edward's mouth and blow dry his wet lips with a hair dryer?"
"Was Laura forced to drink herself, so she got drunk?"
"It's cool, but what's wrong with the beer?"
"For example: going out for Laura, she often takes Edward to the bar, gives him some beer, gives her some gin and tonics."
"Although we totally agree to do anything that makes you happy - even if it's married to a cardboard version of a fictional character - the story leaves us a few questions."
"I have to carry him, we have to do it at night, because he can't be in the sun, but everyone makes sacrifices for the people they love, right? "Yes."



Number  222
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Today we matter & I’m so grateful.”
“But for those of us who’ve had to endure it & been punished or humiliated for speaking up, this day of reckoning is a blessing.”
“Check out Andy Lack’s past!” Rosie O’Donnell responded to Trump, writing “child rapist” over his tweet, while Emmy Rossum also drew attention to Trump’s charges.”
“News...”
“Ana Navarro Cárdenas ananavarro November 29 2017 President Donald Trump who faces his own sexual harassment allegations wrote Wow Matt Lauer was just fired from NBC for inappropriate sexual behavior in the workplace But when will the top executives at NBC Comcast be fired for putting out so much Fake...”
“Trump still President.”
“Moore still running.”
“But in politics…Conyers still in Congress.”
“Kevin Spacey lost his job.”
“Harvey Weinstein lost his job.”


"Today we are important and I appreciate it."
"But for those of us who have to endure this pain & to be punished or humiliated for saying what we say, this day is a blessing."
"Look at Andy Lake's past! "Rosie O'Donnell responded to trump by tweeting" child rapist, "and Emmy Rossum drew attention to trump's charges."
"News..."
"Anna Navarro Cardenas Navarro on November 29, 2017, President Donald Trump, faced with his own sexual harassment charges, wrote that Matt Lauer had just been fired by NBC for improper sexual behavior in the workplace, but when would NBC's senior executives be fired for publishing so many fakes..."
"Trump is still the president."
"Moore is still running."
"But politically Conyers is still in Congress. "
"Kevin Spacey lost his job."
"Harvey Weinstein lost his job."



Number  223
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'American Idol' Contestant Says Katy Perry Surprise Kiss Was 'Harmless': 'I Was Just Shocked' (Exclusive)‘American Idol’ Contestant Benjamin Glaze Says Katy Perry's Surprise Kiss Made Him ‘Uncomfortable Immediately’”
“Bryan did admit that he, Perry and Lionel Richie aren't perfect, saying, "We are going to get it right sometimes and get it wrong sometimes."”
“The 41-year-old country singer defended his fellow American Idol judge after her headline-making kiss with contestant Benjamin Glaze, explaining on The Morning Show on Monday that the smooch was just "fun TV."”
“During Glaze's audition on Idol's season premiere, he confessed to the judges that he had never been kissed, just moments before Perry asked him for a kiss on the cheek, turning her head and kissing him on the lips.”
“In an interview with The New York Times, Glaze said the kiss made him "uncomfortable immediately" and that he wished it could have been saved for his first relationship.”
“He later clarified his comments to ET, calling the kiss "harmless."”
“'American Idol' Contestant Calls Unwanted Kiss from Judge Katy Perry 'Uncomfortable' This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Embed Code Restart 'American Idol' Contestant Calls Unwanted Kiss from Judge Katy Perry 'Uncomfortable'“It’s unfortunate that stuff like that turns into a story that big,” Bryan said on The Morning Show.”
““I watched an actual interview where Ben, the kid that was involved, said that he was cool with everything.”"I gotta back Katy on that.”


"American Idol says Katie Perry's surprise kiss is" harmless ":" I'm just shocked. "(exclusive) American Idol's Benjamin Glass says Katie Perry's surprise kiss makes him" immediately uncomfortable. "
Brian admits that he, Perry and Lionel Ritchie are not perfect, saying, "sometimes we do things right, sometimes we make mistakes."
The 41 year old country singer defended her American Idol judges after kissing contestant Benjamin glase, explaining on Monday's morning show that the kiss was just "an interesting TV show."
"When glaze auditioned for the premiere of Idol Season 4, he confessed to the judges that no one had ever kissed him, just as Perry asked him to kiss his cheek and turn around to kiss his lips."
In an interview with the New York Times, glass said the kiss made him "immediately uncomfortable" and he hoped it would last until his first love
He later clarified his comments with ET, calling the kiss "harmless"
"The contestants of" American Idol "said that the kiss judge Katie Perry didn't want was" uncomfortable. ". This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information. "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"American Idol contestants call judge Katie Perry's unwanted kiss' uncomfortable '," Brian said on the morning show. "Unfortunately, such a thing has become such a big story."
"I saw a real interview in which Ben, the child involved, said he was calm about everything." "I have to support Katie."



Number  224
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just have to take it day by day."”
“Later Khloe said, "I wake up and sometimes I'm in a great mood and sometimes I'm really angry and confused and irritated at life.”
“The episode, filmed at least a month prior to her filing for divorce on Dec. 13, shows Odom calling Kardashian, begging for forgiveness regarding nasty comments his father Joe made to the media about her family.”
“"Lamar called and was crying," Kardashian revealed.”
“"He was really sad and he kept apologizing about today.”
“He was making me cry."”
“In fact, Kardashian said Odom told her he would "kill" for her family and that he loves the Kardashians.”
“"It's so sad to sit back and watch somebody's life implode right before your very eyes," Kris Jenner said about Odom and the situation with her daughter.”
“"Six months ago she had a husband and a family and a bond that I thought would be unbreakable."”
“Read: Khloe Kardashian Says 'I'm a Shattered Person' on 'KUWTK'Khloe Kardashian, 29, was not happy about her father-in-law's comments.”


"I eat it every day."
Later Chloe said, "when I wake up, sometimes I'm in a good mood, sometimes I'm really angry, confused, and annoyed with life."
"The video, taken at least one month before Odom filed for divorce on December 13, shows Odom calling Kardashian to ask for forgiveness for his father Joe's bad remarks about her family."
"Lamar called to cry," Kardashian revealed
"He's really sad. He's always apologizing for today."
"He made me cry."
"In fact, Kardashian said that Odom told her he would" kill "for her family. He loved Kardashian."
"It's sad to sit there and watch someone's life explode in front of you," Chris Jenner said of Odom and her daughter
"Six months ago, she had a husband and a family, and a bond that I think is unbreakable."
"Read: Khloe Kardashian, 29, said in kuwtk," I'm a broken person. "She's not satisfied with her father-in-law's comments."



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I think they’re itching to get out in the world again.””
““We’ve all been a bit in lock-down,” admitted Angelina.”
“Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt have been living in separate homes since their split more than a year ago.”
“The six children (Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Vivienne, Knox, and Shiloh Jolie-Pitt) are residing with Jolie while reportedly enjoying private visits with Pitt.”
“However, according to Radar Online, a recent visit to Paris for Angelina and the children offered a shocking insight into Brad’s relationship with the kids, particularly his look-alike first biological child, Shiloh Jolie-Pitt.”
“Brad Pitt Reportedly Suffers “Every Father’s Worst Nightmare”Pitt’s children allegedly locked him out by creating a message that contained the first initials of every family member except Brad, claimed the publication.”
“Shiloh reportedly was the one who created the actual message and omitted Pitt’s name.”
““Shiloh [left Brad Pitt’s] name off [a message on the] Paris Bridge Of Love.”Radar Online claimed to have “exclusive” photos that showed Jolie vacationing with all six kids in Paris.”
“As part of their visit, Shiloh reportedly participated in a tradition that the media outlet described as heartbreaking for her dad.”
“The 11-year-old allegedly was seen with a lock that she had marked up with the initials of her closest relatives with the exception of her famous father, Brad.”


"I think they are eager to get out of the world again."
"We're all kind of locked up," Angelina admits
"Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt have been living in different houses since they split up more than a year ago."
"The six children (Maddox, parks, Zahara, Vivian, Knox and Shiloh Jolie Pitt) live with Jolie and are reported to have made private visits with Pitt."
"However, according to radar online, a recent visit to Paris by Angelina and her children shocked people to learn about Brad's relationship with the children, especially his first biological child, Shiloh Julie Pitt."
Brad Pitt is reported to have suffered "the worst nightmare of any father.". Pitt's children are said to have made a message containing the initials of all family members except brad and turned him out
"It's reported that Shiloh created the real message and omitted Pete's name."
"Hilo [left Brad Pitt's name on the bridge of love in Paris." Radar online claims to have "exclusive" photos showing Julie and her six children on holiday in Paris
"It's reported that as part of their visit, Shiloh participated in a tradition that the media said upset her father."
It is said that the 11 year old girl was seen carrying a lock, which was initialed by her closest relatives except her famous father Brad



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"Everything about Harry’s thoughtfulness and the inclusion of [Princess Diana’s stones] and obviously not being able to meet his mom, it’s so important to me to know that she’s a part of this with us."”
“Getty ImagesWhile visiting Reprezent Radio in Brixton alongside Markle and Prince Harry, photographer Dominic Lipinski snapped a picture of the bride-to-be's left hand, showcasing the stunning piece of jewelry.”
“Getty Images She also showed it off in Birmingham Getty Images And while in Edinburgh Getty Images Meghan s Engagement Ring Before the happy couple announced their plans to wed predictions suggested that Harry might propose with the Queen Mother s engagement ring or perhaps her massive diamond and pearl...”
“...ring but Harry opted instead to create a custom piece...”
“Getty ImagesAt the photo call in November, we caught our first glimpse of the ring, which was designed by Prince Harry and custom made by court jewelers Cleave and Company using one diamond sourced from Botswana and two smaller stones from Princess Diana's collection.”
“Another view of the ring.”
“Getty The ring is obviously yellow gold because that s Markle s favorite and the main stone itself I sourced from Botswana and the little diamonds either side are from my mother s jewelry collection to make sure that she s with us on this crazy journey together Harry said...”
“...during the couple s first sit down interview with the BBC”
“"It's incredible," Markle said of Harry's gesture.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"All about Harry's thoughtfulness and inclusion (Princess Diana's stone), and obviously not being able to see his mother, it's very important for me to know that she's a part of us."
Getty Images when photographer Dominic Lipinski, along with Markle and Prince Harry, visited Brixton's reprezent radio station, he took a picture of the bride to be's left hand, showing this amazing piece of jewelry
"She also showed the ring in Birmingham, and in Edinburgh, before the happy couple announced their wedding plans, Megan's engagement ring indicated that Harry might propose to the engagement ring of the queen mother, or her huge diamonds and pearls..."
“… The ring, but Harry chose to create a custom piece... "
"Getty Images took the first time to see this ring in a photo call in November. It was designed by Prince Harry and made by a court jeweler Clif company, using a diamond from Botswana and two smaller Jewels Collected from Princess Diana."
"Another view of the ring."
"The Getty ring is obviously gold, because this is Markel's favorite. The main jewels I purchased from Botswana, the small diamonds on both sides are my mother's jewels collectibles, so that she can join us in embarking on this crazy journey," Harry said.
“… In the couple's first interview with the BBC
"It's incredible," markel said of Harry's gesture



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...welcomed baby Esmeralda on September 12”
“So instead of coming home every night to them he s jetting back and forth just so he can see his daughter the source added The couple who started dating in 2011 after filming A Place Beyond The Pines together...”
“...to be with him...”
“Eva has pushed him away a source said Gosling 34 has been spending a lot of time in Georgia filming his new movie The Nice Guys and 40 year old Mendes allegedly refused to fly to Atlanta with baby Esmeralda...”
“They're barely talking.”
“"It's more than just run-of-the-mill stress that comes with having a newborn.”
“...magazine.”
“...lives recently reported OK”
“LOS ANGELES They may have only become parents in September but Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes have reportedly already grown apart The Hollywood couple are said to be on the verge of splitting up as they have been living separate...”


“…… September 12 ushered in the "little Esmeralda"
"So instead of going home to see them every night, he's jet flying back and forth just to see his daughter." The source added that the couple started dating after filming "the story of the pine forest" together in 2011... "
“… With him... "
"EVA drove him away. A source said that Gosling, 34, spent a lot of time in Georgia shooting his new film good man and Mendez, 40, and it is said that he refused to fly to Atlanta with Esmeralda..."
"They hardly speak."
"Newborns bring more than just ordinary stress."
“… Magazine. "
“… Recently reported life is OK "
"In Los Angeles, they may only become parents in September, but it is reported that Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes have separated, and the Hollywood couple are said to be on the verge of separation..."



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“God broke the mold on you.”
“Thank you for the gift of your films, your music & your being.”
“You could him up, down, left, right and he always looked great.”
“It was ‘Let the wardrobe do the acting.’ He was one of a kind and he didn’t have a bad angle.”
“He told Variety that he met Stanton through Jack Nicholson “back when they were roommates.” Hellman said that Stanton “had the same quality as all great actors and I think Harry summed it up best himself when he told me some advice Jack had given him.”
“!“Director Monte Hellman made “Ride in the Whirlwind” (1966), “Two Lane Blacktop” (1971), and “Cockfighter” (1974) with Stanton.”
“Loads of love to you wherever you are now!!”
“You are really going to be missed Harry Dean!!!”
“He was a great actor (actually beyond great) – and a great human being – so great to be around him!!!”
“And with good reason.”


"God has broken the mold in you."
"Thank you for your movies, your music and your presence."
"You can look at him up and down, left and right. He's always beautiful."
"That's" let the wardrobe play. "He's unique and has a good angle."
He told variety that he met Stanton through Jack Nicholson, "when they were roommates." Herman said Stanton "has the same qualities as all great actors, and I think Harry summed it up best when he told me some of Jack's advice."
"! director Monte Hellman co filmed riding in the whirlwind (1966), two lane black top (1971) and Cockfighter (1974) with Stanton
"No matter where you are now, I will give you a lot of love!"
"You're really going to miss Harry Dean!"
"He's a great actor (actually more than great) and a great person - it's great to be with him!"
"And for good reason."



Number  229
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you for your understanding."”
“Queen.” Another posted: “Like I always say, @Beyonce is a standard.”
“So it came as a huge shock to her fans this week, when some internet trolls made nasty comments about her weight on Twitter, branding her ‘fat’ in photographs of the star leaving a Hollywood party.”
“Resilient as ever, Beyonce, 35, has fought back by posting a photo of herself looking fantastic on her Instagram page.”
“A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on Apr 21, 2017 at 10:25pm PDTThe new photo of the Crazy In Love singer shows her posing in over-the-knee boots and a stunning baby pink dress as she places a hand on her growing bump.”
“Beyonce looks gorgeous with her hair braided and drop earrings, shades and a clutch bag.”
“The star appeared healthy and happy, with followers complimenting her on her amazing appearance.”
“One fan wrote: “Beautiful.”
“Flawless.”
“Fabulous.”


"Thank you for your understanding."
"Queen." Another wrote: "as I often say, @ Beyonce is a standard."
"So this week has been a huge blow for her fans, with some online thugs making bad comments on her weight on Twitter and tagging the star fat on photos of her leaving a Hollywood party."
"Beyonce, 35, has been fighting as hard as ever. She posted a picture of herself that looks great on instagram."
"Beyonce (@ Beyonce) shared a post at 10:25 pm on April 21, 2017. This new photo of the singer in love shows her in knee high boots, a stunning pink dress and a hand on her growing lump
"Beyonce looks beautiful with her braids, pendulous earrings, sunglasses and a handbag."
"The star looks healthy and happy, and fans praise her amazing appearance."
"Beautiful," one fan wrote
"Perfect."
"Great."



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lambo...”
“Still we d think twice before going barefoot on an LA sidewalk but then she doesn t live here anymore so she probably forgot how nasty the sidewalks are Oh and meanwhile Justin Bieber s tooling around in his new...”
“Oh, and she topped it all off with $21,500 worth of Tiffany jewels.”
“...comfortable...”
“...and sign autographs outside the theater on Saturday She also added a cashmere hooded sweater over her adorable denim two piece crop top and skirt by Oscar de la Renta which frankly kinda ruined the look but hey she was...”
“Selena Gomez wore sparkly mid heel sandals to the premiere of Hotel Transylvania 3 Summer Vacation but she just couldn t keep em on her feet after the red carpet Selena ditched the shoes and went barefoot to greet fans...”
“Those heels were cute, but they didn't last long!”


"Rambo..."
"We'll still think twice and walk barefoot on the sidewalk in Los Angeles, but then she doesn't live here, so she may forget how dirty the sidewalk is, and Justin Bieber's tools are in his new life
"Oh, she also bought $21500 worth of tiffany jewelry."
“… Comfortable... "
“…… When she signed outside the theater on Saturday, she added a cashmere hooded sweater to her cute cowboy two-piece jacket and Oscar de la Renta's skirt, which, frankly, ruined her look, but hey, she was... "
"Selena Gomez wore shining mid heeled sandals to the summer Premiere of the No. 3 hotel in Transylvania, but after she threw off her shoes on the red carpet and went barefoot to meet her fans, she just couldn't put them on her feet..."
"Those high heels are lovely, but they won't last long!"



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments.”
“Have something to add to this story?”
“If Lindsay Lohan's career were to be folded ... where would we put the crease?”
“Certainly!”
“Can we blame Herbie for this mess?”
“Or maybe she's just pretending to infiltrate the world of clueless celebrities so she can take them down one by one, but she totally plans to go back to hanging out with Janis and Damian when it's all over!”
“Or she could have swapped bodies with Dina Lohan!”
“Maybe she swapped places with her long-lost twin sister.”
“Of course, we're just assuming this is Lindsay.”
“Maybe she genuinely thought a cute selfie would help usher in an era of peace and goodwill amongst men.”


"Share in comments."
"Anything to add?"
"If Lindsay Lohan's career is disrupted... Where do we put the creases? "
"Of course!"
"Can we blame Herbie?"
"Or she's just pretending to sneak into the world of ignorant celebrities so she can kill them one by one, but she's totally planning to go back and play with Janice and Damian when it's over!"
"Or she could exchange bodies with Dina Rohan!"
"Maybe she changed places with her long lost twin sister."
"Of course, we just assume it's Lindsay."
"Maybe she really thinks that a lovely self portrait will help to open an era of peace and friendship between men."



**Something goes wrong**
“MORE : Berlin International Film Festival confirms women can wear flats – and men can wear heelsMORE : Angelina Jolie nearly brings back Oscars ‘leg bomb’ as children Shiloh and Zahara beam on red carpet...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“The 47-year-old, who plays Clare Crowhurst in the drama alongside Colin Firth, wore a high-necked blue floral dress with button detailing that would have been rather demure, were it not for the thigh-high slit in the skirt.”
“Work it, Rach.”
“Teaming the striking dress with black sandals and simple make-up, Rachel was effortlessly chic at the premiere at the Curzon Mayfair in London.”
“The floral dress featured a daring side-split Picture: Samir Hussein/Samir Hussein/WireImage)Rachel posed on the red carpet with her co-star Colin, who looked dapper as always in a suit and tie, overcoat and thick-rimmed glasses.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe Mercy documents Donald Crowhurst’s attempt to complete the Sunday Times Golden Globe Race in 1968, with Colin playing Crowhurst.”
“Rachel’s red carpet appearance comes after she was uncharacteristically open about her marriage to Bond actor Daniel Craig.”
“Rachel and Colin star alongside each other in The Mercy Picture David Fisher REX Shutterstock The couple who have been friends since their 20s got married in 2011 in a private ceremony attended by just four people including Daniel s daughter from a previous marriage and Rachel s son from...”
“...her relationship with Darren Aronofsky...”


"More: Berlin International Film Festival confirms that women can wear flat shoes and men can wear high heels: Angelina Jolie almost brought back the Oscar" leg bomb ", Shiloh and Zahara were brilliant on the red carpet when they were children..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"The 47 year old Claire Crowhurst, who plays Claire Crowhurst side by side with Colin Firth in the play, looks quite dignified if she doesn't have thigh high slits on her skirt, but a high collar blue floral skirt with button details."
"Go ahead, Rachel."
"With her eye-catching dress, black sandals and simple make-up, Rachel was effortlessly chic at the premiere of Curzon Mayfair in London."
"This floral dress features bold side stitching: Samir Hussein / Samir Hussein / WireImage Rachel and her partner Colin are photographed on the red carpet. Colin always looks smart in a suit, tie, overcoat and thick framed glasses."
The kindness reported that Donald Crowhurst tried to finish the Golden Globe competition of the Sunday Times in 1968, and Colin played Crowhurst
"Before appearing on the red carpet, Rachel was extremely frank about her marriage to bond star Daniel Craig."
"Rachel and Colin play side by side in the charity photo David Fisher Rex shutterstock. The 20-year-old couple held a private wedding in 2011, attended by only four people, including Daniel's ex-wife's daughter and Rachel's son..."
“… Her relationship with Darren Aronofsky... "



Number  233
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...posts...”
“The 28 year old dancers not only look exactly like each other but they also look exactly like they did two months ago when they won World Of Dance The comically IMDb com Inc takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles Tweets or blog...”
“Gossip Cop can correct this absurd claim.”
“Laurent and Larry Bourgeois , known professionally as “Les Twins,” are “not aging well,” according to a hilariously inaccurate report.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
“… Post... "
As like as two peas as like as two peas, the two 28 year old dancers are not only the same dancers but also grow up to be the same as the dance world award two months ago. Funny IMDB com Inc is not responsible for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blogs... "
"The gossip police can correct this absurd statement."
"Laurent and Larry bourgeois, professionally known as the LES twins," according to a ridiculously inaccurate report, are "not aging well."



Number  234
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“And Jolie has been consistently seeing one particular non-famous, handsome real estate agent, according to Entertainment Tonight.”
“"It's not serious," the outlet's source cautioned off the bat.”
“"Brad and Angie are both very secretive about their dating life.”
“Angie has told some friends she isn't ready to date, but she has been seeing a handsome, older-looking man who is a real estate agent.”
“He isn't a celebrity or high profile in any way."”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Apparently Jolie is super psyched to just have an adult around.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
According to entertainment tonight, Julie has been dating an unknown, handsome real estate agent
"It's not serious," the media source warned immediately
"Brad and Angie are very secretive about their dating lives."
"Angie told some friends that she wasn't ready for a date, but she had been dating a handsome real estate agent."
"He's not a celebrity, he's not a high profile."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Obviously Julie is very excited to have only one adult around her."



Number  235
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Their family occupied the estate when she was filming "Salt" in 2009.”
“Jolie and Pitt are selling their palatial property in Long Island for $55 million.”
“National Enquirer reported that the "Maleficent" star is reportedly on the "edge of a total collapse" because she overworked, barely eats and does not have enough sleep.”
“"There are times she feels light-headed and is on the verge of passing out," a so-called informant said.”
“As for Jolie's food intake, she allegedly eats "mostly morsels of steamed veggies and fruit, very little protein, and water. "”
“"She drinks wine and smokes cigarettes.”
“The fear is she's headed for a physical meltdown," the source added.”
“Gossip Cop debunked the said report.”
“According to the publication, Jolie, 42, has suffered legitimate health problems in the past, but it is not true that Brad Pitt's ex is "going without food or sleep."”
“They reached out to Jolie's friend who described the reports about Jolie's unhealthy sleeping and eating habit as "completely nonsense."”


"When she filmed salt in 2009, their family occupied the land."
"Julie and Pete are going to sell their luxury property on Long Island for $55 million."
The "evil" star is "on the verge of total collapse" because she is overworked, hardly eats and doesn't get enough sleep, the National Enquirer reported
One so-called informant said: "sometimes she feels dizzy and about to pass out."
As for Julie's food intake, it is said that she ate "mainly steamed vegetables and fruits, with little protein and water."
"She drinks and smokes."
"It's worrying that she's heading for a physical breakdown," the source added
"The gossip police exposed the above report."
It is reported that Julie, 42, has had reasonable health problems in the past, but Brad Pitt's predecessor's statement that she "doesn't eat or sleep" is not true
"They contacted a friend of Julie's who described reports about Julie's unhealthy eating habits as" complete nonsense“



Number  236
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s those difficult times that inform the next wonderful time, and it’s a series of trade-offs, of events, of wins and losses.””
“He’s one of our best representatives.”
“MORE >>On behalf of loners and miserable bastards everywhere, welcome to our esteemed club, Brad PittIn the November issue of British GQ, the A-lister opened up about his semi-charmed kind of life.”
“The actor who s been shying away from the limelight in past years admitted that he s been slowing down for a while and transitioning to other things I do want to spend more time with my kids before they...”
“...re grown up and gone he explained...”
“But maybe you’re taking this whole “slowing down” thing a bit too far if George Clooney calls you “unreachable.” Come on Brad, you can’t play George Clooney like that!”
“Just send the man a text or a Snapchat every now and then!”
“When asked to comment on his friend’s description, Brad Pitt answered, “Well, you know, George is extremely accessible.”
“He’s funny as shit.”
““I’ve always believed happiness is overrated, you know?” Pitt continued.”


"It's those tough times that tell us the next good time. It's a series of choices, a series of events, a series of wins and losses."
"He is one of our best representatives."
"More > > on behalf of loners and poor bastards from all over the world, welcome to our respected club, Brad Pitt. In the November issue of British GQ magazine, the first-line star tells about his half infatuated life."
"The actor, who has shunned the spotlight for the past few years, admits that he has slowed down for a while and moved on to other things, and I really want to be with my children "Spend more time with them before."
“… We grew up and left, he explained
But if George Clooney says you are "inaccessible", maybe you take the whole "slow down" thing too far. Come on, Brad, you can't play George Clooney like that
"Just text him or chat from time to time!"
Asked to comment on his friend's description, Brad Pitt replied, "well, you know, George is very accessible."
"He's funny."
"I always thought happiness was overestimated, you know? "Peter went on."



Number  237
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sorry for anyone who feels disappointed or betrayed, it’s not in my heart [or] anything, and have a blessed day.””
“...for cancelling his upcoming shows Bieber said I love you guys I think you guys are awesome...”
“Whether he s looking at teaming up with them in something of a more permanent situation or doing some sort of religious activity on his own starting his own church we re not quite sure but that s the word from an inside source Apologising to his fans via TMZ”
“[He’s] very close to a lot of the Hillsong people.”
““We know that he was in the country a few weeks ago having meetings and attending the big Hillsong convention that they had here.”
“...at the annual Hillsong Church Conference in Sydney...”
“Advertisement I am led to believe that the real reason he has come off the road is because he wants to reconnect with his faith and he may be even planning to start his own church celebrity journalist Richard Wilkins told Today Extra after speaking to sources close to him...”
“Now, sources claim that Bieber may be turning his attention to ‘reconnecting with his faith’ and starting up his own church.”
“Last night saw Bieber cancel his world ‘Purpose’ tour, months before it was due to end – citing claiming to be ‘burned out’ and exhausted from the months on the road.”
“Following the cancellation of his tour, rumour has now spread that Justin Bieber may be planning to start up his own church.”


"I'm sorry for anyone who feels disappointed or betrayed. It's not in my heart (or anything). I wish you a happy day."
“…… Because of the cancellation of his upcoming program, Bieber said, "I love you. I think you're wonderful..."
"Whether he wants to cooperate with them in a more lasting situation, or do some religious activities and build his own church, we are not sure, but this is from an internal source. We apologize to his fans through TMZ."
"(he) is very close to a lot of folk singers."
"We know that he had a meeting in the countryside a few weeks ago to attend their folk song meeting here."
“… At the annual meeting of hillsson Church in Sydney... "
"The advertisement made me believe that the real reason why he left this road was because he wanted to regain his faith. He might even plan to set up his own church. Richard Wilkins, a celebrity journalist, told today special after talking to the people around him."
"Now, there is news that Bieber may turn his attention to" reconnecting his faith "and building his own church."
"Last night, Bieber cancelled his world 'goal' tour, which will be over in a few months - because he claimed that he was' exhausted 'and that his journey for a few months had exhausted him."
"After the cancellation of Justin Bieber's tour, there are now rumors that he may be planning to start his own church."



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lambert then flies solo to the 2017 Taste of Country Music Festival.”
“The crowd joins in, and it's magical:June 6-7, 2017 — Lambert and East make two appearances together at the 2017 CMA Music Festival, including her MuttNation March and the CMT Awards.”
“Jan. 1, 2016 — After weeks of speculation, the couple go public with a New Year's Day photo of them cuddling together on a couch and the caption: "The snuggle is real."”
“I said, ‘Are you going to break up with me?’ He said, ‘I think I’ll wait 60 years.’ So, sweet."”
“He tried to smooth it over with me.”
“"And I was pissed, ’cause that’s also how it goes.”
“"It was all lovey-dovey and then we got in a fight, ’cause that’s how it goes," she says.”
“During a taping for PBS' Front and Center Lambert would later reveal that the song was actually inspired by an early argument.”
“She references the song "Pushin' Time," a song she would later confirm she wrote about East.”
“That's 54 days after her divorce from Shelton.”


"Then Lambert flew alone to the 2017 country music festival."
"The crowd joined in, and it's amazing: June 6-7, 2017 - Lambert and Dongfang made two appearances at the 2017 CMA Music Festival, including her mutton parade and the CMT award."
"January 1, 2016 - after weeks of speculation, the couple released a new year's day photo of them cuddling together on the sofa, with the title:" cuddling is real. "
"I said," are you going to break up with me? "He said," I think I'll wait 60 years. " So, honey
"He wants to make up with me."
"I'm angry because it's the same thing."
"It was all lovely pigeons, and then we had a fight because of what was going on," she said
"In the first half of the PBS recording, Lambert later revealed that the song was actually inspired by the early debate."
"She quoted the song the age of pushin, a song she later confirmed she wrote about the East."
"That was 54 days after her divorce from Sheldon."



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tip-off is right around the corner, and she's apparently persona non-grata at the games.”
“...earth nice guy...”
“No one knows exactly when the relationship started, but it seems that Kendall and Blake started hooking up sometime over the summer.”
“Which means Kendall won't get to make her big courtside debut at the Staples Center until the start of the 2017-18 NBA season.”
“It would be a big moment for the 21-year-old model, as even a regular season game would mean more eyes on her than any fashion show or episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“Unfortunately for Kendall, it seems the Clippers front office is trying to stop her from shining.”
“Sources tell Radar Online that Griffin has been strongly encouraged to not invite Kendall to any home games, as his bosses fear she would serve as a distraction.”
“Griffin's coaches have reportedly “warned that his new relationship with Kendall better not affect his form this season."”
““He’s not telling anyone yet whether they’re actually together, but Clippers bosses have told him that regardless, she’s not welcome to crash their locker room and distract everyone with the Kardashian circus,” says one insider.”
“They saw what happened to former Clipper Lamar Odom when he was with Khloe Kardashian and they are not having that from their marquee player The source adds that Griffin s management team is concerned that a public relationship with Kendall might affect Blake s image as a down to...”


"The report is just around the corner. She's obviously not popular at the Olympics."
“… Good people on earth... "
"No one knows exactly when the relationship started, but Kendall and Blake seem to have started dating sometime in the summer."
"It means Kendall won't make her debut at Staples Center until the beginning of the 2017-18 NBA season."
"It's going to be an important moment for the 21-year-old model, because even in a regular season, more attention will be paid to her than to any fashion show or episode of" keep up with Kardashian. "
"Unfortunately for Kendall, the clipper lobby seems to be trying to stop her from shining."
"A source told radar online that Griffin was strongly encouraged not to invite Kendall to any home games because his boss was worried that she would be distracted."
According to reports, Griffin's coach "warned him that the new relationship with Kendall had better not affect his form this season."
"He hasn't told anyone whether they're really together, but the Clippers boss told him that anyway, she doesn't welcome crashing into their dressing rooms and distracting people with the Kardashian circus," an insider said
"They saw what happened when former clippers Odom and Kardashian were together, but they didn't see what happened to their main players. The source added that Griffin's management team is concerned that the public relations relationship with Kendall may affect Blake's image as a man to the core.... "



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After a paternity test, the case is thrown out.”
“It was just pancakes!”Bieber, too, stays mum on the subject, telling MTV that she’s “an amazing person,” but, “I think that people are always gonna be interested in my personal life .”
“And so began the long, complicated, and endless saga of “Jelena,” which, in its latest of many twists, has the on-again, off-again couple once again hitting the “off“ switch.”
“How did we get here, exactly?”
“You’re forgiven for not knowing.”
“After all, IHOP was centuries ago, or at least 2010, when Barack Obama was a first-term president and America watched American Idol and Survivor.”
“Here’s a comprehensive guide to their on-and-off, up-and-down, are-they-or-aren’t-they relationship.”
“December 2010—The Infamous IHOP DateTMZ breaks the news that the teen idols enjoyed a “cuddly” date at an IHOP in Philadelphia ahead of a Q102’s Jingle Ball.”
“Gomez tells Us Weekly that it was platonic, and that Bieber is “one of my best friends .”
“.”


"After paternity testing, the case was rejected."
"Just pancakes! "Bieber, too, remained silent on this issue, telling MTV that she was a" great person, "but" I think people will always be interested in my personal life. "
So "Jennie" began a long, complex, endless legend, in the recent twists and turns, the couple again pressed the "off" switch
"How on earth did we get here?"
"You can be forgiven for not knowing."
"After all, IHop was centuries ago, at least in 2010, when Barack Obama was the first president, and the United States watched American Idol and survivor
"Here's a comprehensive guide to their relationship, whether it's them or not."
"In December 2010, the infamous IHop datetmz revealed that teenage idols enjoyed a" hug "date at IHop in Philadelphia, followed by a Q102 jingle ball."
Gomez tells us that this is platonic, and Bieber is "one of my best friends."
“.”



Number  241
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even for the Kardashians!”
“Both Khloe Kardashian, 34 and Kylie Jenner, 20 are expecting their first babies with their beaus, Tristan Thompson, 26 and Travis Scott, 25 respectively.”
“Is this Kris Jenner's extremely well-crafted revival strategy?”
“As reported by Star, the ratings of KUWTK were down last season.”
“"Kris knew having three daughters simultaneously expecting would bring drama, tears, attention, competition — everything she's trying to sustain for the sake of bigger paydays," an insider reported Star magazine.”
“Or are the claims just baseless rumours?”
“Could this really be just a really smart, orchestrated move?”
“And get this – they all are due around the same time next year!”
“Kim, on the other hand, is expecting her third baby via surrogate.”
“Not to mention, the most bizarre, wildest one too!”


"Even the kardashians!"
"Chloe Kardashian, 34, and Kelly Jenner, 20, are both pregnant with their first children. Their boyfriends are Tristan Thompson, 26, and Travis Scott, 25
"Is this Chris Jenner's elaborate Renaissance strategy?"
"Kuyt's ratings dropped last season, according to the star
"Chris knows that having three daughters at the same time brings drama, tears, attention and competition - everything she's been trying to maintain for a higher salary," a person familiar with the matter told Star Magazine
"Or are these claims just groundless rumors?"
"Is this really a very clever and well planned move?"
"And this - they will all expire at the same time next year!"
"Kim, on the other hand, is having a third child through surrogacy."
"Not to mention the strangest and wildest one!"



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel below!”
“Kim feels like Kanye has enough stress in his life and managing her sister’s ex is something Kanye doesn’t need in his life,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Kylie Jenner, 19, and Tyga‘s breakup is causing a major rift in the family.”
“Scott Disick is “Team Tyga” all the way and doesn’t want to stop being friends with him.”
“In fact, he wants to make sure Kanye West, 39, keeps Tyga, 27, on his record label so the rapper can sustain a good income.”
“However, Kim Kardashian is “Team Kylie” and pressuring her husband to drop Tyga fast.”
““Kim is pressuring her husband to move on from Tyga.”
“Kim always had questions about Kylie’s relationship with Tyga and wishes Kanye would follow Kylie’s lead and separate ties with the struggling rapper.”
“Obviously, Kanye is the head of his record label so the final decision rests with him, but if we were Tyga, we’d be worried.”
“Should Kanye West drop Tyga from his record label?”


"Tell us how you feel!"
A source told reporters: "Kim thinks Kanye's life is stressful enough. Managing his sister's ex girlfriend is not necessary in Kanye's life." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"The breakup of 19-year-old Kelly Jenner and tiga caused a major rift in the family."
"Scott Disick has always been a" TEGA team "and doesn't want to stop making friends with him."
"In fact, he wants to make sure that Kanye West, 39, keeps tyga, 27, on his record company so that rappers can maintain a good income."
However, Kim Kardashian is part of the "Kelly team" and is pressing her husband to put down TEGA as soon as possible
"Kim is pressing her husband to leave TEGA."
"Kim has been questioning Kelly's relationship with TEGA. He hopes Kanye can follow Kelly's steps and separate from the struggling rapper."
"Obviously, Kanye is in charge of his record company, so the final decision is up to him, but if we are TEGA, we will be worried."
"Should Kanye West remove TEGA from the record company?"



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“An "insider" allegedly told IB Times, "The past few years, Ryan's been working out of town while Blake stays home with the kids.”
“The distance between them has taken its toll."”
“The gossip site tweeted, "Ryan Reynolds and wife Blake Lively struggling to spend 'quality time'" together.”
“And Reynolds' response to this report?”
“"I wish.”
“I could use a little 'me time'."”
“As per usual, Reynolds is ready to tease his wife on social media, which suggests that their marriage is more than fine.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
An "insider" is said to have told the IB times that "for the past few years, Ryan has been working outside, while black has been at home with his children."
"The distance between them caused the loss."
"Ryan Reynolds and his wife, Blake Lively, are trying to spend 'quality time' together," the gossip website tweeted
"What about Reynolds' reaction to the report?"
"I hope so."
"I need a little bit of ego time."
"As usual, Reynolds is going to make fun of his wife on social media, which shows that their marriage is very good."
"This content was imported from twitter."



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In March 2017, a source confirmed to PEOPLE that the superstars were an item, (though Lopez recently confirmed they started dating Feb. 3) and the couple’s romance hasn’t slowed down since.”
““#Besos #myoneandonly #myvalentine❤ #lovemymacho” were all added as hashtags, as was “#13,” which is a callout to when Rodriguez wore number 13 when he played for the New York Yankees.”
““Hope everyone got lots of sweet Valentine’s Day ,” Lopez wrote in the caption to the video.”
“Lopez shared a cute video sending her love kisses, while her baseball boyfriend obliged, leaned over and kissed his Valentine.”
“Both Lopez and Rodriguez shared sweet posts on Instagram wishing each other a Happy Valentine’s Day.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Jennifer Lopez & Alex Rodriguez Reveal The Hilarious Story Behind Their First Date!”
“After their shopping spree, J-Rod celebrated the holiday later that evening with a romantic dinner at Brasserie Central in Miami.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: MEGALooking for more style content?”
“The singer wore a nude bodycon turtleneck Naked Wardrobe dress, pumps and gold hoops and the former Yankee sported a gray suit and black tie.”


"In March 2017, a source confirmed that the superstars were a project (although Lopez recently confirmed that they started dating on February 3), and the couple's relationship has not slowed since."
"My Valentine's Day" ❤  #"Love my macho" and "13" have been added as labels, which is a hint of Rodriguez's No. 13 shirt when playing for the New York Yankees
"I hope everyone has a sweet Valentine's day," Lopez wrote in the title of the video
"Lopez shared a lovely video and gave her a kiss of love, while her baseball boyfriend agreed and leaned over to kiss him on Valentine's day."
"Both Lopez and Rodriguez shared sweet posts on instagram to wish each other a happy Valentine's day."
Related video: Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez reveal the funny story behind their first date
After their shopping spree, j-rod celebrated the festival with a romantic dinner in Miami's Brasserie central
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Image zooming: megalooking for more style content?"
The singer is wearing a nude tight turtleneck, a nude wardrobe skirt, high heels and gold hoops. The former Yankees player is wearing a gray suit and a black tie



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“What would you do in this situation?”
“This is way bigger than choosing locations for dinner and a movie on our fifth date.”
“Or, does she walk away because this complicates a very new relationship?”
“But should Khloé accept this as baggage and continue to pursue the man she’s really digging?”
“SplashWe don’t really know how or why Tristan and Jordan broke up, but it happens, right?”
“How is Khloe cool with all of this?”
“So, now the internet is abuzz with questions about the situation: Did Tristan leave a pregnant Jordan for Khloe?”
“They reportedly met at Kevin Hart’s wedding this August when Tristan showed up with his pregnant girlfriend, Jordan Craig.”
“For the past few weeks Khloe and her new man, Tristan, have been boo-lovin’ all over Snapchat but this was his first appearance on her Instagram.”


"Please let us know in the comments below."
"What would you do in this situation?"
"It's more important than where we choose to eat and watch movies on our fifth date."
"Or did she leave because it complicated a new relationship?"
"But should heloe accept this as a burden and continue to pursue the man she really digs for?"
"We really don't know how and why Tristan and Jordan broke up, but it's true, right?"
"How cool is Khloe to all this?"
"So now the Internet is full of questions about this: did Tristan leave a pregnant Jordan for Khloe?"
According to reports, they met at Kevin Hart's wedding in August when Tristan and his pregnant girlfriend Jordan Craig showed up
"In the past few weeks, Khloe and her new boyfriend Tristan have been keen on snapchat, but this is the first time he has appeared on her instagram."



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just avoided them in the lunch room.”The Lost City of Z hits theaters Friday, April 14.”
“When we started shooting the explorations, the others wanted to stay in my hotel, but I couldn’t break the [silent] spell.”
““I was so engaged in this process of no emails, no phone — I didn’t speak to the rest of the outside world during the duration of the shooting.”
“They found this tiny hotel for me that was basically like little huts in the jungle where I could be by myself,” he recalled to Screen Daily.”
““I wanted to be away from everybody, in a scaled back version of living as much as possible.”
“2009 book which tells the story of 1920s explorers who lose their way in the jungles of Brazil on location in the Amazon...”
“He s reached out to me subsequently making overtures for us to be friends now Hunnam added so I think it was about the work Hunnam was also intent on getting into character as he and the rest of the cast shot The Lost City of Z based on the...”
““There was a real distance between us.”Since the movie wrapped last year, the hunky blond told Screen Daily that Pattinson has made a few attempts to connect.”
““I didn’t know if he was just ‘in that zone’ or if he genuinely didn’t like me,” Hunnam continued.”
“I don’t think I said more than ten words to Robert off camera.”According to Hunnam, he wasn’t certain if Pattinson was simply focused on his role — he plays fictional British corporal Henry Costin in the film — or if he just didn’t care to forge a friendship.”


On Friday, April 14, "Lost City Z" was shown
"When we started shooting adventure, other people wanted to stay in my hotel, but I couldn't break the (silent) curse."
"I'm too focused on this process without email, without phone - I didn't talk to the outside world during the filming."
"They found this little hotel for me, which was basically like a cabin in the jungle where I could stay alone," he recalled
"I want to stay away from everyone and live as small a life as possible."
"A book in 2009 tells the story of an explorer who lost his way in the Amazon jungle in the 1920s..."
"He later contacted me and offered to make friends with us. Now, Hennan added, so I think it's about Hennan's intention to enter the role, because he and other actors shot" Lost City Z "based on..."
"There's really a distance between us." Since the end of last year's film, the blonde told screen daily that Pattinson had tried some contact information
"I don't know if he's in that area or if he really doesn't like me," Hennan continued
"I don't think I can say more than ten words to Robert on camera." According to Hennan, he's not sure if Pattinson is just focusing on his role - he plays fictional British corporal Henry COSTIN in the film - or he just doesn't want to build a friendship



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The new reboot/sequel, which stars Dwayne Johnson Jack Black and […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“This is the case with the upcoming follow-up to Robin Williams ’ classic ’90s adventure movie, Jumanji .”
“Making a good sequel to a beloved movie is hard to pull off, but it’s even harder to get right when the original film’s late star isn’t in it.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"By Dwayne Johnson Jack Black and ]New restart / sequel IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what the upcoming sequel to Robin Williams' classic adventure movie 'Jumanji' of the 1990s is like."
"It's hard to make a good sequel to a popular movie, but it's even harder to make a good sequel if the late star in the original is not in the sequel."



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The show was picked up by Apple with a straight-to-series, two-season order for 20 episodes total.”
“If you don’t know, Jennifer and Reese are co-starring in a new show about two morning show hosts!”
“Rumors have been swirling that the event last night was actually Gwyneth and Brad‘s rehearsal dinner or engagement dinner!”
“Also seen arriving to the event were Reese Witherspoon with husband Jim Toth, Chelsea Handler, Rashida Jones, Rob Lowe with with Sheryl Berkoff, director Jon Favreau, Lake Bell with husband Scott Campbell, actor Chris O’Donnell, jewelry designer Jennifer Meyer, and more.”
“Jennifer Aniston wears what appears to be a wrist brace to Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad Falchuk‘s black tie event on Saturday (April 14) in Los Angeles.”


"This TV series is directly taken over by apple, with 20 episodes in two seasons."
"If you don't know, Jennifer and Reese will co star in a new play about two morning presenters!"
"Rumor has it that last night's event was actually Gwyneth and Brad's rehearsal dinner or engagement dinner!"
Also present at the event were Reese Witherspoon and her husband Jim Toth, Chelsea Handler, rashda Jones, rob law and Cheryl Burke, director Jon Farrow, Lake bell and her husband Scott Campbell, actor Chris O'Donnell, jewelry designer Jennifer Meyer, etc
"On Saturday (April 14) in Los Angeles, Jennifer Aniston appeared to be wearing wristbands for Gwyneth Paltrow and Brad falchuk's black tie event."



Number  249
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the trailer below:Photo credit: Denis Makarenko / Featureflash / Shutterstock.com...”
“Watch the ‘No Escape’ Trailer Now“No Escape” hits theaters tonight.”
“The film follows an American family that moves overseas and finds themselves caught in a coup.”
“The No Escape movie is written and directed by John Erick Dowdle who is best known for horror films like Quarantine As Above So Below and Devil The film has thus far received mixed reviews with some critics saying Wilson is an odd fit for the lead role and Brosnan...”
“...has little opportunity to show off his acting chops...”
“Nevertheless, the two actors are box office superstars.”
“Learn more about the movie and see how much Wilson and Brosnan are worth.”
“Read Regression Movie Stars Emma Watson Net Worth Ethan Hawke Net Worth and More About the No Escape Movie In No Escape Owen Wilson plays Jack Dwyer an American businessman thrown into an action hero role when a coup breaks out in a fictional foreign country where he and his...”
“...family live...”
“When the political uprising starts, the family soon find themselves targeted by insurgents.”


"Look at the trailer below: image source: Denis Makarenko / close up flash/ Shutterstock.com Website
"Now let's see the trailer no place to run. No place to run is on tonight."
"It's about an American family who emigrates and finds themselves in a coup."
"No place to run" is directed by John Eric Doyle. His most famous horror films are "segregation" and "devil". So far, the reviews of this film are mixed. Some critics say Wilson is very suitable for starring, while Brosnan... "
“… There's almost no chance to show off his acting. "
"But both actors are box office stars."
"Learn more about the film and see how much Wilson and Brosnan are worth."
"Read" return "movie star Emma Watson net worth Ethan hawk net worth and more about" nowhere to run "movie Owen Wilson plays Jack Dwyer, an American businessman who, when there is a fictional foreign coup, and his friends
“… Family life... "
"When the political uprising began, the family soon found themselves targeted by the rebels."



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shelton has been on every season of the reality singing competition since its inception.”
“The Voice Season 13 starts Sept. 25.”
“Advisors for Season 12 included country star Luke Bryan, DJ Khaled, Celine Dion and John Legend.”
“Opposite Billy Ray, Levine's advisor will be Joe Jonas, Shelton has Rascal Flatts, and Hudson will team with Kelly Rowland.”
“The Most Successful Country Singers From The VoiceCyrus will be joined once again by fellow judges Adam Levine and Blake Shelton, while Jennifer Hudson will be making her first appearance on the American version of The Voice.”
“He also still stars in CMT's original series "Still the King."”
“Billy Ray, best known for his '90s country smash "Achy Breaky Heart," released a 25th anniversary version of the iconic song in 2017, complete with a new Spanish version, Spanglish dance version and Bootsy Collins EDM version.”
“Miley revealed the news via Instagram in a post littered with #TeamMiley and #TeamDad hashtags, obviously proud to bring the family flag bearer into the mix.”
“Pop superstar Miley Cyrus has invited her father, country artist Billy Ray Cyrus, to be her team advisor for the upcoming Season 13.”
“One Cyrus is not enough for NBC's The Voice.”


"Since the reality show singing competition, Sheldon has participated in it every season."
"Voice season 13 starts on September 25."
"Season 12 advisors include country stars Luke Bryan, DJ Khalid, Celine Dion and John Legend."
"In contrast to Billy Ray, Levin's advisor will be Joe Jonas, Sheldon has rascal fratz, and Hudson will partner with Kelly Rowland."
"The most successful country singer from voicecyrus will be reunited with judges Adam Levin and black Sheldon, and Jennifer Hudson will make her debut in the US version of voice."
"He also appeared in CMT's original series still the king."
"Billy Ray is famous for the country music" broken heart "of the 1990s. He released the 25th anniversary version of this iconic song in 2017, including the new Spanish version, Spanish dance version and bootsy Collins EDM version."
"Miley posted this message through instagram. The posts are full of labels like 'team Miley' and 'team dad'. Obviously, Miley is very proud to bring this family standard bearer into this group."
Pop star Millie Cyrus has invited her father, country artist Billy Ray Cyrus, to be a team consultant for the upcoming season 13
"One Cyrus is not enough for NBC."



Number  251
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Perhaps we had fair warning: last year, Us Weekly reported that Holmes was tired of “playing the hiding game.” And what better way to combat breakup rumors than to stop hiding altogether?”
“People are overhearing FaceTime conversations and spotting Foxx and Holmes out during their nighttime adventures.”
“Now, it seems that the high-security walls of this relationship keep tumbling down.”
“They reportedly hid out in a luxury resort to celebrate at least Holmes’s 38th birthday, and Holmes “put on a wig and hat” to meet Foxx.”
“As Vanity Fair pointed out last year, Holmes and Foxx went to F.B.I.-level lengths to avoid tabloid attention.”
“This is a pairing that has managed to stay below the surface since they got together in 2013; though there is a timeline of their relationship, there are big gaps here where no one knows anything.”
“The fact that we know this, and that we know Holmes is in Paris with Suri for fashion shows, is kind of monumental.”
“Foxx has, indeed, been in Miami; he was seen at mega-club E11EVEN on Sunday.”
“...plane...”
“Apparently a jet setting source told Page Six that Holmes and Foxx were FaceTiming on the plane as Holmes and Suri Cruise departed for Paris She said she loves him and asked if he wanted cookies from Paris He was in Miami Suri s nanny was reportedly also on the...”


Maybe we got a reasonable warning: last year, American Weekly reported that Holmes was tired of "playing hide and seek". What better way to deal with break-up rumors than to stop playing hide and seek altogether? "
"People overheard the conversation at FaceTime and found Fox and Holmes taking risks at night."
"Now it seems that the high security wall of this relationship is collapsing."
According to reports, they hid in a luxury resort to celebrate at least Holmes' 38th birthday. Holmes "put on his wig and hat" to see fox
"As vanity fair pointed out last year, Holmes and fox chose the length of the F.B.I. level in order to avoid tabloid attention."
"This is a couple who have kept a low profile since they got together in 2013; although there is a timetable for their relationship, there is a big gap and no one knows anything."
"In fact, we know that, we know that Holmes is in Paris with Suri fashion show, is an immortal."
Fox did go to Miami, and he was even seen in a big club on Sunday
“… Aircraft... "
"Obviously, a news source on the plane told page 6 that Holmes and fox were joking on the plane because Holmes and Surrey cruise were going to Paris. She said she loved him and asked him if he wanted biscuits from Paris. He was in Miami and Surrey's nanny was said to be on the plane too..."



Number  252
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she and George will end up having another kid?”
““I already had them quite late.”Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do YOU think Amal is pregnant again?”
“Apparently Amal’s showing pregnancy signs, & it may even be twins again!”
“A third child already?”
“George, 56, and Amal Clooney‘s, 39, friends reportedly believe the star couple are expecting once again, according to Life & Style magazine.”
“And although Amal gave birth to baby twins Ella and Alexander back in June, the two would reportedly be “thrilled” if they were to expand their family once again.”
““[Amal] has the same symptoms she had when she learned she was pregnant the first time,” an alleged close friend told the magazine.”
““She’s eating like crazy and is more emotional than normal.” Click here to see pics of Amal’s stunning maternity style.”
“Her friends apparently believe the human rights lawyer is still in the very early stages of pregnancy, but even weeks from now, there may still be no sign of a bump.”
““During her first pregnancy, Amal barely showed for the first several months, and was active and working right up until a few weeks before the birth,” the source said.”


"Do you think she and George will eventually have another child?"
"I've been eating late." Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you think Amar is pregnant again? "
"Obviously, Amar has signs of pregnancy, maybe even twins!"
"A third child already?"
Friends of George, 56, and Amar Clooney, 39, said the celebrity couple had new expectations, lifestyle magazine reported
"Although Amar gave birth to twins Ella and Alexander as early as June this year, it is reported that if they expand their family size again, they will feel" excited. "
"(Amar) has the same symptoms as when she was pregnant for the first time," a so-called close friend told the magazine
"She's eating like she's crazy, and she's more emotional than normal people." Click here to see Amar's amazing maternal style photos
"Her friends clearly believe that the human rights lawyer is still in the early stages of pregnancy, but even after a few weeks, there may still be no sign of any uplift."
"When she was pregnant for the first time, Amar barely showed up for the first few months and remained active until a few weeks before delivery," the source said



Number  253
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That put thousands of miles between the two, causing them to grow “completely apart,” said the source.”
“At this point in the custody and divorce proceedings, Brad reportedly is worried about Angelina’s reaction.”
“Angelina Jolie filed for divorce from Brad Pitt in 2016, but the divorce proceedings still have not been finalized.”
“Consequently, when Jennifer Aniston became single again after separating from Justin Theroux, Jolie reportedly had a shocking influence on Brad’s feelings for Jennifer.”
“As a result, Aniston has turned to her ex-boyfriend, Scottish actor Gerard Butler, an insider told the Express.”
“Gerard Butler Comes Through For Jennifer AnistonButler and Aniston reportedly stayed close after they dated for about a year.”
“Jennifer and Gerard worked together on the 2010 film The Bounty Hunter.”
“Although Gerard and Jennifer have been talking to each other constantly, don’t look for Aniston to “rush headlong into a new romance right away,” a friend of Aniston told the Express.”
“However, Jennifer appreciates Butler’s return to her life at this time of heartbreak, according to the pal.”
““[Jennifer Aniston is] really touched Gerard is doing everything he can to console her.”


"This separated the two by thousands of miles, causing them to" completely separate, "the source said
"Brad is reported to be worried about Angelina's reaction at this point in custody and divorce proceedings."
"Angelina Jolie filed for divorce with Brad Pitt in 2016, but the divorce process has yet to be finalized."
"So when Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru split up and were single again, Julie is said to have a shocking impact on Brad's relationship with Jennifer."
"As a result, Aniston turned to her ex boyfriend, Scottish actor Gerald Butler," a person familiar with the matter told the express
"Gerard Butler through Jennifer Aniston Butler and Aniston are said to keep close after they date for about a year."
"Jennifer and Gerald worked together in the 2010 film bounty hunter."
A friend of Aniston told the express: "although Gerald and Jennifer have been talking to each other, don't expect Aniston to" rush into a new relationship right away. "
"However, according to this friend, Jennifer is grateful to Butler for coming back to her life at this sad time."
"(Jennifer Aniston) it's really moving. Gerrard is doing everything he can to comfort her."



Number  254
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Eagle-eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping that they could “maybe start over again …but this time it means forever.” Sadly for these fans, the only way they can see Bella and Edward back together is in the pages of Stephenie Meyer’s books.”
“...where they can be friendly when they see each other in public...”
“Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson reunited and got ‘Twilight’ fans buzzing, but we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned if these two exes are getting back together or not.”
“For one moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan was once again a couple and all was right in the world for Twilight fans.”
“Ex-lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily-Rose Depp’s 19th birthday party on June 1.”
“However, don’t expect their love to rise from the grave.”
““There’s no chance of any kind of romantic reconciliation for Rob and Kristen,” a source close to Rob EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““That ship has well and truly sailed, and way too much has passed between them to ever reunite in that way.”
“Plus Kristen is really happy with Stella Maxwell they have an amazing relationship While there s no chance that RPatz and KStew will date again it s not all bad as the source tells HollywoodLife com that Rob thinks it s great that they ve finally got to a place...”
“Rob would love to see more of Kristen he still cares for her deep down and probably always will she was his first real love As for Kristen she feels a little awkward when she sees Rob because she still carries a lot of guilt from how their romance ended...”


Sharp eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping they could "start over But this time it means forever. " Sadly, for these fans, the only way to see Bella and Edward reunite is on Stephanie Meyer's page
“… They will be very friendly when they meet in public... "
"Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson are reunited and fans are cheering for twilight, but we've got exclusive information on whether the two ex girlfriends will get back together."
"For a moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan became a couple again, and for Twilight fans, everything was fine in the world."
On June 1, former lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily Rose Depp's 19th birthday party
"But don't expect their love to come back from the grave."
"For Rob and Christine, there is no possibility of any kind of romantic reconciliation," a source close to rob told Hollywood life
"The ship really sailed well. There was so much traffic between them that they could never reunite like this again."
"Plus Christine is really happy to have an amazing relationship with Stella Maxwell, and without the opportunity, rpatz and kstew will date again, which is not all bad news. The source told Hollywood website that rob thought it was great that they finally got to a place..."
"Rob wants to see more Christine. He still cares about her. Maybe she will always be his first love. As for Christine, when she sees rob, she feels a little embarrassed, because she is still full of guilt about their romantic ending..."



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Additional reporting from Associated Press.”
“The royal family is choosing not to lay low or retreat in the wake of the ISIS threat, a source close to the family told TMZ.”
“As expected, there'll be a "bigger security presence than usual," according to the site.”
“According to TMZ, Prince George's next appearance will be at Trooping the Colour on Sunday with the rest of the royal family at Buckingham Palace.”
“He was more recently spotted with his mother and sister, Princess Charlotte, for an outing in Norfolk, England, last week.”
“Getty ImagesPrince George—the eldest child of Prince William and Kate Middleton, and third in line for the throne—was recently seen at Prince Harry and Meghan Markle's royal wedding on May 19, where he served as a page boy.”
“Last week, after previously saying he did nothing wrong, Rashid admitted to a number of terror offenses, including encouraging terrorism, according to CNN.”
“The Guardian reports that one of Rashid's posts included a photo of George, his school, and the message, "Even the royal family will not be left alone."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"A supplementary report from the associated press."
A source close to the royal family told TMZ: "under the threat of the Islamic state, the royal family chose not to keep a low profile or withdraw."
"As expected, there will be a" greater security presence than usual, "the website said
"According to TMZ, Prince George's next appearance will be at a rehearsal with other members of the royal family at Buckingham Palace on Sunday."
Recently, it was found that he was on an outing in Norfolk with his mother and sister, Princess Charlotte, last week
"Prince William and Kate Middleton's eldest son, George, the third in line to the throne, recently appeared as a valet at the royal wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel on May 19."
"Last week, Rasheed admitted some terrorist crimes, including encouraging terrorism, after saying he had done nothing wrong," CNN reported
The Guardian reported that a blog post by Rashid included a picture of George, his school and a message that "even the royal family will not be alone."



Number  256
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!”
“Could she seriously be pregnant?”
“Not to mention, the new report claims they could have a baby girl on the way, and it’s a ‘dream come true’ for Gwen!”
“Get all of the insane alleged details on their upcoming plans!”
“Blake Shelton, 40, and Gwen Stefani, 47, apparently have two huge reasons to celebrate!”
“Gwen has allegedly been planning their epic Christmas nuptials in Blake’s home state of Oklahoma, according to Life & Style.”
“On top of that, the magazine claims they’ve been “trying” to conceive, and alleged friends “believe she could already be pregnant.” WHAT!”
“Gwen has been longing for a baby girl because she’s felt “outnumbered” for years, according to Life & Style.”
“She has three sons — Kingston, 10, Zuma, 8, and Apollo Rossdale, 2 — with her ex husband, Gavin Rossdale, 48.”
“Insiders close to Gwen reportedly pointed out that she is consuming “a lot of carbs” right now; Something she reportedly never does unless she is expecting.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Is she really pregnant?"
"Not to mention, the new report claims that they can have a baby girl on the road, which is a" dream come true "for Gwen
"Get all the crazy details about their future plans!"
"Blake Shelton, 40, and Gwen Stefani, 47, clearly have two reasons to celebrate!"
Gwen has been planning a big Christmas Wedding in black's hometown of Oklahoma, according to life and fashion
Most importantly, the magazine claimed that they had been "trying" to conceive and that friends "believed she might be pregnant." What
Gwen is eager to have a baby girl because she has felt "outnumbered" for years, according to life and fashion magazine
"She has three sons - 10-year-old Kingston, 8-year-old Zuma, 2-year-old Apollo rosdale, and 48 year old ex husband Gavin rosdale."
Insiders close to Gwen are reported to have pointed out that she is now consuming "a lot of carbohydrates"; she has never been reported to do so unless she was expecting it



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drew divorced her third and latest husband Will Kopelman in 2016, having previously been married to producer Jeremy Thomas and comedian Tom Green.”
“Timothy has been married since 1991 to Alexis Knief, with whom he shares three teenage children - daughters Grace and Vivian and son Henry.”
“Ted and was a writer on Mad About You...”
“Working together Their Netflix show is a dark comedy in which Drew s character struggles to control her flesh eating urges with the help of her husband whom Timothy plays Santa Clarita Diet sprang from the mind of Victor Fresco who also created the short lived ABC sitcom Better Off...”
“Canberra-born Liv Hewson, 22, features as Abby, the daughter of Drew and Timothy's respective characters Sheila and Joel Hammond.”
“Their Netflix show is a dark comedy in which Drew's character struggles to control her flesh-eating urges with the help of her husband, whom Timothy plays.”
“...his top button undone clasping on a thick watch...”
“Aglow Drew 43 had a smile on her face and a straw beverage in her hand as she chatted with a couple of people who appeared to be members of the crew The Honolulu born 50 year old s hair was teased up into an elegant do and he left...”
“Meanwhile, the dashing Timothy wore dark brown boots and a stylish set of fitted jeans, rounding off the look with a blue checked shirt.”
“The ET actress zipped herself into a black sweater, rolling the sleeves slightly up her forearms, and she matched the top to a pair of jet black pants.”


"Drew divorced her third and latest husband, will Copperman, in 2016 after marrying producer Jeremy Thomas and comedian Tom Green."
Timothy has been married to Alexis kniff since 1991. He and Alexis kniff have three teenagers - daughter grace, Vivian and son Henry
"Ted is a writer. He's crazy about you..."
"The Netflix show with them is a black comedy, in which drew's character tries to control his appetite for meat with the help of her husband. The diet of Santa Clarita played by Timothy comes from Victor fresco's mind. Victor fresco also creates the short-lived ABC sitcom better life..."
"Liv Hewson, 22, born in Canberra, plays the roles of Abby, drew and Timothy, the daughter of Sheila and Joel Hammond."
"Their Netflix show is a black comedy, and drew's character tries to control his appetite for meat with the help of Timothy's husband."
“… His top button is loose and on a thick watch... "
"With a smile on his face and a straw drink in his hand, aglow drew 43 chatted with some people who looked like crew members. The 50 year old man, who was born in Honolulu, had his hair combed into elegant hair. He left... "
At the same time, the elegant Timothy wears dark brown boots and a pair of fashionable jeans to complement the blue plaid shirt
The ET actress pulled herself into a black sweater, rolled her sleeves slightly over her forearm, and paired her top with a pair of black trousers



Number  258
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A version of this article appeared in November 2017.”
“Indeed, she now has to follow etiquette suitable for a member of the royal family - and is even scrutinised when she places her legs the 'incorrect' way while sitting down.”
“...prince having married Prince Harry in May...”
“But apart from being happy for her, the actress' millions of fans might be a bit disappointed she's now a member of the Royal Family.”
“Why?”
“Because her social feeds got a little bit, well, boring last year - before disappearing altogether.”
“Meghan's Instagram page has now been deleted, but if you visited back in 2017 when the couple got engaged, you wouldn't find any posts from April onwards.”
“However, Meghan's insta used to be filled with pictures of a fun-loving young woman - just like anyone else her age - and gave an intimate glimpse into her world.”
“(Image: Internet Unknown) (Image: Internet Unknown)(Image: Meghan Markle /Instagram)Snaps from holidays, pictures with friends and photos of her dog - along with selfies from her bed where she sits scantily-clad - feature heavily.”
“It's fair to say she wouldn't dream of posting pics of her girls' holiday to Ibiza now she's in Kensington Palace.”


"A version of this article appeared in November 2017."
"In fact, she now has to follow the etiquette that suits the royal family - even when she sits down with her legs in an 'incorrect' position, she is scrutinized."
“… The prince married Prince Harry in May
"But in addition to being happy for her, millions of fans of the actress may be disappointed that she is now a member of the royal family."
"Why?"
"Because her social information got a little bit, um, boring last year - and then disappeared completely."
"Megan's instagram page has now been removed, but if you visited it when they were engaged in 2017, you won't find any posts since April."
"However, Megan's insta was once full of pictures of an interesting young woman - just like anyone at her age - giving an intimate glimpse of her world."
"(photo: unknown on the Internet) (photo: unknown on the Internet) (photo: Meghan Markle / instagram) holiday snapshots, photos with friends and her dog - and her self portrait in a thin bed - are all strong features."
"It can be said that now she is in Kensington Palace, and she would never dream of posting photos of her daughters on holiday to Ibiza."



Number  259
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““She’s definitely put the brakes on things until she’s sure this is the man she wants to spend the rest of her life with.”We pay for juicy info!”
“Sandra’s reps are denying wedding plans, but the insider says, “Sandy must be seeing things in Bryan that love blinded her to before.”
“He also trashed a hotel room during a drunken bender.”
“Bad-boy Bryan was busted for a DUI in 1998 and served four days in jail.”
““All of her friends have been in her ear saying there’s no need to rush — especially given all the skeletons in Bryan’sccloset,” dishes a spy close to the couple.”
“Spies close to Bullock reveal the Oscar winner has gotten cold feet over getting hitched to her 50-year-old photographer boyfriend.”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Sandra Bullock's Wedding Shocker — Plans To Marry Bryan Randall 'On Hold' Find out Sandra's reason for 'cold feet'Sandra Bullock’s marriage to boyfriend Bryan Randall is on hold!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"She'll stop until she's sure that's the man she wants to spend the rest of her life with." We pay for interesting information! "
Sandra's agent denied her wedding plans, but people familiar with the matter said: "Sandy must have seen something in Brian that had been blinded by love before."
"In a drunken carnival, he also made a mess of a hotel room."
"Bad boy Brian was arrested in 1998 for drunk driving and served four days in prison."
"All her friends were in her ears saying there was no need to worry - especially considering all the skeletons in Brian's wardrobe," said a spy close to the couple
"Spies close to Bullock revealed that the Oscar winning actress became indifferent because she married her 50 year old photographer boyfriend."
"Click Share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Sandra Bullock's wedding shock: plan to" postpone "her marriage to Brian Randall to find out why Sandra is" cold feet "Sandra Bullock's marriage to her boyfriend Brian Randall is postponed!"



Number  260
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for the latest news and updates about Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson!”
“Therefore, avid followers of the Twilight stars should take everything with a grain of salt until these speculations are proven true and correct.”
“Kristen Stewart has been linked to several personalities since she broke up with Robert Pattinson in 2013.”
“The former couple rose to fame when they starred in the popular vampire-themed film series called Twilight.”
“Now, rumors have it that the two could possibly get reunited again in a brand new project.”
“An OK!”
“Magazine insider, as cited by Hollywood Life, claimed that Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson have met again after several years since their infamous split.”
“The tipster stated that the former co-stars are planning to work together on a new movie.”
“The same source said the project would be different from the Twilight series, which was based on the novels of Stephenie Meyer.”
““Kristen is more hesitant than Rob right now, but they’ve agreed to discuss it.”


"Stay tuned for the latest news and updates on Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson!"
"Therefore, twilight enthusiasts should have reservations about everything until the speculation turns out to be true and correct."
"Kristen Stewart has been in touch with several celebrities since she broke up with Robert Pattinson in 2013."
"The former couple made a name for themselves by starring in a popular vampire movie series, twilight."
"Now, there are rumors that the two may meet again in a brand new project."
"All right!"
Hollywood Life quoted inside magazine as saying that Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson met again a few years after their infamous breakup
"The informant said that the first two co stars are planning to work together on a new film."
"The same source said the project would be different from the Twilight series, which is based on Stephanie Meyer's novel."
"Christine is more hesitant now than rob, but they have agreed to discuss it."



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews subscribe to our new podcast ‘In Case You Missed Us’ below!”
“The pair costarred together from 1998 to 2006 on That ‘70s Show.”
“'”Kunis and Kutcher tied the knot in 2015 and share two kids — daughter Wyatt, 3, and son Dimitri, 1.”
““He’s always like, ‘Is there really another?”
““My dad is always very hopeful that the pregnancies are true,” the Friends With Benefits star dished.”
““The amount of stress that caused my family, nobody will understand.”As for one person who’s in the cheering section every time there’s speculation of another little Kutcher?”
““At one point when I was pregnant, [the tabloids] said that I had an emergency and was rushed to the hospital, and my face was on the cover,” Kunis said.”
““The only thing that’s upsetting is my parents and my grandparents sometimes get confused,” she noted before reflecting on one tough time in particular.”
“...stories stressful...”
“I know this because I go down the grocery store aisle and I see it on the cover of magazines and I m like Oh boy OK However it s not as easy for those closest to her to know what s going on behind closed doors making some fake...”


"For the latest celebrity news and interviews, please subscribe to our new podcast 'in case you miss us'!"
"The two co starred in that 1970s show from 1998 to 2006."
"Kunis and Kutcher married in 2015 and have two children - Wyatt, a 3-year-old daughter, and Dimitri, a 1-year-old son."
"He always said," is there really anything else? "
"It's true that my dad always had a good chance of getting pregnant," said friends with benefits
"The tremendous pressure on my family, no one will understand." As for every time someone guesses that another little Kutcher will appear in the cheering area? "
"Once when I was pregnant, [the tabloid] said I was in an emergency and was rushed to the hospital with my face on the cover," Kunis said
"The only disturbing thing is that my parents and grandparents sometimes get confused," she noted before recalling a difficult period
“… A stressful story... "
"I know that, because I walked down the aisle of the grocery store and saw it on the cover of the magazine. I thought oh, OK, but for those closest to her, it's not easy to close the door and make fake..."



Number  262
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gwyneth Paltrow Shares Nude Photo From When She Was Pregnant With Apple in Honor of Mother's Day...”
“RELATED CONTENT:Josh Brolin Announces Wife Kathryn Is Pregnant, Expecting First Child TogetherFrancesca Eastwood, Clint Eastwood’s Daughter, Is Pregnant With Her First Child: Pic!”
“ET has reached out to Nielsen's rep regarding these pregnancy pics.”
“Nielsen was also famously married to Sylvester Stallone and was romantically connected to rapper Flava Flav after their appearance on VH1's The Surreal Life.”
“1993 to 2005”
“Julian Winding 34 is the son she shares with Kasper Winding whom she was married to from 1983 to 1984 Killian Marcus Nielsen 28 is her son with Mark Gastineau while sons Douglas Aaron Meyer 25 and Raoul Ayrton Meyer Jr 23 are from her marriage to Raoul Meyer from...”
“On Wednesday, she shared another pic of her cradling her tummy, writing: "Happy time ❤️ positive vibes #happyness #positivevibes"Nielsen has been married to 39-year-old Italian TV producer Mattia Dessì since 2006, and has four other children from previous relationships.”
“"Family getting larger ❤️ #me #family #brigittenielsen #babybump," she captioned the image.”
“The actress - best known for her roles in Beverly Hills Cops II and Red Sonja -- broke the news to her Instagram fans a few days ago by sharing a photo of her growing baby bump.”
“Brigitte Nielsen is 54 and expecting her fifth child.”


"Gwyneth Paltrow shares a nude photo of her when she was pregnant with an apple to commemorate mother's Day..."
"Related content: Josh Brolin announced that his wife, Catherine, is pregnant with her first child. Clint Eastwood's daughter, Francesca Eastwood, is pregnant with her first child: picture
"Et has contacted Nelson's representative about these pregnancy photos."
"Nelson also married Sylvester Stallone and had a romantic connection with rapper flava fraff in VH1's surreal life."
"1993-2005"
"Julian winding 34 is her son with Kasper winding, she married from 1983 to 1984, Killian Marcus Nielsen 28 is her son with mark gastineau, and her sons Douglas Aaron Meyer 25 and Raoul Ayrton Meyer Jr 23 are her marriage with Raoul Meyer, from..."
On Wednesday, she shared another picture of her holding her stomach, which read: "happy times ❤️  "Nelson has been married to 39 year old Italian TV producer Mattia des since 2006 and had four children in a previous relationship."
"Families are getting bigger ❤️  #"My family, Bridget Nelson, baby pump," she wrote under the title of the picture
"The actress, known for her roles in Beverly Hills Cop 2 and red Sonia, revealed this to instagram fans a few days ago by sharing photos of her weight gain."
"Bridget Nelson, 54, is pregnant with her fifth child."



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for her relationship with son-in-law West, Kris has continued to be supportive of him and Kim, even previously living with the couple for almost two years.”
“Image zoom Travis Scott; Kris Jenner; Kanye West | Credit: Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty; Stefanie Keenan/WireImage; Bertrand Rindoff Petroff/GettyIn the meantime, both West and Scott have been working together in Jackson Hole, Wyoming, where they are believed to be working on the father of three’s forthcoming album.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star, 20, responded to reports that her mother Kris Jenner had taken over as manager for Travis Scott and Kanye West.”
““It’s not true,” Kylie tweeted on Wednesday along with a facepalm emoji.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Scott, of course, is the father of Kylie’s first child, daughter Stormi, who was born on Feb. 1.”
“On Wednesday, the New York Post‘s Page Six reported that Scott, 25, parted ways with Mark Gillespie’s Three Six Zero management last month weeks before West split from Izvor “Izzy” Zivkovic.”
“Reps for West and Scott did not immediately reply to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Regardless of if momager Kris will or won’t be managing Scott and West, the KarJenner matriarch has a close relationship with both rappers.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Kendall Jenner Says the Birth of Sister Kylie’s Daughter Stormi Has ‘Made Us Even Closer’The trio most recently spent time together to mark Stormi’s first Easter.”


"As for her relationship with her son-in-law West, Chris has always supported him and Kim, and even lived with them for nearly two years before."
"Image zooming Travis Scott; Chris Jenner; Kanye West | credit: Dimitrios cumbrics / Getty; Stephanie Keenan / WireImage; Bertrand Lindorf Petrov / Getty. Meanwhile, West and Scott have been working together in Jackson Hole, Wyoming, where they are believed to be creating a new version of father of three An upcoming album. "
"The 20-year-old" follow Kardashian "reality star responded to reports that her mother, Kris Jenner, took over as manager of Travis Scott and Kanye West."
"It's not true," Kelly tweeted on Wednesday, along with an emoticon of her face
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Scott, of course, is Kelly's first child, daughter Tommy, who was born on February 1 as the father."
Scott, 25, broke up with mark Gillespie's 360 management last month, followed by West and izvor "izy" Zivkovic, the New York Post reported on page 6 on Wednesday
"Representatives of West and Scott did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"Whether or not Chris's mother will run Scott and West, kajana's parents have a close relationship with both rappers."
"Related video: Kendall Jenner said the birth of his sister Kylie's daughter, stormi," brought us closer, "and the three recently celebrated his first Easter together



Number  264
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Trust me, these two won’t be touring together again — they might not even be speaking after this.””
“...money to spend for basically half a show from the artist you want to see...”
“With ticket sales this slow they will be lucky to break even Mariah Carey Cut From Film As Stars Blast Diva Behavior His fans are not into her and her fans are not into him 140 is a lot of...”
““Lionel and Mariah’s show was meant to be a blockbuster summer tour, but it’s turning out to be anything but,” one insider told The National ENQUIRER‘s Rob Shuter.”
“Mariah Carey joined forces with Lionel Richie for what was supposed to be a monster tour, but fans aren’t flocking to their shows — causing tickets to be reduced from $140 to a paltry 30 bucks!”


"Believe me, these two people will never tour together again - they may not even talk in the future."
“… The artists you want to see basically spend half the money for the performance... "
"Because ticket sales are so slow, they will be lucky to break Mariah Carey's cut from the movie as a star after blasting behavior. His fans don't like her and her fans don't like him. 140 is a lot..."
"Lionel and Maria's performance was supposed to be a big summer tour, but it didn't turn out to be," an industry source told rob Shute of the National Enquirer
Mariah Carey and Lionel Ritchie joined forces on what was supposed to be a devil's journey, but fans didn't rush in - which reduced tickets from $140 to a paltry $30! "



Number  265
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She currently lives in Malibu, and has done ever since her split from Kris in 2013.”
“...story is "not true."”
“While a representative for Caitlyn hasn't responded to a request for comment, another source close to the 67-year-old reality star tells Gossip Cop that the latest OK!”
“It's just hush-hush to keep the drama brewing," adds the source.”
“She even decorated her house.”
“"Kris brokers every deal for Cait, her show, book, sponsorships.”
“According to the source, Caitlyn is not living the "solitary life" she presents for the cameras and the retired Olympic gold medal-winning decathlete is now managed by Kris.”
“She lives in Hidden Hills, up the street from Kris Jenner," the source tells OK!.”
“"Caitlyn doesn't really live in Malibu.”
“The "I Am Cait" star is living in a Hidden Hills home, up the street from the Kardashian momager's residence, according to a source.”


"She currently lives in Malibu and has lived in Malibu since breaking up with Chris in 2013."
“… The story is not true. "
Although a representative of Caitlin hasn't responded to requests for comment, another source close to the 67 year old reality TV star told gossip police that the latest news is OK
"It's just silence to keep the plot going," the source added
"She even decorated her house."
"Chris makes every deal for Kate, her performance, her books, her sponsorship."
"According to the source, Caitlin did not live the kind of" lonely life "she showed for the camera. The retired Olympic gold medalist is now managed by Chris."
"She lives in a hidden mountain, not far from Chris Jenner," the source told OK! "
"Caitlin doesn't actually live in Malibu."
"According to a source, the star of" I'm Kate "lives in a hidden mountain on the street where Kardashian's mother lives."



Number  266
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: Coleman RaynerAnd regarding his skinny appearance, an eyewitness previously told RadarOnline he “looked sick,” adding, “I was shocked at the sight of him really.”Source: Coleman RaynerSource: Coleman RaynerWhat are your thoughts on Brad's new look?”
“However, he reportedly saw them earlier this month while at his home in Los Angeles.”
“Source: Coleman RaynerBrad and Angelina officially separated on September 19, 2016, and according to reports, are still struggling to find common ground when it comes to the ugly custody battle of their six children.”
“And even with a jacket on, it was easy to see the actor has less muscle tone than ever.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: Coleman RaynerBrad was spotted taking a ride on his motorcycle, and wore jeans that made it clear his legs are quite skinny now.”
“Let's hope it's the latter!”
“This is the second time fans have seen Brad showing some serious weight loss, and it begs the question-is it because of Angie or does he have some mysterious movie role no one knows about?”
“The formerly hunky star is literally a slither of his former self and stepped outside looking gaunt this week.”
“Source: Coleman RaynerWhat happened to the Brad Pitt from Troy?”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
The article goes on to the following ad source: Coleman Rayner and about his skinny appearance, a witness told radaronline earlier that he "looks disgusting," adding, "I'm really shocked to see him." Source: Coleman raynerand source: Coleman raynerand, what do you think of Brad's new look? "
"However, it is reported that he saw them at his home in Los Angeles earlier this month."
"Source: Coleman renabrad and Angelina officially separated on September 19, 2016, and it is reported that they are still trying to find common ground in the ugly custody fight of six children."
"Even in a jacket, it's easy to see that the actor's muscle tension is less than ever before."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: Coleman renabrad was found riding a motorcycle, wearing jeans, and apparently his legs are thin now."
"I hope it's the latter!"
"This is the second time fans have seen Brad show some serious weight loss, which leads to the question: is it because of Angie, or does he have some mysterious movie characters that no one knows?"
"The once handsome star is just a glib. He looks haggard when he goes out this week."
"Source: what happened to Brad Pitt of Coleman renatroy?"



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Feeling blue: The brunette beauty wore a blue plaid shirt along with light blue trousersModels attract: Anwar also is a model just like Kendall and his sister Gigi...”
“Anwar was backstage at the Victoria s Secret show when both Kendall and Gigi walked in November 2015 Is he still in her life...”
“Kendall and Anwar have been friends for the past several years, often attending the same parties in New York and Los Angeles.”
“According to TMZ, they split soon after that.”
“The couple was last seen together in public in early May at a Prada event in NYC.”
“He had chipped black nail polish on and several silver braceletsBefore the gala: Anwar was seen leaving his residence in NYC just before the CFDAs beganFor the past year, Anwar has been dating actress Nicola Peltz, who was not the CFDAs.”
“One says 'I love you angel' and another states: 'ODXX 22.'”
“He was on her radar: Jenner also shared a photo of his hands that evening - he has several tattoos.”
“He had chipped black nail polish on and several silver bracelets.”


"Blue feeling: this brunette is wearing a blue plaid shirt and light blue pantyhose. What's attractive is that Anwar is also a model, just like Kendall and his sister Gigi..."
"In November 2015, when Kendall and Gigi walked backstage in Victoria's secret show, Anwar was still in her life..."
Kendall and Anwar have been friends for the past few years, often attending the same parties in New York and Los Angeles
"According to TMZ, they broke up soon."
"The couple's last public appearance was at a Prada event in New York in early May."
"He painted black nail polish and several silver bracelets before the party: Anwar was seen leaving his residence in New York before CFDAs began. For the past year, Anwar has been dating actress Nicolas Peltz, who is not cfdas
"One says' I love you, angel ', the other says' odxx 22'"
"He's being watched: Jenna shared a picture of his hand that night - he had several tattoos."
"He has rubbed the black nail polish and some silver bracelets."



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“He and Erin “live a very quiet, ordinary life together in Manhattan,” a source told the mag.”
“Daniel Radcliffe reportedly asked his longtime girlfriend Erin Darke to marry him and the two have been shopping for rings that you just have to hear about!”
“Daniel Radcliffe may “disapperate” right off the market!”
“The 27 year-old Harry Potter star has reportedly asked his girlfriend of five years TV and film actress Erin Darke, 28, to marry him, according to Star magazine.”
“Despite denials of an engagement from Daniel’s reps, multiple sources told the mag about the couple’s alleged ring shopping outings.”
““Daniel recently took Erin ring shopping and spared no expense,” the insider said.”
““They’ve been talking about marriage for a while now and thought this was something worth splurging on.”Daniel reportedly is not one to splurge on major expenses even though he has $97 million at his disposal.”
“He’s practically richer than Gringotts!”
“The pair have definitely lived their lives fairly under the radar with the exception of a truly impressive karaoke performance!”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"He and Irene" live a very quiet, ordinary life together in Manhattan, "a source told the magazine
"It's reported that Daniel Radcliffe proposed to his old girlfriend Irene duck. They have been buying rings. You just need to hear about it!"
Daniel Radcliffe may "disappear" and leave the market at once
The 27 year old Harry Potter star has proposed to 28 year old Irene duck, a television and film actress he has been dating for five years, according to star magazine
"Although Daniel's representative denied the engagement, several sources told the magazine about the couple's so-called Ring shopping trip."
"Daniel has been shopping with Erin recently, sparing no cost," the person familiar with the matter said
"They've been talking about marriage for a while and think it's something to squander." According to reports, Daniel is not a spendthrift, even though he has $97 million at his disposal. "
"He's actually richer than Gringotts!"
"Apart from an impressive karaoke performance, their lives are absolutely out of the spotlight!"



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"So I want to thank my boyfriend Adam for that and I love you guys so much."”
“She’s been won over," a source told the paper.”
“...was still publicly dating Calvin Harris has taken on a whole new significance following the pictures of the pair kissing...”
“The Shake It Off star, 26, was caught in a passionate embrace with the Night Manager actor, 35, near her Rhode Island home in photos that emerged last night, just two weeks after it was confirmed she had split from the Scottish DJ after a 15 month romance.”
“Four weeks before the break-up and Swift and Hiddleston had put on a VERY flirty display as they hit the dancefloor at the Met Ball where Taylor was on co-hosting duties with Vogue editor-in-chief Anna Wintour.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram)Videos from the night - that Calvin was noticeably absent from - show the pair throwing shapes to Beyonce's Crazy In Love and appear oblivious to anyone else around them.”
“The duo are known for loving a turn on the dancefloor - but was there more to it then just an innocent booty shake?”
“Insiders later admitted there was obvious "chemistry" between the couple and it's clear in the video that Taylor and Tom can barely tear their eyes each other as they gyrate along to the music.”
“Taylor even suggestively brushes past the actor as she carries on the dance session.”
“(Image: David Fisher/REX/Shutterstock)According to The Sun Taylor had been "won over" by Hiddleston after the flirty dance-off, and while insiders claim he began "pursuing" her after they first met, they insisted that there was NO overlap with her romance with Calvin.”


"So I want to thank my boyfriend Adam for that. I love you very much."
"She was convinced," a source told the paper
“… Still dating openly, Calvin Harris takes a whole new meaning after the photos of the two kissing... "
"The 26 year old talk show star hugged the 35 year old night manager actor near her home in Rhode Island last night, just two weeks after she was confirmed to have broken up with the Scottish DJ after 15 months of romance."
"Four weeks before the break-up, swift and sidleston put on a very flirtatious look on the dance floor of the met, and Taylor was co hosting with Anna Wintour, editor in chief of fashion."
"(picture: instagram) (picture: instagram) the video that night - Calvin's apparent absence - shows the two throwing shapes at Beyonce's crazy love, seemingly indifferent to anyone around them."
"The couple are known for their love of turning around on the dance floor - but are there more than just simple Booties?"
People familiar with the matter later admitted that there was a clear "chemical reaction" between the couple, and it was obvious in the video that Taylor and Tom could hardly shed tears when they were spinning in the music
"Taylor even passed the actors implicitly during the dance."
(photo: David Fisher / Rex / shutterstock) according to the sun, Taylor was "conquered" by sidleston after the flirting ball. Although insiders claim that Taylor began to "pursue" her after the first meeting, they insist that Taylor's relationship with Calvin does not overlap



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Emotionally, it’s been a very difficult year.””
““Sometimes maybe it appears I am pulling it together, but really, I am just trying to get through my days,” she disclosed.”
“Despite reports, a source tells Us Weekly that Angelina Jolie is not off the market.”
““Angie isn’t dating a real estate agent.”
“She isn’t even dating at the moment,” the insider reveals.”
““Yes, she has hung out with a couple of guys over the last year, but it’s extremely low-key.”The Salt actress, 42, and estranged husband Brad Pitt officially called it quits in September 2016 after more than 10 years together and two years of marriage.”
“They are parents to Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
““The divorce talks between Brad and Angie are ongoing,” the source adds, noting that Pitt, 54, is lonesome for their children, who live with their mom.”
““Brad wishes the kids would spend overnights at his house, but he is hopeful that over time, that will organically happen.”The Tomb Raider star and Pitt much of their marriage on the move, raising their family in various cities.”
“But since their split, Jolie and the kids have remained in L.A. “Angie is frustrated that Los Angeles has become the home base for the family,” the source says.”


"Emotionally, it's been a very difficult year."
"Sometimes, I seem to cheer up, but in fact, I'm just trying to get through my day," she revealed
"Despite the reports, a source told us weekly that Angelina Jolie was not delisted."
"Angie didn't date a real estate agent."
"She doesn't even have a date right now," the person familiar with the matter said
"Yes, she has dated several men in the past year, but it's very low-key." The 42 year old salt star and her separated husband Brad Pitt, who have been together for more than 10 years, officially broke up in September 2016 after two years of marriage
"They are the parents of 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11 year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox."
"Divorce negotiations between Brad and Angie are ongoing," the source added, adding that Pete, 54, is a lonely child who lives with their mother
"Brad wants the kids to spend the night at his house, but he wants it to happen organically over time." Most of the marriages between Tomb Raider star and Pete are moving, supporting their families in different cities
"But since they broke up, Julie and the kids have stayed in Los Angeles." "Angie is frustrated that Los Angeles has become a base for their family," the source said



**Something goes wrong**
“Rihanna is currently readying her new album R8, release date pushed back to early next year.”
““All she can do is just laugh given the history between them… RiRi is in a great place right now, she is happy and focus on her career so all these Chris drama she is just laughing at,” the source said.”
“Sources close to the Bajan pop star told us that she is just laughing.”
“But what has Rihanna been saying about the melee.”
“He told his fans that he is a single guy before saying “f*** that b**ch” in reference to his on-again off-again girlfriend.”
“But Chris Brown got emotional last week Friday night while performing Friday’s Power 106 Cali Christmas at The Forum.”
“...told us...”
“SEE ALSO Chris Brown Blast Karrueche Tran Says She Cheated With Drake SEE ALSO Drake Told Chris Brown Karrueche Not My Type Stop Lying They have been having problems for a while now but things really went sour last month because he thinks she is not being loyal the source...”
“Sources told Urban Islandz that things went sour between Brown and Tran last month and the two split.”
“Karrueche Tran and Chris Brown have been bickering on social media since last week and Rihanna is laughing on the sidelines.”


"Rihanna is currently preparing for her new album R8, which will be delayed until early next year."
"Considering the history between them, all she can do is laugh Riley is in a good position now, she is very happy and focused on her career, so all of Chris's plays she is just laughing, "the source said
"Sources close to Bayan pop star told us that she was just laughing."
"But Rihanna said something about the scuffle."
"He told his fans that he was a bachelor, and then he said" f * * that B * * ch "refers to his intermittent girlfriend."
"But Chris Brown was very emotional when he performed Friday's power 106 Cali Christmas on the forum last Friday night."
“… Tell us... "
"See also Chris Brown Brest karuche tran saying she's cheating with Drake, and Drake telling Chris Brown karuche is not my type. Don't lie. They've had problems for a while, but last month things really got worse because he thinks she's not loyal to the source..."
"Sources told urban islandz that the relationship between brown and tran deteriorated last month and they broke up."
"Karrueche Tran and Chris Brown have been fighting on social media since last week, with Rihanna laughing."



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo by Sean Gallup/Getty Images for Sony Pictures...”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.”
“Craig has already announced his intent to return as 007 in the franchise’s 25th film, and according to the National Enquirer, he’s still struggling to salvage what’s left of his marriage.”
“The Enquirer s source claimed at the beginning of 2017 Rachel and Daniel haven t been happy for a while and nearly called it quits last year The report claims that the married couple was in two separate filming locations at the beginning of the year but continued to stay...”
“...apart even after wrapping their respective films...”
“The Enquirer then claims that they finally reunited in July after not being seen together in ‘554 days’.”
“According to the sources the minute the outlet attempted to lock down an exclusive on the couple s rocky marriage both Rachel Weisz and Daniel Craig were seen arriving at New York s Public Theater the next day prompting the source to add The whole thing just seemed like too...”
“...much of a coincidence...”
“I don’t buy it for a minute.”When you consider Daniel Craig’s own words, especially in the context of allegedly turning down a $150 million payday to star in two more James Bond films, he had stated, “Being on your own would be sad, sick, and weird.”
“I don’t trust myself.”


"Sony Pictures Sean Gallup / Getty pictures..."
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below."
"Craig has announced that he plans to play 007 in the 25th series, and according to the national inquirer, he is still trying to salvage the marriage."
In early 2017, Rachel and Daniel had been unhappy for a while, and almost broke up last year, inquirer sources said. The married couple were in two different shooting locations at the beginning of the year, but continued to live together, the report said
“… Even after the films are packed, they will be separated... "
"The inquirer later claimed that they finally met again in July after they had not met for 554 days."
"According to the source, just as the media tried to lock in the exclusive coverage of the couple's difficult marriage, Rachel Weisz and Daniel Craig came to the New York Public Theater the next day, prompting the source to add that the whole thing seemed too..."
“… What a coincidence... "
"I don't believe it for a minute." When you think about Daniel Craig's own words, especially in the context of two other James Bond films that he is said to have turned down $150 million for, he once said, "it's sad, disgusting and weird to be alone."
"I don't believe in myself."



Number  273
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get TMZ breaking news sent right to your browser!”
“Be First!”
“Pitt Denies Contacting Woman Suing Him for Possible Catfish Situation Joe Biden Campaign Ad with Brad Pitt Runs During World Series Brad Pitt s Tatted Up and Snorkeling for Island Vacay Old news is old news...”
“Anthony Fauci Jokes He d Like Brad Pitt to Play Him on SNL Brad Pitt Jets Off To South of France With Model Partner Nicole Poturalski SNL Gears Up for Live Election Season Return with Big Changes Jennifer Aniston Brad Pitt Get Steamy in Fast Times Charity Table Read Brad...”
“Woman Who Put Gorilla Glue in Hair Arrives in L A for Surgery Brad Pitt Wins First Acting Oscar Proving Life Can Get Better Brad Pitt Watches Thundercat Show in L A with Alia Shawkat Brad Pitt Hit Up In N Out With Alia Shawkat Day After Thundercat Show Dr...”
“Unblock.”
“You have notifications blockedYou have notifications blocked.”


"Send TMZ instant news to your browser!"
"First!"
"Pete denies contacting the woman who sued him for possible catfish. Joe Biden's campaign ad Brad Pitt runs during the world series. Brad Pitt prepares for Wakaya island and snorkeling. The old news is the old news..."
"Anthony Fossey joked that he wanted Brad Pitt and model partner Nicole poturalski to play him on the SNL Brad Pitt jet flying to the south of France, which is preparing for the return of the live election season and making a huge difference Pitt is on the fast times charity charts
"A woman with gorilla glue on her hair came to Los Angeles for surgery. Brad Pitt won the first Academy Award for acting, proving that life can be better. Brad Pitt watched the thunder cat show in Los Angeles with Elia shawcart. Brad Pitt and Elia shawcart attacked Dr the day after the thunder Cat Show..."
"Unblock."
"Blocked notification blocked notification."



**Something goes wrong**
“Why did it take so long for the photogenic couple to come together?”
“...via GIPHYAnd so she did.”
“Her co-star wasn’t Ashton Kutcher, which would have been too easy; it was Justin Timberlake.”
“Of course, they fall in love.”
“In 2011, Kunis was cast in a movie called “Friends With Benefits,” about a man and woman who decide to add a sexual component to their friendship, believing they’ll be able to stay otherwise platonic.”
“(See how much weird symmetry there is in this story?)”
“Kutcher famously wed actress Demi Moore, and the couple eventually filed for divorce, which was finalized after… eight years of marriage.”
“...via GIPHYKunis went on to date fellow child star Macauley Culkin for eight years.”
“They were friends.”
““It was like … whatever,” she says.”


"Why did it take so long for the couple to get together?"
“… Through giffy, she did the same thing
"Her partner is not Ashton Kutcher, it's too easy, it's Justin Timberlake."
"Of course, they are in love."
"In 2011, Kunis starred in a movie called friends with interests, about a couple who decided to add sex to their friendship in the belief that they could maintain Platonic feelings."
"See how many strange symmetries there are in this story?"
"Kutcher married the famous actress Demi Moore, and they finally filed for divorce. The divorce was in It was decided after eight years of marriage. "
“…… Via giphykunis has been dating child star Macaulay Calkin for eight years
"They are friends."
"It's like Whatever, "she said



Number  275
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“Are you surprised by the news?”
“Ten years of Big Bang Theory drama have been exposed as the show wraps up – with Kaley Cuoco and Mayim Bialik’s unfriendly relationship being the latest shocker!”
“A source recently revealed that the money-hungry actors are extremely jealous of Jim Parsons, as he is the highest-paid – and arguably most beloved – star in the series.”
“As Radar exclusively reported, the cast of the hit show has had many icy feuds in the past few years of filming.”
“Now she just tries to stay away,” added the insider.”
“She has tried several times to make peace but it has never worked.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Please let us know in the comments below."
"Are you surprised at the news?"
"Ten years of big bang theory has been revealed at the end of the show - the unfriendly relationship between Kali Kuko and maim bialik is the latest shock!"
A source recently revealed that the money hungry actors are very jealous of Jim Parsons because he is the highest paid and most popular star in the series
"According to the exclusive report of radar, the actors of this hit show have had a lot of cold grudges in the past few years."
"Now she just wants to stay away," the person familiar with the matter added
"She tried several times to make up, but it didn't work out."



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Career-wise, the former KUWTK patriarch auctioned off a four-hour meet-and-greet (including a round of golf in Los Angeles) on Thursday to two fans, which benefits the Caitlyn Jenner Foundation...”
“Who won?”
“At 68, the thrice-divorced father-of-six is 46 years older than the Pepperdine University senior, but the pair have been nearly inseparable as far back as June 2017.”
“The two-time Olympic gold medalist dressed her 6ft2in figure in a white floral bomber with matching skinny jeans and brown-suede booties.”
“Scroll down for videoInseparable: Transgender activist Caitlyn Jenner (2-R) escorted her constant companion Sophia Hutchins (L) to a sushi meal at Nobu Malibu on Sunday in her $200K purple PorscheThe Elsa & Rose Swimwear model sported a blue blazer with an LBD and nude ankle-strap stilettos.”
“Despite rumors involving marriage and love coaches, sources told TMZ last week that Caitlyn (born William) and Sophia (born Scott) were still 'just close friends.'”
“Aside from being transgender, Jenner and Hutchins are both registered Republicans and share a passion for golfing at the Sherwood Country Club as well as vacationing together.”
“And the blonde bombshell has certainly made herself at home residing in the retired decathlete's $3.5M, four-bedroom Malibu hilltop home.”
“Close At 68 the thrice divorced father of six is 46 years older than the Pepperdine University senior but the pair have been nearly inseparable as far back as June 2017 Starbucks to go The two time Olympic gold medalist dressed her 6ft2in figure in a white floral bomber with...”
“...matching skinny jeans and brown suede booties CVS drug store stop The Elsa Rose Swimwear model sported a blue blazer with an LBD and nude ankle strap stilettos Not a couple Despite rumors involving marriage and love coaches sources told TMZ last week that Caitlyn born William and Sophia born...”


"In terms of career, the former Archbishop of kuwtk auctioned a four hour meeting (including a round of golf in Los Angeles) on Thursday for two fans, which is good for the Caitlin Jenner Foundation..."
"Who won?"
"At 68, the father of six children, who divorced three times, was 46 years older than a senior at Pepperdine University, but as early as June 2017, they were almost inseparable."
"The two time Olympic gold medalist dressed her 6-foot-2-inch figure in a white floral Baseball Jacket, skinny jeans and brown suede boots."
"Scroll down video: Transgender activist Caitlin Jenner (2-r) wears a $200000 purple porscheelsa & Rose swimsuit on Sunday, and the model wears a blue jacket, LBD and nude ankle stilettos to escort her loyal partner Sophia Hutchins (L) to Nobu Malibu for sushi."
"Despite the rumors about marriage and love coaches, the source told TMZ last week that Caitlin (born in William) and Sophia (born in Scott) are still 'close friends'
"Apart from being transgender, Jenner and Hutchins are both registered Republicans and share a passion for playing golf at Sherwood country club and taking vacations together."
"The blonde living in the retired decathlon's $3.5 million, four bedroom Malibu hilltop villa undoubtedly makes her feel at home."
"Nearly 68 years old, the father of six children divorced three times is 46 years older than a senior at Pepperdine University, but as early as June 2017, the two time Olympic gold medalist almost inseparable from Starbucks. He put his 6-foot-2-inch body on a white flower Baseball Jacket
“… With skinny jeans and brown suede boots, CVS drug store stop Elsa rose swimsuit model wearing blue jacket with LBD and nude ankle lace up high heels is not a couple, although rumors about the love coach told TMZ last week that Caitlin born William and Sophia born



Number  277
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think A-Rod and JLo are a good match?”
“Ben Affleck ‘secretly hates’ that his ex Jennifer Lopez is dating Alex Rodriguez, we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned, so is he jealous?”
“The MLB legend and JLo have been inseparable lately, even enjoying a romantic trip to the Bahamas!”
“It’s been over a decade since Jennifer Lopez, 47, and Ben Affleck, 44, decided to call it quits.”
“Even though they’ve both moved on romantically, he’s not exactly pleased that she’s now dating retired MLB star Alex Rodriguez, 41.”
““Everyone knows that Ben is the number one Boston Red Sox fan,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He is still friendly with Jen to this day and he is hating that she is with someone so tied to the New York Yankees.”
“He can’t wait to bust her balls about it when they see each other again at an award show or outing.” Uh oh!”
““As much as he will joke about it to her, he secretly hates that she chose A-Rod, the worst Yankees player in his mind,” our insider added.”


"Tell us!"
"Hollywood star, do you think A-Rod and JLO match well?"
"Ben Affleck 'secretly hates' his ex girlfriend, Jennifer Lopez, is dating Alex Rodriguez, which is the only thing we know, so is he jealous?"
"MLB legend and JLO have been inseparable recently, even enjoying a romantic trip to the Bahamas!"
"It's been more than a decade since Jennifer Lopez, 47, and Ben Affleck, 44, decided to quit."
"Although both have had romantic experiences, he is not satisfied that she is now dating 41 year old retired major league star Alex Rodriguez
"Everyone knows that Ben is the number one fan of the Boston Red Sox," an insider told reporters
"He's still very friendly with Jane and he hates her being with someone who's associated with the New York Yankees
"When they meet again at the awards ceremony or on an outing, he can't wait to beat her up." Ah, oh
"Although he'll joke with her, he secretly hates her for choosing A-Rod, the worst Yankee player in his mind," our insider added



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Selena clearly still has a lot of work to do when it comes to trust issues.”Talk about the beauty behind the madness!”
“He’s loyal and treats his girlfriends well.”
““But Able is a good guy.”
“...whose possessiveness contributed to her split from Justin Bieber...”
“Selena was so scared that Abel would cheat on her that she paid a woman in plain clothes to spy on him at the music festival and keep his female fans away tattles a source close to the pop star...”
“The singer, 24, secretly hired a groupie guard to shadow the Starboy, 27, at Coachella.”
“Selena Gomez wants to make sure Abel “The Weeknd” Tesafaye keep his hands to himself!”


"When it comes to trust, Serena obviously has a lot of work to do." Talk about the beauty behind madness
"He's loyal and kind to his girlfriend."
"But Abel is a good man."
“… Her possessiveness led her to break up with Justin Bieber... "
"Selena is very afraid that Abel will cheat her, so she pays a woman in plain clothes to watch him at the music festival, and keeps her female fans away from the pop star..."
"The 24-year-old singer secretly hired a member to follow the 27 year old singer."
Selena Gomez wants to make sure Abel tsafay's hands are not hurt at the weekend



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, the amount surrogate mothers get paid doesn't vary greatly between cities like Los Angeles, San Francisco, Chicago and Houston.”
“Legal requirements and the costs of other services can also vary from state to state.”
“The gift that surrogates provide is both remarkable and generous.”
“In addition to the feeling of joy you experience as a surrogate, we will help to ensure that you are paid for your efforts, including generous compensation for surrogacy-related expenses.”
“Become a Surrogate: Apply Today!”
“Surrogacy Agency benefit and compensation packages vary greatly.”
“WCS is proud to offer one of the highest surrogacy base fees in the country, along with itemized expenses and allowances for individual circumstances.”
“Understanding how benefit packages are structured is an important factor in selecting your agency.”
“Please contact our office to review your specific benefit package.”
“Gestational Surrogate CompensationOur complete surrogate compensation schedule is provided below.”


"However, there is little difference in the remuneration of surrogate mothers between Los Angeles, San Francisco, Chicago and Houston."
"The cost of legal requirements and other services may also vary from state to state."
"Surrogate mothers offer outstanding and generous gifts."
"In addition to the joy you feel as a surrogate, we will help you ensure that you are paid for your efforts, including generous compensation for surrogacy related expenses."
"Be a surrogate mother: apply today!"
"The benefits and compensation programs of surrogacy agencies vary greatly."
"WCS is proud to provide one of the highest basic surrogacy costs in the country, as well as individual specific itemized fees and allowances."
"Understanding the structure of benefits is an important factor in choosing an agency."
"Please contact our office to see your specific benefit plan."
"Pregnancy surrogacy compensation our complete surrogacy compensation plan is as follows."



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...cc: @ericgarcetti.”
“Don't let this catastrophic administration take our planet down with it.”
“If I and my advisors had never learned what Science is or how & why it works, then I’d consider pulling out of the Paris Climate Accord too.”
“— bettemidler (@BetteMidler) June 1, 2017Astrophysicist Neil deGrasse Tyson took a jab at Trump’s entire administration.”
“Thank you to US press and other numbskulls who put him there.”
“...https://t.co/flpmMPM4b9 — Jon Favreau (@jonfavs) June 1, 2017Director Ava DuVernay summed up her thoughts in just one word: “Shameful.”Bette Midler took aim at the press for the decision she called “destructive.”There has never in US history been such a destructive megalomaniac in the WH.”
“Coulter is at least honest for the reason Trump made this decision: to piss off the left.”
“...https://t.co/pLtrUB3TiN — Kal Penn (@kalpenn) June 1, 2017Obama’s former chief speechwriter Jon Favreau pointed out potential reasoning for Trump’s decision.”
“Don't just get mad at the dummies, do something about it!”
“— Elon Musk (@elonmusk) June 1, 2017Actor Kal Penn, who worked in the White House Office of Public Engagement under the Obama administration, prompted activism.”


“… CC: @ ericgarcetti. "
"Don't let this disastrous government destroy our planet."
"If my advisers and I have never learned what science is, or how science works, or why it works, then I would also consider withdrawing from the Paris climate agreement."
"- bettemidler (@ bettemidler) on June 1, 2017, astrophysicist Neil degrasse Tyson attacked Trump's entire government."
"Thanks to the media and other idiots who put him there."
“... https://t.co/flpmMPM4b9-Jon  Favreau (@ jonfavs) director Ava Duvernay summed up her idea in one word on June 1, 2017: "shameful.". Bette Midler has targeted the media, which she calls "disruptive.". In the history of the United States, there has never been a world with such destructive arrogance
"Kurt is at least honest, because the reason trump made this decision is to infuriate the left."
“... https://t.co/pLtrUB3TiN-Kal  Penn (@ kalpen) on June 1, 2017, Jon Favreau, Obama's former chief speechwriter, pointed out the underlying reasons for Trump's decision
"Don't be angry with those fools, do something!"
"Elon Musk (@ elonmusk) on June 1, 2017, actor Kal Penn, who works in the white house public participation Office of the Obama administration, triggered radicalism."



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From horseback riding, to private tours led by a wildlife documentary filmmaker, to witnessing stunning views of the Skeleton Coast, see how the royals could be spending their time together in Namibia.”
“With the royal couple and their tastes in mind, she drafted an eight-day itinerary for their honeymoon.”
“Lassman also noted the best time of year to visit Namibia is in May.”
“"No two itineraries are ever the same."”
“"We go to great lengths to profile our clients and understand their interests, travel preferences, and requirements," Lassman told Business Insider.”
“To find out what a honeymoon itinerary in Namibia may look like, Business Insider talked to Marisa Lassman, a travel expert and founder of Another Africa, a luxury travel agency that specializes in unique and tailored trips across the continent.”
“Neighboring Botswana, which the couple most recently visited for Markle's 36th birthday celebration, Namibia offers incredible views and ultimate privacy.”
“After the royal wedding on May 19, Prince Harry and Meghan Markle will jet off for their honeymoon — and according to Travel + Leisure, the destination of choice is Namibia, in South West Africa.”
“We talked to a travel agent who specializes in luxury travel throughout Africa to find out what Markle and Prince Harry might do during their time in Namibia.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan MarkleThe couple's honeymoon is reportedly taking place in Namibia, in West Africa.”


"From horseback riding, to a private trip led by wildlife documentary filmmakers, to a spectacular view of the Skeleton Coast, to see how the royal family spent time together in Namibia."
"Considering the royal couple and their taste, she drew up an eight day itinerary for their honeymoon."
"Rasman also pointed out that the best time of year to visit Namibia is May."
"No two trips are the same."
"We have spared no effort to introduce our customers and understand their interests, travel preferences and requirements," Rasman told business insider
"To find out what a honeymoon in Namibia might look like, business insiders talked to Marisa Lassman, a travel expert and founder of another Africa. Another Africa is a luxury travel agency that offers unique and customized travel for the entire continent. "
"The couple in recent years visited Markel's 36 year birthday celebration in Namibia, neighboring Botswana, providing incredible views and ultimate privacy."
"After the royal wedding on May 19, Prince Harry and Megan markel will fly for their honeymoon - according to tourism plus leisure, their destination is Namibia in Southwest Africa."
"We talked to a travel agency specializing in luxury travel around Africa to find out what mark and Prince Harry might do during their stay in Namibia."
Prince Harry and Megan Makelele are reported to be living on their honeymoon in Namibia, West Africa



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Julia Roberts’ recent romantic reconnection with on-screen love Richard Gere enraged her hubby, Danny Moder — and sparked a vicious face-off that may end up in court, insiders exclusively claim to RadarOnline.com.”
““Julia and Danny have had their flare-ups over the years, but nothing like this fight,” a source spilled.”
“Danny was furious about Richard and dumped out all his frustrations about their troubled marriage in one ferocious rant A storm brewed amid reports Roberts 49 and Gere 68 reignited their flirtatious friendship when they reunited on the Today show in 2015 to mark the 25th anniversary of their blockbuster...”
“80s rom com Pretty Woman...”
“The pair engaged in very public on-camera PDA, and Radar learned the two — who also sizzled in 1999’s Runaway Bride — continued to hook up in a series of under-the-radar romantic rendezvous.”
““They’ve met numerous times for discreet dinner dates,” a source spilled.”
““They’ll book a private room, where they’ll be left uninterrupted and can even stay past closing hours.”When Moder, 48, discovered Julia’s blatant betrayal, he hit the roof, according to insiders.”
““He suspected that Julia was secretly meeting Richard, but reading about it in the media was humiliating to him,” the source snitched.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
Julia Roberts recently reestablished a romantic relationship with her on-screen lover Richard Kiel, according to people familiar with the matter, which angered her husband, Denny Maud, and triggered a vicious confrontation that could eventually lead to court RadarOnline.com Website. "
"Julia and Denny have been fighting each other for years, but nothing is more intense," a source said
"Denny was furious with Richard and poured out all his dissatisfaction with their marriage in a fierce roar. It is reported that Roberts 49 and Kiel 68 met again in 2015's "Today Show" to commemorate the 25th anniversary of their blockbuster. The storm once again ignited their ambiguous friendship... "
"Post-80s beauty..."
"The two took very public photos on the PDA, and the radar learned that the two - who hissed in 1999's runaway bride - continued to have a series of romantic dates under the radar."
"They've met many times for a cautious dinner date," a source said
"They book a private room where they can stay undisturbed or even stay after work." According to people familiar with the matter, Maud, 48, hit the roof when he found out that Julia had betrayed her
"He suspected Julia was meeting Richard in secret, but it was a shame for him to see it in the media," the source quipped



Number  283
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can follow her on Instagram (@blackw00d) and Twitter (@emztweetz).”
“Every Wednesday at 7:20 p.m. you can ask her any and all questions about self-love, dating, and relationships LIVE on YourTango’s Facebook page.”
“Suri Cruise is now apparently desperate to connect with her dad and is tired of her mom Katie Holmes' excuses.”
“Tom, 55, has missed "one milestone after another."”
““Like any little girl, her greatest wish is for her father to be there, and now she’s been disappointed again,” an insider told Star magazine.”
“"That would be painful for any child, and you have to wonder what kind of emotional toll it’s taking on Suri."”
“Though a recent report from Hollywood Life revealed that Tom did send Suri a birthday gift, he didn't show up for her birthday party on April 18.”
“And this isn't the first time.”
““Tom hasn’t been there to watch Suri blow out the candles since she turned 7,” another source said.”
““It’s so sad!”As Suri gets older, she's questioning Holmes, 39, more and more why her father doesn't come around.”


"You can follow her on instagram (@ blackw00d) and twitter (@ emztweetz)"
"Every Wednesday at 7:20 p.m., you can live any questions about self love, dating and relationships on Tango's Facebook page."
"Suri cruise is obviously very eager to get in touch with her father and tired of her mother Katie Holmes' excuses."
Tom, 55, missed "one milestone after another"
"Like any little girl, her greatest wish is that her father can be there, and now she is disappointed again," a person familiar with the matter told Star Magazine
"It's painful for any child, and you have to wonder what kind of emotional loss it will bring to Suri."
"Although a recent report from Hollywood life showed that Tom did give Suri a birthday present, he didn't attend her birthday party on April 18."
"This is not the first time."
"Tom hasn't been there since Suri was seven to see her blow out the candles," another source said
"How sad! "As Suri grew older, she asked Sherlock Holmes, 39, more and more why her father didn't come."



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Main image via Instagram: Beyoncé...”
“...complete coincidence but interesting nonetheless...”
“Advertisement The divide between the pair is said to date back to when the Carters reportedly didn t attend Kimye s wedding and although Kim is thought to have tried to arrange playdates for Blue Ivy and North it just hasn t happened Maybe the shared doctor is just a...”
“A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on Jul 13, 2017 at 10:10pm PDTAlthough it's been rumoured previously that Kim and Beyoncé aren't the best of pals, perhaps that's all rubbish and Kim actually provided Bey with the recommendation.”
“??❤️??????????”
“Sir Carter and Rumi 1 month today.”
“Reports say that the twins were born at 5:13 am with Rumi arriving first and Sir following soon after.”
“It seems that Dr Crane is familiar with the Kardashian family and their brood also delivering Kourtney Kardashian's and Scott Disick's children and Dream, daughter of Blac Chyna and Rob Kardashian.”
“AdvertisementYes, according to TMZ, Kim and Queen B had their babies delivered by Dr Paul Crane.”
“The latest news is that their birth certificates show that their mother, Beyoncé, shares the same obstetrician/gynaecologist as none other than Kim Kardashian.”


"Instagram main picture: Beyonce..."
“… It's a complete coincidence, but it's interesting... "
"It is said that the disagreement between the two people can be traced back to the time when the cartels said they did not attend Jinye's wedding. Although Jinye was thought to have tried to arrange a playmate for blue ivy and North, it just didn't happen. Maybe the common doctor was just one..."
"Beyonce (@ Beyonce) shared a post at 10:10 p.m. on July 13, 2017. Although it was rumored that Kim and Beyonce were not best friends, maybe they were rubbish, Kim actually recommended it to Beyonce."
“?? ❤️ ??????????”
"Sir Carter and rummy are a month away today."
"It's reported that the twins were born at 5:13 a.m. and Rumi was the first to arrive. Mr. Wang will be here soon."
"It seems that Dr. Klein is very familiar with the kardashians and their children. They also delivered the children of Courtney Kardashian and Scott Disick, and the daughters of Blake chener and rob Kardashian."
"Yes, according to TMZ, Kim and queen B's baby was delivered by Dr. Paul Klein."
"The latest news is that their birth certificate shows that their mother Beyonce is the same obstetrician and gynecologist as Kim Kardashian."



Number  285
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Indeed, a message needs to be sent to those in power who abuses those over whom they can exert influence and control that abuse and sexual predatory behavior will not be tolerated.””
““It is now time to hold Venit accountable for his sexual predatory behavior and to hold WME accountable for its conduct in condoning, ratifying, and encouraging Venit’s sexual predatory behavior,” the Brooklyn Nine-Nine star said in a complaint filed in Los Angeles Superior Cour.”
“Crews response happens to come on the same day that Deadline reports he filed an official lawsuit against Venit for sexual assault.”
“The story was never published on RadarOnline, which Crews attributes to the fact that it’s untrue.”
“Crews believes the story was a threat to silence him after he spoke on “Good Morning America” about his sexual assault experience involving his former WME manager, Adam Venit.”
““ABUSERS PROTECT ABUSERS.”Crews was referencing a tweet he posted in mid-November in which he shared a screenshot of an alleged email from RadarOnline asking him to comment on a story about him hiring two prostitutes while he was in Monte-Carlo, Monaco in 2015.”
““The same guy who runs @radar_online and @NatEnquirer who threatened me with the false prostitute story 1 day after my @GMA interview now accused of SEXUAL MISCONDUCT,” he wrote on Twitter with a link to the story.”
“Still, Crews went after Howard on Twitter bringing up a recent email he received for a story that never went to print.”
“American Media Inc., which runs the sites Howard works for, conducted its own investigation at the time via a third party and welcomed Howard back to the company after deeming the accusations baseless - a claim which his accusers contest.”
“As previously reported, it’s been revealed that Dylan Howard was investigated in 2012 over accusations for sexual harassment in the workplace.”


"In fact, there is a need to send a message to those in power who abuse those they can influence and control that abuse and sexual exploitation will not be tolerated."
"It's time to hold vinette responsible for his sexual predatory behavior and WME responsible for his connivance, approval and encouragement of Vinnie's sexual predatory behavior," the Brooklyn nine star said in a complaint in the Los Angeles High Court
"The crew's response coincided with the deadline for reporting his formal sexual assault lawsuit against Venice."
"The story has never been published on radaronline, and the staff think it's untrue."
Cruise believes the story threatens to silence him after he told him about his sexual assault with former WME manager Adam venit on Good Morning America
"The abuser protects the abuser." Cruise cited a tweet he posted in mid November in which he shared a screenshot of an email purportedly from radaronline asking him to comment on the story of two prostitutes he hired in Monte Carlo, Monaco, in 2015
"One day after my interview with @ GMA, the guy running @ radar online and @ natenquirer threatened me with false prostitute stories, and now he's accused of sexual misconduct," he wrote on twitter
However, cruise is still tracking down an email Howard received recently on twitter, which is an unpublished report
American media Inc., which runs Howard's work website, then conducted its own investigation through a third party and welcomed Howard back to the company after finding that his accusations were groundless - his plaintiff objected
"As previously reported, it was revealed that Dylan Howard was under investigation in 2012 for alleged sexual harassment in the workplace."



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Apparently, you have to be super tiny to live up to that awesome Hollywood standard, but you would probably agree with us when we say that she looks great!”
“Jennifer has said in interviews that in Hollywood, as an actress, she is considered to be obese.”
“Let’s be honest, most men don’t want to spend their lives with a woman who never gets comfortable with them or is unable to let loose.”
“...advertising14 She Is Super Awkwardvia: youtube.comWe all know how awkward dating and relationships can be, especially in the beginning before you really know the person that you are seeing, but sometimes that awkwardness doesn't go away after knowing each other for a while.”
“So, this could very easily be a reason why men aren’t too keen on Jennifer.”
“This might not seem like a crazy request at first, but for people in Hollywood, social media plays a big part in how they market things.”
“The actress has said that she hates the idea of social media and the people who use it, so obviously she does not want the men that she dates to be active social media users.”
“Although Jennifer Lawrence does have some social media accounts out there, she only ever uses them if she has absolutely no other choice.”
“For instance, Facebook has become the biggest social media platform that there is and it has done wonders for connecting people, but it has also been a huge relationship destroyer.”
“There are a ton of social media platforms out there that have taken over the lives of many people.”


"Obviously, you have to be super tiny to meet Hollywood standards, but that's great!"
In Hollywood, as an actress, she is considered obese, she said in an interview
"To be honest, most men don't want to spend their lives with a woman who is uncomfortable with them or who can't relax."
“… Ad 14 she is very clumsy: youtube.com Everyone knows how embarrassing it can be to date and fall in love, especially at the beginning before you really know each other, but sometimes it doesn't go away after you know each other for a while. "
"So it's easy to be the reason why men don't like Jennifer very much."
"It didn't seem like a crazy request at first, but for people in Hollywood, social media plays an important role in how they sell things."
"The actress said she hates the idea of social media and the people who use it, so she obviously doesn't want the man she's dating to be an active user of social media."
"Although Jennifer Lawrence does have some social media accounts, she only uses them when she has no choice."
"Facebook, for example, has become the largest social media platform in the world. It has created miracles for people to connect with each other, but it is also a huge relationship breaker."
"There are a lot of social media platforms that have taken over a lot of people's lives."



Number  287
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Within 24 hours the hashtag #BettyWhite was tweeted out over 100 times, with Twitter users inquiring whether White had died, or confirming it was simply a hoax.”
“The title lead some readers to believe White had actually died.”
“The singer was the victim of several previous death rumors including one that spread on Twitter on February 15th, 2012.”
“Chris BrownOn March 23rd, 2012, rumors of singer Chris Brown's death spread on Twitter and on YouTube through comments on his music videos.”
“The rumor was dispelled by a post on Gossip Cop published the next day.”
“Paul McCartneyOn March 21st, 2012, RIP Paul McCartney began to trend on Twitter.”
“This was proven untrue by the International Business Times and Gossip Cop.”
“OMG"The rumor was dispelled on January 27th, when Loree Rodkin , a friend of the singer, tweeted:"Whoever started that stupid rumor needs to have their face dragged across concrete..#cher is FINE"AdeleOn January 28th, 2012, RIP Adele was a trending topic on Twitter.”
“Is this real?”
“The rumor was further fueled when Kim Kardashian tweeted:"Did I juist hear Cher has passed away?”


"Within 24 hours, the Betty White tag was tweeted more than 100 times, and Twitter users asked if white was dead or confirmed that it was just a scam."
"The title convinced some readers that white was really dead."
"The singer was the victim of several previous death rumors, including one spread on twitter on February 15, 2012."
"Chris Brown on March 23, 2012, rumors of singer Chris Brown's death spread on Twitter and Youtube through comments on his music video."
"The rumor was refuted by a post on gossip police the next day."
"Paul McCartney on March 21, 2012, rip Paul McCartney became popular on twitter."
"This has been proved untrue by the international business times and the gossip police."
"Gosh," the singer's friend Loree rodkin tweeted when the rumor was refuted on January 27: "Whoever started that stupid rumor needs to drag their faces to the concrete floor. #"Sherry's OK" adelaion January 28, 2012, rip Adel is a hot topic on twitter
"Is that true?"
When Kim Kardashian tweeted, "did I hear that Cher died?"



Number  288
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Instagram...”
“"I've had other relationships where it's been tricky but with these four it really works nicely," she added.”
“The "Dinero" singer stopped by KTU’s Cubby and Carolina Bermudez radio show on Tuesday morning and confirmed there has been no proposal from her former MLB star beau ... and there hasn't been a secret ceremony either.”
“"I’m not engaged.”
“I'm not engaged.”
“No, no," she said.”
“Rumors began swirling when JLo sported what some say looked like an engagement ring on that finger over July 4th weekend, but as The Blast exclusively reported, no engagement went down.”
“She continued to wear the ring on her wedding finger though, even displaying it this AM.”
“MegaWhen asked by the hosts if they ran off to tie the knot, she jokingly screamed, "NO!"”
“And while no engagement or ceremony has happened for the couple of over a year, JLo couldn't stop gushing about her relationship with A-Rod.”


“Instagram…”
She added: "I've had other relationships, but these four relationships are really good."
The "dinero" singer stopped on ktu radio cubby and Carolina Bermudez on Tuesday morning to confirm that her former MLB star boyfriend didn't propose to her... And there's no secret ceremony
"I'm not engaged."
"I'm not engaged."
"No, no," she said
"On the weekend of July 4, when JLO was wearing an engagement ring on his finger, rumors began to stir, but according to the exclusive report of the explosion, there was no engagement."
"Even so, she continued to wear the ring on her wedding finger and didn't show it until this morning."
When the host asked her if they were going to get married, she jokingly screamed, "no!"
"Although the couple had not been engaged or married for more than a year, JLO couldn't help talking about her relationship with A-Rod."



Number  289
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Gibson co-stars in the upcoming comedy sequel as the father of Mark Wahlberg ’s character, and according to an article in the latest […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has exclusively learned the truth.”
“Did Will Ferrell and Mel Gibson really feud on the set of Daddy’s Home 2?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
Gibson plays mark wolberg's father in the upcoming comedy sequel 】 IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a new tabloid newspaper said on Monday, but gossip police was the only one to know the truth."
"Are will Ferrer and Mel Gibson really at odds on the set of daddy's house 2?"



Number  290
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Defendant arrested.”Buress is best known for roles in “Broad City,” “Spider-Man: Homecoming,” and “Baywatch.”Representatives for Buress did not immediately respond to Variety‘s request for comment.”
“A crowd began to gather and vehicular traffic slowed as they watched the defendant yelling and being disorderly.”
““I, then again, asked him to leave the area about five times.”
““Once outside, the defendant stood by the front gate and continued yelling profanities,” the officer’s report reads.”
“When the officer declined, Buress went into a venue and the officer followed him, feeling he was too intoxicated to remain.”
“The Herald reports that the incident began when Buress asked a nearby police officer to call him an Uber.”
“...at 1 57 a m and posted bail around 6 a m...”
“Hello Billy Mr Buress was arrested for disorderly intoxication on December 9 2017 at approximately 10 30 p m Miami PD MiamiPD December 10 2017 According to Miami Herald Buress was booked in the Wynwood Arts District which is hosting numerous Art Basel related events on a disorderly intoxication charge...”
“In the video, he can heard asking the officers to explain what he was being detained for.”
“The police responded via Twitter after a video was posted to social media that appeared to show Buress getting arrested.”


"The accused is arrested." Bryce's most famous characters are big city, Spiderman: home and bay watch. Mr. Burris's representative didn't immediately respond to requests for comment from variety
"I watched the defendant yell, the order was chaotic, the crowd began to gather and the traffic slowed down."
"I asked him to leave the area again about five times."
"As soon as the defendant got out of the house, he stood at the front door and continued to yell dirty words," the police report said
"The officer declined. Blaise walked into a place. The officer followed him, feeling that he was too drunk to stay any longer."
"The Herald reported that the incident began when Blaise asked a nearby police officer to call him Uber."
“… At 1:57 a.m. and around 6:00 a.m., the insurance company will be insured. "
"Hello, Billy, Mr. Bryce was arrested at 10:30 p.m. on December 9, 2017, Miami police department, Miami PD, December 10, 2017. According to the Miami Herald, Bryce was registered in the Wentwood Art District, which is holding many activities related to the Basel Art Festival, charged with alcoholism..."
"In the video, he can be heard asking the police to explain why he was detained."
"A video was posted on social media showing that police responded via Twitter after Blaise's arrest."



**Something goes wrong**
“Scott Someone from Storage Wars Barry Weiss Rachel Lindsay Russell Brand Usher Billy Bush Pure Randomness Shemar Moore Victor Cruz Gracie Gold Ricky Schroeder Jose Medina Wannabes Campaigners Mary Lou Retton Stassi Schroeder Dina Parise The Definite No s Hugh Grant Ashlee Simpson Michelle Obama Hillary Clinton...”
“Tomorrow is Fat Tuesday and I ve got hella king cakes to get ready Legitimate possibilities Normani Kordei Simone Biles Mr T Chris Kattan Erika Jayne Nancy Kerrigan Nick Viall Heather Morris Charo Bonner Bolton Rashad Jennings Longshots Someone from Pretty Little Liars Ashley Benson Someone from Property Brothers Jonathan...”
“If anything new crops up between now & the announcement, I’ll do my best to update…but no guarantees.”
“...do the show...”
“...may not indicate anything but is interesting nonetheless wannabes campaigners are celebs that have expressed interest in doing the show but we have no reason to believe they ve actually been asked to do the show and the definite no s are celebs that have specifically said they won t...”
“Legitimate possibilities are rumors that we think have some validity based on who is reporting them long shots are rumors from a source that we don t necessarily trust but it s possible they could be valid pure randomness is general observations weird stuff we ve noticed that may or...”
“Here’s the list of all the cast rumors we’ve heard/reported on for season 24 – as always, they’re divided into categories.”
“The next 48 hours leading up to the cast announcement are likely to be pretty hectic, so I thought I better get this posted sooner rather than later.”


"Scott someone from the storage war barivis Rachel Lindsay Russell Brand welcome Billy Bush purely random Sherma Moore Victor Cruz Gracie Huang Jin Ricky Schroeder Jose Medina all rounder activist Mary lurreton Stacy Schroeder Paris definitely no s Hugh Grant Ashley Simpson Michelle Obama Hillary Clinton..."
"Tomorrow is a big Tuesday, I've got the king of Hella cake ready, Mr. normanny Cordy Simone beers, Chris cartham Erica Jennie Nancy krigan Nick vial Heather Morris Charlotte Bonner Bolton Rashard Jennings longshot, little liar Ashley Benson, real estate brother Jonathan's man..."
"If anything new happens between now and the announcement, I will try my best to update But there is no guarantee. "
“… Show... "
“… It may not indicate anything, but interestingly, although the intended activists are celebrities and they express interest in doing the show, we have no reason to believe that they have actually been asked to do the show and make it clear that they are not celebrities and that they will not... "
"The legitimate possibility is rumor, we think there are some basis who are reporting their validity, long gun is the source of rumor, we don't necessarily trust, but it is possible that they may be valid, pure randomness is the general observation of weird things, we notice, maybe or..."
"Here's a list of all the cast rumors we heard / reported in season 24 - as always, they're divided into different categories."
"The cast may be busy in the next 48 hours, so I think I'd better get this out early."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, what would your relationship name for Nick and Sara be?”
“Nick Jonas and ‘Victoria Secret’ model Sara Sampaio reportedly enjoyed a romantic bowling date night on Jan. 31, and the crooner was ‘all over her!’ Keep reading for juicy EXCLUSIVE details on their sizzling connection!”
“It looks like Nick Jonas, 24, has a new woman in his life!”
“The “Close” crooner was reportedly spotted with Victoria Secret bombshell Sara Sampaio, 25, at PINZ Bowling Center in Los Angeles on Jan. 31, packing on the PDA!”
““They had a lane to themselves and had their hands all over each other,” an eyewitness tells Life & Style.”
““Nick was constantly cuddling her when they were waiting for the bowling ball to return.”
“Fans were coming up to Nick to try to talk to him, and he would just grab Sara and start making out with her.” These two are getting hot and heavy!”
“The source continued, “It was like he was trying to make everyone aware that he has a new girlfriend.” It seems their connection has really strengthened over time, as they were also canoodling at the Up&Down party in NYC last June.”
““It was his album release party and he was celebrating with some friends in a private area up on the stage,” an eyewitness told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, what's your emotional name for Nick and Sarah?"
On January 31, Nick Jonas and Victoria Secret model Sara Sampaio enjoyed a romantic bowling date night, while the choir "fell in love with her! "Keep reading their ironplate connection for interesting exclusive details!"
"It looks like Nick Jonas, 24, has a new woman in his life!"
According to reports, on January 31, the "intimate" minstrel was found packing on a PDA with 25-year-old Victoria's Secret bomb Sara Sampaio at the pinz bowling center in Los Angeles
"They have their own path and their hands are on each other," a witness told life & style magazine
"Nick was holding her all the time when they were waiting for the bowling ball to come back."
"The fans came to Nick and wanted to talk to him, so he grabbed Sarah and started making out with her." These two are getting hot and heavy
"It's like trying to let everyone know that he has a new girlfriend," the source added As time goes on, the connection between them really seems to strengthen, because they were still playing at parties in New York last June. "
"It was his album release party and he was celebrating with some friends in a private area of the stage," a witness told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  293
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementKim Kardashian and Kanye West have not commented on the rumors surrounding his mental health.”
“Other guests included Pharrell Williams, The Dream, Fabolous, and Trey Songz.”
“The troubled rapper sought medical treatment for a flu-like illness, but insiders say that the anniversary of Donda West’s birthday always brings problems.”
“Could West be headed for another breakdown?”
“According to Radar Online, West’s wife Kim Kardashian is tired of her husband’s behavior.”
““Whenever anything arises that makes Kanye reflect back on Donda’s death, he gets all weird, and Kim is just sick of it,” reveals a source.”
““He is constantly blaming his mom’s death, and while the family tries to be understanding, they are all tired of him using Donda’s death as a reason for him to go off the rails again.”'Kids See Ghosts II' possibly next year?”
“?”
“...https://t.co/X12U8ojrVG — XXL Magazine (@XXL) July 25, 2018The insider adds that West has a cycle of behavior that starts with him isolating himself and becoming withdrawn.”
“Then, when anyone questions his motives, he starts acting crazy and gets defensive.”


"Kim Kardashian and Kanye West did not comment on rumors about his mental health."
Other guests include Farrell Williams, dream, fabulos and Trey sonz
"The troubled rapper is seeking treatment for a flu like illness, but insiders say that donda West's birthday always brings problems."
"Will the west go to another collapse?"
"According to radar online, West's wife, Kim Kardashian, is tired of her husband's behavior."
A source said: "whenever something happens that makes Kanye remember donda's death, he will become very strange. Kim is fed up with it."
"He has been blaming his mother's death. Although the family tried to understand, they were tired of him using Dongda's death as a reason for his cheating again." "Kids watch ghost 2" maybe next year? "
“?”
“... https://t.co/X12U8ojrVG- XXL magazine (@ XXL) 25, 1987, the insider added that West has a cycle of behavior, from isolating himself to becoming withdrawn. "
"Then, when someone questions his motives, he starts acting crazy and taking precautions."



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Let us know on our message boards.”
““Kanye’s no better – he’s bought himself a new Rolex watch and is shopping for a new Rolls Royce.”Do you think Kim and Kanye’s spending habits are out of control?”
““She’s still buying really expensive jewelry even though she won’t flaunt it in public or social media,” the source confirmed.”
“And she’s still said to be emotionally scarred from being robbed at gunpoint in Paris last year.”
““She’s re-thinking the new baby’s nursery now.”Kim, who takes home a reported $51 million dollars for exposing her private life to cameras, doesn’t seem to be too concerned about being a wealthy target, even though her fancy Bel Air home was recently robbed.”
““She just decided she wanted all new fixtures in their home, which will set them back a few thousand,” the source revealed.”
“And Kim, who just celebrated her 37th birthday, has been busy buying herself some pricey presents, as she and Kanye, 40, prepare for their third baby.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Tell us on the message board."
"Kanye is not much better - he bought himself a new Rolex watch and is buying a new Rolls Royce." Do you think Kim and Kanye's consumption habits are out of control? "
"Although she won't show off in public or on social media, she is still buying very expensive jewelry," the source confirmed
"And it's said that she was robbed by armed men in Paris last year, and her feelings are still scarred."
"She's thinking about a nursery for her new baby now." Kim, who is reported to have earned $51 million by exposing her private life to cameras, doesn't seem too worried about becoming a wealthy target, despite the recent robbery of her beautiful bellelle home
"She has just decided to buy all the new furniture at home, which will set them back thousands of sets," the source said
"Kim, who has just celebrated her 37th birthday, is busy buying herself some expensive gifts because she and Kanye, 40, are preparing for their third child."



**Something goes wrong**
“Nonetheless Shimizu claims that she happily served as Madonna s sex slave I was her secret booty call available any time of the day or night for secret sex sessions Shimizu has claimed in an interview adding that Madonna would she said pay for her to fly to any part...”
“And while Jolie has spoken openly of her affair with Shimizu, another of the model’s lovers, the iconic pop star Madonna, has not.”
“Jolie was married to actor Billy Bob Thornton in 2000, after just two months of dating.”
“...as Jolie became involved with other men according to The New York Daily News...”
“And wanting to kiss her and wanting to touch her Shimizu for her part has touted her own ability to take care of Angelina s sexual needs Their lesbian relationship continued throughout Jolie s three year marriage to Miller possibly contributing to their 1999 divorce as well as afterward even...”
““[I was] surprised when I suddenly found myself having these feelings I always had for men, but for a woman,” the superstar told Walters.”
“We had a lot of fun.”In fact, she told Girlfriends, “I probably would have married Jenny Shimizu if I hadn’t married my [first] husband.”Many years later, Jolie told TV interviewer Barbara Walters that her sexual feelings for Shimizu surprised even herself.”
“I said to myself, ‘Oh, my God, that’s Legs.’ She’s great.”
“I thought I was going to lose the job.”
““Actually, I saw when she was being cast in Foxfire, and I thought she had just read for my part.”


"Nevertheless, Shimizu claims that she's happy to be Madonna's sex slave, and I'm her secret booty, calling for secret sex meetings at any time of the day or night. Shimizu claims that in an interview, she added that Madonna would say that she paid to let her fly anywhere..."
"Although Julie openly talked about her relationship with Shimizu, Madonna, the model's other lover and iconic pop star, did not."
Julie married actor Billy Bob Thornton in 2000, and her two month date ended
“…… According to the New York Daily News, when Julie was dating other men
"She wanted to kiss her, she wanted to touch her, and Shimizu boasted about her ability to take care of Angelina's sexual needs. During their three-year marriage, Julie and Miller's lesbian relationship has continued, which may be the reason for their divorce in 1999, or even later... "
The superstar told Walters: "I was surprised when I suddenly found out that I felt this way about men but women."
"We had a good time." In fact, she told her girlfriends, "if I hadn't married my (first) husband, I might have married Jennie Clearwater." Many years later, Julie told TV reporter Barbara Walters that she was surprised even by her sensuality to water
"I said to myself," oh my God, that's the leg. " She's great. "
"I thought I was going to lose my job."
"In fact, when I saw her in the role of fox, I thought she read it for me."



Number  296
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“InstagramThe Hunger Games star met Cyrus on the set of the 2009 film The Last Song and they subsequently began dating.”
“According to Ok!”
“Australia (via the Daily Mail), the young pair have parted ways due to their inability to agree about when to start a family.”
“An insider apparently told the magazine that 28 year old Hemsworth wished to have children whilst 25 year old Cyrus was not ready He wants kids and doesn t want to keep putting it off but it s not quite the timeline Miley had in mind Getty Images This content...”
“...is imported from embed name...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“The source claimed the Hannah Montana star was hesitant to tie the knot at all, ‘Miley put off plans for the wedding and Liam was growing tired of it...”
“They haven't been getting along in recent months.’The insider added, ‘[She] didn't really want to get married.”
“It's something that everyone else seemed to get but Liam.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"The hunger game star met Cyrus on the set of the 2009 movie" the last song "and they started dating
"Press OK!"
"In Australia (through the daily mail), the young couple split because they couldn't agree on when to start a family."
"A person familiar with the matter obviously told the magazine that 28 year old Hemsworth wants to have children, while 25-year-old Cyrus is not ready. He wants children and doesn't want to delay all the time, but this is not entirely Millie's idea of the timetable, Gatty image, this content..."
“… Import from embedded name
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The source said that the Hannah Montana star did not hesitate to get married at all." Miley delayed the wedding plan, and Liam was getting tired of it. "
"They haven't been getting along well in recent months," the person familiar with the matter added, "and [she] doesn't really want to get married."
"Everybody else seems to have got it except Liam."



Number  297
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two aren’t in a serious or committed relationship.”
“Katie sees Jamie as perfect daddy material, and husband material too.” But as Gossip Cop has repeatedly noted, Foxx and Holmes only casually date.”
“He’ll be expected to step up to the plate.”The outlet’s seemingly bogus insider adds, “With their romance finally out in the open they can start planning a future and stop all the tiptoeing around.”
“She’s made it clear to Jamie that there’s no way she would have a baby out of wedlock.”
“A so-called “source” tells the magazine, “Katie is very traditional and has old-fashioned values.”
“According to OK!, those close to the actor and actress believe she’s expecting his child, which will lead to the two walking down the aisle.”
“Gossip Cop has repeatedly debunked rumors of the two getting married and starting a family, and we can do so yet again.”
“Katie Holmes is not pregnant with Jamie Foxx’s baby, nor are the two planning a wedding together, despite a completely made-up tabloid report.”


"The relationship is not serious and there is no commitment."
"Katie thinks Jamie is the perfect father and the perfect husband." But as gossip police has repeatedly pointed out, Fox and Sherlock Holmes are just casual dates
"He will be expected to be on the right track," added the media's seemingly phony insider. "As their relationship finally becomes public, they can start planning for the future and no longer walk around on tiptoe."
"She made it very clear to Jamie that she couldn't have children out of wedlock."
"Katie is very traditional and has outdated values," a so-called "source" told the magazine
"Press! People close to the actor and actress think that she is pregnant with his child, which will lead them to the palace of marriage
"The gossip police have repeatedly exposed the rumor that they are married and married. We can expose it again."
"Katie Holmes is not pregnant with Jamie Fox's child, and they have no plans to have a wedding together, even though it's a completely fictional tabloid."



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“Justin loves himself some Luis and Daddy, but he’s got bigger fish to fry at home.”
“Watch JB’s sneaky exit from a club while his ‘Despacito’ collaborators were performing!”
“The 2018 Grammy Awards were almost perfect, but there was someone huge missing: Justin Bieber!”
“The “Sorry” singer, 23, skipped the Grammys on January 28 and opted to stay back home in Los Angeles during Music’s Biggest Night.”
“He wasn’t having a quiet night in Netflix and Chilling with Selena Gomez, though.”
“Biebs hit the town with his guys, instead.”
“TMZ caught up with him while he was leaving Mr. Chow in LA instead of hitting the stage in NYC to sing the “Despacito” remix with Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee.”
“Uh oh!”
“Now, don’t get it wrong.”


"Let us know!"
"Justin loves Lewis and dad a little bit, but he has more important things to do at home."
"When JB's' despacito 'partner is performing, watch him sneak out of the club!"
"The 2018 Grammy awards are almost perfect, but there's one person missing: Justin Bieber!"
The 23-year-old "sorry" singer skipped the Grammy Awards ceremony on January 28 and chose to spend the biggest night in the music industry in Los Angeles
"However, he spent an unsettled night on Netflix and was not with Selena Gomez."
"Instead, Bibbs and his men went to the city."
When he left Stephen Chow in Los Angeles, TMZ caught up with him instead of singing the "despacito" remix on the New York stage with Louis fonsey and Yankee dad
"Oh
"Now, make no mistake."



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You can see more photos of Seth and Charlize here.”
“And whatever she has going with Seth is barely a month old, so it is a little early to be so public, you know?”
“More likely she’s hiding her face because she just didn’t want to be photographed at that moment or whatever.”
“If Charlize is going to take the trouble to bang you, she doesn’t mind if people know.”
“My general thought on Charlize is that she would never shame-date someone.”
“Do you think that’s just her natural reticence or is she actually shame-dating Seth and she doesn’t want people to know?”
“Note how Charlize is hiding her face in some of these pics?”
“These were taken last night in West Hollywood, and Seth and Charlize came out of a sushi place.”
“...the rumors were true they are together...”
“According to sources Seth and Charlize met in January for business related stuff she signed on to his planned western spoof A Million Ways To Die In the West then spent some social time together late in the awards season partied together after the Oscars and now it looks like...”


"You can see more pictures of Seth and Charlize here."
"No matter what her relationship with Seth is, she's only a month old, so it's a little early to go public, you know?"
"It's more likely that she hid her face because she didn't want to be photographed or anything at that moment."
"If Charlize is going to beat you up, she doesn't mind being known."
"My general view of Charlize is that she will never be ashamed to date someone."
"Do you think it's just her natural silence, or is she really shy about dating Seth and she doesn't want to be known?"
"Notice how Charlize hid his face in these pictures?"
"It was shot in West Hollywood last night. Seth and Charlize came out of a sushi restaurant."
“… The rumor is true, they are together... "
"According to the source, Seth and Charlize met in January because of business-related matters. She signed a contract with his Western prank" a million ways to die in the west ", and then socialized later in the awards season and gathered together after the Oscars. Now it looks like..."



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2669039145907473
Correct number is  75
Total number is  281
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
